RECENT  WASHINGTON  D.C.  AIRSPACE  INCURSIONS 
AND  REOPENING  REAGAN  NATIONAL  AIRPORT 
TO  GENERAL  AVIATION

S.  HRG.  109–354

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JUNE  9,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

26–701 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 9, 2005 .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Allen .....................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Burns ...................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye ..................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg ..........................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator E. Benjamin Nelson ............................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller ...........................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Bolen, Ed, President and CEO, National Business Aviation Association ...........
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Cebula, Andrew V., Senior Vice President, Government and Technical Affairs, 
Aircraft Owners and Pilots Association .............................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Cirillo,  Michael  A.,  Vice  President,  System  Operations  Services  Air  Traffic 
Organization, Federal Aviation Administration ................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Coyne, James K., President, National Air Transportation Association ..............
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Fleming, Jonathan, Chief Operating Officer, Transportation and Security Ad-
ministration, Department of Homeland Security ..............................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Page 
1
21
21
2
3
2
2
27
27
20
24
26
1

32
33

43
45

11
14
37
39

4
6

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

RECENT  WASHINGTON 

AIRSPACE
INCURSIONS  AND  REOPENING  REAGAN
NATIONAL  AIRPORT  TO  GENERAL  AVIATION 

D.C. 

THURSDAY,  JUNE  9,  2005

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  11  a.m.  in  room  SR–
508, Russell Senate Office Bulding, Hon. Ted Stevens, Chairman of 
the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The CHAIRMAN. Let me welcome the witnesses here this morning. 
I  will  say  to  you  that  I  was  in  an  undisclosed  location,  and  wit-
nessed the items we are going to be reviewing on a classified basis. 
I don’t want anything to be indicated that I’m commenting on what 
I personally saw or, heard that morning. 

We do thank you for your willingness to appear to discuss the se-
curity  of  our  Nation’s  Capital.  I  personally  want  to  applaud  the 
Transportation  Security  Administration  for  its  recent  proposal  to 
reopen  Ronald  Reagan  Washington  National  Airport  to  general 
aviation  flights  and  to  TSA’s  commitment  to  begin  working  on  a 
plan to allow similar access to recreational general aviation flights 
as  well.  I  believe  that  action  is  long  overdue,  and  I  do  thank  TSA 
for your hard work. 

I  also  want  to  commend  FAA,  TSA,  DHS  and  the  U.S.  Secret 
Service,  the  U.S.  Capitol  Police  and  others,  that  are  involved  in 
agencies  that  are  pertinent  to  this  hearing  for  their  actions  in  re-
sponding  to  the  recent  unauthorized  airspace  incursion  that  re-
sulted in the evacuation of the White House, U.S. Capitol buildings 
and U.S. Supreme Court. 

While  there  are  areas  that  can  be  improved  to  make  the  air 
threat  assessment  and  response  procedures  more  efficient  for  the 
most  part  the  system  worked.  Today’s  hearing  is  meant  to  discuss 
TSA’s  plan  to  reopen  Reagan  Airport  and  to  examine  those  things 
that  went  well  during  the  recent  air  incursion  incident  and  to  dis-
cuss the things that may need improvement. 

Senator Inouye? 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

2

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator  INOUYE.  I  want  to  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing 
this  morning.  I  have  a  full  statement  here  may  I  request  that  it 
be made part of the record. 

The CHAIRMAN. No objection. So ordered. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
I  want  to  thank  Chairman  Stevens  for  holding  this  hearing  today  to  focus  on  a 
number of issues that we have been following regarding General Aviation (GA) secu-
rity. This hearing is a very timely opportunity to examine the Transportation Secu-
rity  Administration’s  (TSA)  recent  announcement  of  plans  to  reopen  National  Air-
port (DCA) to GA operations, as well as last month’s incursion of the National Cap-
ital  Region’s  prohibited  airspace  by  a  private  GA  aircraft  which  led  to  the  second 
evacuation of major Federal offices in less than a year. 

The GA community has a significant presence in most regions of the country, and 
plays  a  vital  role  in  many  of  them.  In  the  State  of  Hawaii,  GA  aircraft  have  a  tre-
mendous impact on the local economy with internationally acclaimed air tours, and 
they provide a critical resource in addressing transportation needs for isolated loca-
tions.  Still,  the  nation’s  Federal  intelligence  agencies  continue  to  identify  GA  secu-
rity as a potential loophole that terrorists have considered using or may still be able 
to  exploit.  Warnings  like  these  should  not  go  unheeded  in  the  post-9/11  world,  yet 
relatively  little  Federal  effort  or  funding  has  been  committed  to  GA  security  since 
those terrorist attacks occurred. 

The  effort  to  reopen  DCA  is  a  welcome  development  for  the  local  economy,  and 
an  initial  look  at  the  proposed  plan  indicates  a  major  emphasis  on  establishing  an 
effective  security  protocol.  However,  I  am  concerned  about  press  reports  regarding 
attempts  to  water  down  the  proposed  rules  to  allow  GA  aircraft  to  return  to  DCA 
before they have even been put in place. I think that we must be able to assess how 
the  new  system  is  working  before  making  any  sweeping  changes  to  expand  service 
at  the  airport.  DCA  has  been  shut  down  to  GA  operations  for  nearly  four  years  be-
cause  of  security  concerns.  I  believe  it  would  be  wise  to  move  carefully  and  look 
closely at the effects of the newly proposed system before taking further steps. 

The  matter  of  airspace  incursions  into  the  D.C.  Air  Defense  Identification  Zone 
(ADIZ)  also  needs  a  closer  look.  I  would  like  to  know  more  about  the  TSA’s  assess-
ment  of  this  incident.  It  appears  security  protocol  was  properly  followed,  but  was 
the  end  result  the  best  of  all  possibilities?  Is  it  prudent  to  evacuate  thousands  of 
workers and tourists from select locations? Do we have the proper systems in place 
to  intercept  slow  moving  aircraft?  Would  a  faster  moving  plane  have  been  shot 
down? 

I  am  hopeful  that  today’s  hearing  will  provide  the  answers  to  these  and  other 

questions that many in Congress have been asking. 

As the GA fleet in the U.S. continues to expand with the use of larger and faster 
aircraft,  we  must  remain  vigilant  and  make  certain  that  Congress  takes  the  nec-
essary  steps  to  ensure  that  GA  security  is  effective  and  flexible  enough  to  address 
any  potential  threats  that  may  develop  over  time.  I  am  hopeful  that  this  hearing 
will  be  a  proper  first  step  to  look  more  closely  at  the  current  structure  of  GA  secu-
rity  and  future  efforts  that  must  be  undertaken  to  protect  this  critical  segment  of 
our aviation system.

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Burns? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 

Senator  BURNS.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  for  the  hearing.  I 
would like to make a couple of comments. I’m excited that the TSA 
has taken the first step in dealing with some of the things that are 
going  on  around  this  town  and  across  the  country  now  that  in  the 
post 9/11 world Congress and the Administration have been forced 
to make several very difficult decisions. Right or wrong, we created 
the Department of Homeland Security. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

3

Of course that carries with it some extreme challenges associated 
with  propping  up  the  new  agency  where  it  can  effectively  and  effi-
ciently  fulfill  the  mission  that  it’s  set  in  place  to  do,  and  that  is 
to protect the American public. 

It’s pretty tough whenever those people who want to do us harm, 
they  can  get  lucky  once,  but  we  have  got  to  be  right  100  percent 
of  the  time.  The  odds  against  you  are  pretty  bad.  After  several 
years we are finally starting to see flickers of common sense, I am 
getting a little bit happier. While I’m not completely satisfied with 
the gateway and cumbersome security protocols associated with the 
plan, I do see this as a positive first step. 

Around this time next year I am hopeful that we’ll be conducting 
similar  hearings  to  discuss  the  implementation  of  Phase  II  for 
Reagan  National.  And  I  think  we’re  finally  starting  to  see  the  so 
called  security  EKG  level,  out  from  its  turbulent  inception  after  9/
11.  And  logical  well  thought  decisions  are  being  considered  now, 
and  we’re  starting  to  think  long  term  rather  than  short  term. 
Transportation, Homeland Security are extremely important issues. 
We have a lot riding on our security trying to be 100 percent right. 
I’ve  got  a  full  statement  here  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  with  the 
questions  and  with  the  testimony  we’ll  hear  this  morning  that 
some of this common sense maybe starting to come into play. 

And I thank you for holding the hearing. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Burns follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS, U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 
Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman  for  calling  this  hearing  today  on  the  recent  air  incur-
sions  and  the  Transportation  Security  Administration’s  (TSA)  proposal  to  reopen 
Reagan  National  Airport  to  general  aviation  (GA).  Many  of  us  have  been  waiting 
for this proposal for a couple years now. I am excited TSA has taken this first step, 
but I am hopeful we can expand the program in the years to come. 

In the post-9/11 world, Congress and the Administration have been forced to make 
several difficult decisions. Right or wrong, we created the Department of Homeland 
Security (DHS) and the extreme challenges associated with propping up a new agen-
cy  where  it  can  effectively  and  efficiently  fulfill  its  mission  to  the  American  public. 
After  several  years  we  are  finally  starting  to  see  flickers  of  common  sense  come 
out  of  DHS  and  the  TSA.  While  I  am  not  completely  satisfied  with  the  ‘‘gateway’’ 
and cumbersome security protocols associated with the plan, I do see this as a posi-
tive  first  step.  Around  this  time  next  year  I  am  hopeful  we  will  be  conducting  a 
similar  hearing  to  address  the  implementation  of  Phase  II  of  the  Reagan  National 
plan. 

I  think  we  are  finally  starting  to  see  the  so-called  security  EKG  level  out  from 
its’  turbulent  inception  after  9/11  and  logical,  well  thought  out  decisions  are  being 
considered.  Transportation  and  homeland  security  are  extremely  important  issues 
and  we  have  a  lot  riding  on  our  security  being  ‘‘right’’  100  percent  of  the  time.  We 
have several challenges ahead of us but I think we can view today as a step in the 
right direction. 

I  also  applaud  the  Chairman  for  bringing  the  GA  groups  before  us  today.  They 
play an important role in this process. While the government can create all the pro-
grams,  protocols  and  directives  it  wants,  the  burden  of  implementation,  education 
and  proper  use  fall  on  the  GA  community.  It  is  important  they  take  this  responsi-
bility seriously and utilize their role in the system. 

I say this because, general aviation plays such a vital role in states like Montana 
and many others represented on this Committee. Most in the industry are projecting 
tremendous growth in the air charter, air taxi and business aviation sectors and we 
should  do  all  we  can  to  promote  their  growth.  The  economic  opportunities  and  im-
pact  GA  can  have  on  a  community  are  difficult  to  quantify  but  I’m  willing  to  bet 
we  could  use  the  DCA  example  to  show  how  important  GA  access  to  a  community 
can  be.  Security  restraints  could  easily  impede  progress  and  I  want  to  make  sure 
that doesn’t happen. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

4

Mr. Chairman, again, thank you for calling this important hearing and I look for-

ward to the testimony.

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you,  very  much.  Our  first  witness  this 
morning  is  Mr.  Jonathan  Fleming,  the  Chief  Operating  Officer  of 
the  Transportation  Security  Administration.  Good  morning  Mr. 
Fleming, may we please have your statement. 

AND 

TRANSPORTATION 

STATEMENT  OF  JONATHAN  FLEMING,  CHIEF  OPERATING
OFFICER, 
SECURITY
ADMINISTRATION, DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 
Mr. FLEMING. Good morning, Mr. Chairman, Senator Inouye and 
distinguished  Members  of  the  Committee,  it’s  my  pleasure  to  be 
here with you today, and to testify regarding aviation security poli-
cies  for  the  National  Capital  Region  along  with  my  colleague  from 
the  Federal  Aviation  Administration.  In  all  decisions  involving 
aviation  operations  in  the  National  Capital  Region  we  are  ever 
mindful  of  the  area’s  high  profile  as  the  target  for  terrorists.  In  a 
very  compressed  location  rests  the  seat  of  government  of  the 
United States, the headquarters and operations facilities of various 
Federal departments, and the monuments, museums and other na-
tional  treasures  of  immense  symbolic  and  historic  value  to  Ameri-
cans.  Assuring  their  safe  and  secure  operation  under  security 
measures  aimed  at  minimizing  vulnerabilities  and  preventing  at-
tacks is an absolute essential. 

A layered defense system has been established to protect the Na-
tional  Capital  Region.  An  air  defense  identification  zone  or  ADIZ 
surrounds  Washington  D.C.,  as  well  as  an  inner  ring  of  protected 
air space known as the flight restricted zone, or FRZ, that operates 
under further restrictions. 

The  National  Capital  Region  Coordination  Center  or  NCRCC  is 
an inter-agency group which includes several entities whose unified 
actions  create  a  layered  situational  awareness  structure.  Six  orga-
nizations provide daily representation. FAA, Secret Service, Capitol 
Police, Customs and Border Protection, DOD and TSA. 

The  incident  on  May  11,  2005,  demonstrated  the  importance  of 
this  inter-agency  approach.  At  11:28  the  NCRCC  detected  a  track 
of interest squawking 1200 and entering the ADIZ 44 miles north-
east of DCA heading south. Prior to entering the Washington D.C. 
ADIZ an aircraft in this profile is required to file a flight plan, con-
tact  air  traffic  control,  and  squawk  a  discrete  or  uniquely  identifi-
able  transponder  code.  This  aircraft  met  none  of  these  require-
ments. The aircraft initially flew westward on a course just within 
and  paralleling  the  northern  boundary  of  the  ADIZ.  Due  to  the 
nonthreatening nature of this vector, neither the military, nor Cus-
toms and Border Protection initiated an intercept. All agencies con-
tinued  to  maintain  close  monitoring  and  tracking  of  this  aircraft. 
The  aircraft  then  turned  left,  assuming  a  southerly  heading  di-
rectly  toward  the  FRZ.  In  response  AMO  launched  its  Blackhawk 
helicopter  and  Citation  jet  aircraft.  This  was  communicated  to  all 
NCRCC  agencies  via  two  communications  networks:  the  Domestic 
Events Network, or DEN, and the Defense Red Switch Network, or 
DRSN.  These  conference  calls  were  convened  per  operating  proce-
dures. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

5

The  alert  fighters  at  Andrews  Air  Force  Base  were  brought  to 
heightened  alert  posture  and  ultimately  launched.  As  the  Cessna 
entered  the  FRZ  the  AMO  Blackhawk  intercepted  the  Cessna  and 
confirmed the identity of the aircraft. The Blackhawk attempted to 
get  the  Cessna  to  communicate  via  radio  and  the  other  visual 
means. 

The  AMO  aircraft  were  then  directed  to  depart  the  immediate 
area, and the F–16 intercepted the Cessna 10 miles from DCA. The 
discussions  continued  on  the  Red  Switch,  which  included  all  rel-
evant  agencies  and  authorities.  With  the  Cessna  still  not  commu-
nicating or diverting, the F–16’s dispensed flares. 

The  AMO  citation  ultimately  made  contact  with  the  Cessna  via 
radio,  and  directed  the  aircraft  out  of  the  FRZ.  With  F–16s  as  es-
cort,  the  Cessna  exited  the  FRZ  at  the  western  boundary.  The 
Blackhawk assumed the escort responsibility. The Cessna departed 
the  ADIZ  and  landed  at  Frederick  Municipal  Airport  as  directed. 
Both occupants of the aircraft were taken into custody by Maryland 
State Police. 

The  defensive  system  worked  as  intended.  The  communications 
and  interactions  among  responsible  entities  that  took  place  during 
this  incident  resulted  in  prompt  decisionmaking  and  measured  ef-
fective  actions  to  divert  this  threatening  aircraft.  All  agencies  in-
volved in this incident received and acted on the same information. 
The  events  of  May  11  have  not  interfered  with  or  adversely  af-
fected proceeding with the security plan to resume general aviation 
operations  at  DCA.  TSA  led  a  concerted  effort  that  resulted  in  the 
announcement on May 25 of a security plan to resume certain pre-
cleared  general  aviation  operations,  including  charter  flights,  cor-
porate aircraft, and on demand operations at the airport. 

The measures required will provide a level of security equivalent 
to  those  in  place  for  commercial  operations.  We  anticipate  the  re-
quirements will include TSA inspection of crews and passengers, of 
property  and  of  aircraft,  advanced  submission  of  passenger  and 
crew  manifests,  comparing  of  passengers  against  terrorist  watch 
lists,  criminal  history  records  checks  for  flight  crews,  TSA-trained 
armed security officers onboard each aircraft, coordination with the 
NCRCC  prior  to  departure  and  use  of  gateway  airports  as  last 
points of departure. 

General aviation security presents unique challenges requiring a 
range  of  measures.  Locally  we  have  increased  the  flow  of  general 
aviation commerce by reopening Maryland’s three airports to tran-
sient  aircraft.  TSA  efforts  to  foster  general  aviation  security  more 
broadly  include  the  Airport  Watch  Program,  clearance  of  alien 
flight  training  candidates,  security  measures  for  charter  and  cor-
porate operations, temporary flight restrictions, publication of secu-
rity  guidelines  for  general  aviation  airports,  vulnerability  assess-
ments, and specific requirements pertaining to National Special Se-
curity Events. 

These  initiatives  demonstrate  TSA’s  commitment  to  working 
with  the  general  aviation  community  and  our  Federal  partners  to 
ensure the level of security is appropriate to the threat. 

I would be pleased to answer any questions you may have. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Fleming follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

6

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JONATHAN FLEMING,  CHIEF OPERATING OFFICER,
TRANSPORTATION AND SECURITY ADMINISTRATION,  DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND
SECURITY 
Mr. Chairman, Senator Inouye, and Members of the Committee, good morning. It 
is  my  pleasure  to  be  here  with  you  today  to  testify  regarding  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security’s  aviation  security  policies  for  the  National  Capital  Region,  the 
security  plan  for  a  measured  resumption  of  general  aviation  operations  at  Ronald 
Reagan  Washington  National  Airport  (DCA),  the  events  surrounding  the  incursion 
into  the  Flight  Restricted  Zone  (FRZ)  by  a  private  aircraft  on  May  11,  2005,  and 
general aviation security more broadly. I welcome this opportunity to appear before 
you,  along  with  my  colleague  from  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA),  to 
address these important matters. 

In  all  decisions  involving  aviation  operations  in  the  National  Capital  Region,  we 
are  ever  mindful  that  the  area  is  an  obvious  target  for  terrorists.  In  a  very  com-
pressed  location  rests  the  seat  of  Government  of  the  United  States—the  White 
House,  United  States  Capitol,  the  Supreme  Court,  and  supporting  buildings  that 
house  staff  and  other  Federal  courts;  the  leadership  targets—the  President  and 
Vice-President,  Members  of  Congress,  Cabinet  Members,  justices  and  judges;  the 
headquarters  and  operations  facilities  for  the  Nation’s  domestic  and  international 
security apparatus among the Federal departments; and the monuments, museums, 
and  other  national  treasures  of  immense  symbolic  and  historical  value  to  Ameri-
cans.  These  concentrated  assets  represent  the  lifeblood  of  the  governance  of  our 
great  Nation  and  our  global  responsibility  to  lead  the  war  on  terror  and  foster  the 
continued  spread  of  freedom  and  democracy.  Assuring  their  safe  and  secure  oper-
ation,  under  security  measures  aimed  at  minimizing  vulnerabilities  and  preventing 
attacks, is an absolute essential. 

As  part  of  its  effort  to  protect  the  National  Capital  Region,  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security  (DHS)  and  TSA,  in  cooperation  with  other  governmental  enti-
ties, regularly monitors the threat posed to or by particular types of aircraft arriving 
or  departing  from  DCA  and  factors  continually  changing  information  into  its  oper-
ations  and  planning  efforts.  TSA  plans  and  executes  its  general  aviation  security 
mission in a manner that exemplifies the threat-based, risk-managed approach used 
to strengthen security across all transportation modes. TSA has led a systematic ef-
fort  over  the  last  several  months  with  other  parts  of  DHS  that  deal  with  airspace 
protection  in  the  National  Capital  Region  (NCR),  including  Border  and  Transpor-
tation  Security,  Customs  and  Border  Protection,  Information  Analysis  and  Infra-
structure  Protection,  the  United  States  Secret  Service,  and  the  Office  of  the  Na-
tional  Capital  Region  Coordinator,  to  assess  continually  the  security  situation  at 
DCA  and  ensure  that  security  measures  are  appropriate  to  the  threat.  This  con-
certed  effort  culminated  in  the  announcement  on  May  25  of  a  security  plan  to  re-
sume  certain  pre-cleared  general  aviation  operations,  including  charter  flights,  cor-
porate  aircraft,  and  on-demand  operations,  at  the  airport.  We  wish  to  thank  all 
those who were instrumental in this achievement, especially Members of this Com-
mittee and other distinguished Members of Congress, our colleagues at the FAA and 
throughout  the  Departments  of  Transportation,  Defense,  and  Homeland  Security, 
and the general aviation industry. 

I  will  provide  more  details  about  our  plan  for  opening  DCA  to  general  aviation, 
but first I would like to describe the layered airspace security system that has been 
established  to  protect  the  National  Capital  Region.  An  Air  Defense  Identification 
Zone (ADIZ) surrounds Washington, D.C. In order to fly within the ADIZ, operators 
must follow specific procedures before and during the flight. The FAA, which is the 
lead agency for monitoring compliance of air traffic in the ADIZ, works closely with 
TSA, DHS, and stakeholders to assess and refine procedures for entering and oper-
ating within the ADIZ. There is also an inner ring of airspace, known as the Flight 
Restricted Zone (FRZ). The flight restrictions are outlined in FAA Notice to Airmen 
3/2126. 

The National Capital Region Coordination Center (NCRCC) is an integral compo-
nent  of  the  layered  aviation  security  system  for  the  National  Capital  Region.  The 
NCRCC is an interagency group comprised of several agencies whose unified actions 
create a layered situational awareness structure to enhance airspace security for the 
NCR.  Six  entities  provide  daily  representation  in  the  NCRCC:  the  FAA,  the  U.S. 
Secret Service, the U.S. Capitol Police, U.S. Customs and Border Protection, the De-
partment  of  Defense  (DOD),  and  TSA.  Other  agencies,  such  as  the  Federal  Bureau 
of Investigation (FBI), are key participants during major events or surge operations. 
The  NCRCC  monitors  the  operations  of  all  participating  agencies  to  enhance  air-
space security within the defined limits of the ADIZ. Each agency that participates 
within  the  NCRCC  maintains  its  own  organic  capabilities  and  complete  command 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

7

and  control  over  operational  and  tactical  matters  that  fall  within  that  agency’s  re-
spective statutory authorities. The NCRCC does not infringe upon an agency’s oper-
ational  or  tactical  employment  of  its  assets,  nor  does  it  have  command  and  control 
over  any  participating  agency.  TSA,  as  the  Executive  Agent  for  the  NCRCC,  is  re-
sponsible  for  disseminating  relevant  transportation  security  intelligence,  docu-
menting  the  activities  of  the  NCRCC,  and  providing  the  physical  infrastructure  to 
accommodate NCRCC operations, to ensure that the participating agencies are fully 
informed about emerging requirements of the threat. 

When  an  unidentified  aircraft  approaches  the  Washington,  D.C.,  ADIZ,  radar  op-
erators  at  one  or  all  of  the  monitoring  agencies,  including  the  U.S.  Customs  and 
Border  Protection’s  (CBP)  National  Airspace  Security  Operations  Center,  DOD’s 
Northeast  Air  Defense  Sector  headquarters  in  Rome,  NY,  and  the  FAA’s  Potomac 
Terminal Radar Approach Control (TRACON) Facility, begin to actively track it. As 
it  enters  the  ADIZ,  one  of  the  monitoring  organizations  announces  the  aircraft’s 
presence  on  the  Domestic  Events  Network  (DEN),  an  interagency  open  line  of  com-
munications that is continuously available. Pertinent information about the aircraft 
is  broadcast  on  the  DEN  in  this  initial  report.  Immediately  after  the  initial  report, 
the  FAA’s  representative  in  the  NCRCC  acknowledges  the  report  and  establishes  a 
common  identifier  to  be  used  in  interagency  communications  regarding  the  track. 
Once  a  common  identifier  has  been  assigned,  the  agency  representatives  in  the 
NCRCC each perform their respective duties. 

The TSA representative to the NCRCC has a specific role to play when an uniden-
tified aircraft approaches the ADIZ. He or she is responsible for notifying the Trans-
portation  Security  Operations  Center  (TSOC)  Command  Duty  Officer  (CDO)  of  the 
situation, who in turn decides whether additional notifications are necessary. Where 
appropriate,  the  CDO  will  notify  senior  TSA  and  DHS  officials.  The  TSA  NCRCC 
representative  also  has  the  responsibility  to  record  a  timeline  of  the  events  that 
take  place,  in  addition  to  monitoring  radar  feeds  to  assess  the  threat.  Finally,  the 
TSA representative also monitors the DEN to answer questions from other agencies, 
to  enhance  interagency  situational  awareness,  and  to  gather  information  for  docu-
menting the incident. 

To  convey  a  sense  of  the  scope  of  this  operation,  since  the  establishment  of  the 
NCRCC  in  January  2003  3,369  airspace  incursions  have  occurred,  resulting  in  the 
opening of 2,226 NCRCC case files and assessment of 1,411 pilot deviations. During 
this  same  period,  147  incursions  of  the  FRZ  occurred,  on  which  114  NCRCC  case 
files  were  opened.  Twenty-seven  penetrations  of  the  prohibited  airspace  above  the 
Capitol,  the  White  House,  and  the  National  Mall  occurred.  Alert  aircraft  launched 
or diverted 627 times in response to intrusive flights. 

The  incident  on  May  11,  2005,  demonstrated  the  importance  of  the  integrated, 
interagency  approach  that  is  constantly  assessed  and  refined  to  ensure  that  the 
highest  performance  standards  are  set  and  maintained.  At  1128  EDT,  the  NCRCC 
detected a TOI squawking 1200 and entering the ADIZ 44 miles northeast of DCA, 
heading south. A squawk of ‘‘1200’’ is a generic Mode 3 transponder code indicating 
an aircraft on a Visual Flight Rules (VFR) flight. Prior to entering the Washington, 
D.C.,  ADIZ,  an  aircraft  in  this  profile  is  required  to  file  a  flight  plan,  contact  air 
traffic  control  (ATC),  in  this  case  the  Potomac  TRACON,  and  squawk  a  discrete  or 
uniquely  identifiable  Mode  3  transponder  code  assigned  by  ATC.  This  aircraft  had 
met none of these requirements. 

Radar  tracking  history  for  the  aircraft  showed  it  had  departed  from  Smoketown 
Airport  in  Smoketown,  Pennsylvania.  The  aircraft  initially  flew  westward  for  about 
20  miles,  on  a  course  just  within  and  paralleling  the  northern  boundary  of  the 
ADIZ.  Due  to  the  nonthreatening  nature  of  this  vector,  neither  the  military  nor 
CBP’s  Office  of  Air  and  Marine  Operations  (AMO)  initiated  an  intercept.  All  agen-
cies  did  maintain  close  monitoring,  tracking  this  aircraft  as  it  operated  on  a  flight 
path just inside the ADIZ. 

This aircraft turned left, assuming a south-southwest heading directly toward the 
FRZ. In response, AMO ordered the launch of its Blackhawk helicopter and Citation 
jet aircraft. This order was communicated to all NCRCC agencies via the DEN and 
on  the  DRSN  conference  call.  The  alert  fighters  at  Andrews  AFB  were  again 
brought to a heightened alert posture and ultimately launched. 

The  FAA  watch  officer  conveyed  information  on  events  as  they  developed  to  all 

NCRCC components via the DEN. 

The  Cessna  entered  the  FRZ  while  still  on  a  southerly  heading  and  maintaining 
a  consistent  speed  of  about  85  knots.  The  AMO  Blackhawk  intercepted  the  Cessna 
and provided a report confirming the identity of the aircraft. The AMO Citation took 
a position 1 mile in trail of the Cessna. 

With the Cessna maintaining a southerly course, the AMO aircraft were directed 
to  depart  the  immediate  area  and  the  F–16s  intercepted  the  Cessna  10  miles  from 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

8

DCA.  Classified  discussions  continued  on  the  DRSN  conference  call  which  included 
representatives from NORAD, the Continental NORAD Region (CONR), the respon-
sible  air  defense  sector  (the  Northeast  Air  Defense  Sector  (NEADS)  in  this  case), 
and various other military command and control elements as well as the TSA Com-
mand  Duty  Officer  (CDO),  TSA  Headquarters  (including  the  Assistant  Secretary), 
the  NCRCC,  the  Homeland  Security  Operations  Center  (HSOC),  the  White  House 
Situation  Room,  and  the  National  Military  Command  Center  (NMCC).  In  the 
NCRCC,  both  the  TSA  and  FAA  watch  officers  contributed  to  the  coordination  of 
effort  via  the  DRSN  conference  and  the  FAA  watch  officer  served  as  the  principal 
speaker on the DEN. 

Signaling measures included the F–16s dispensing flares after attempting contact 
by radio and other visual means. Of note, these actions followed standard operating 
procedure based on the location of the aircraft and its heading. Increase in readiness 
posture of DOD assets did not indicate any order or intent to engage. 

The  AMO  Citation  jet  made  contact  with  the  Cessna  via  radio  on  the  emergency 
frequency  of  121.5  and  ordered  the  aircraft  to  turn  west.  The  Cessna  did  so  and  as 
it  neared  the  western  boundary  of  the  FRZ  the  Blackhawk  closed  and  assumed  the 
escort position. The Cessna exited the FRZ and assumed a northerly heading. Poto-
mac TRACON reported radio communication with the aircraft. Frederick Municipal 
Airport  in  Frederick,  Maryland,  was  selected  as  the  divert  airport.  The  CBP  Na-
tional  Airspace  Security  Operations  Center  and  the  TSA  CDO  coordinated  the  law 
enforcement  response  at  Frederick  Municipal  Airport.  The  Cessna  departed  the 
ADIZ and landed at the airport at 12:39. Both occupants of the aircraft were taken 
into custody by the Maryland State Police. 

This incident has not interfered or adversely affected proceeding with the security 
plan  to  resume  general  aviation  operations  at  DCA.  It  does,  however,  demonstrate 
the  importance  of  maintaining  enhanced  security  measures.  The  volume  of  high 
value, high impact potential targets for terrorists in the Washington, D.C., area de-
mands vigilance against the use of an aircraft as a weapon. 

With  this  in  mind,  I  would  like  to  turn  to  our  plan  to  reinstate  general  aviation 
operations  at  DCA.  The  measures  required  under  the  plan  will  provide  a  level  of 
security equivalent to those in place for commercial operations at DCA. 

TSA has developed a security protocol to be used by general aviation and charter 
flight operators desiring access to DCA. The specific requirements for access to DCA 
are built off of the Private Charter Standard Security Program and the Twelve-Five 
Standard Security Program. TSA anticipates that the requirements will include the 
following:

and of aircraft.

• TSA  inspection  of  crews  and  passengers,  of  property  (accessible  and  checked), 
• Submission  of  passenger  and  crew  manifests  to  TSA  24  hours  in  advance  of 
flight. Passengers will undergo enhanced background check vetting against ter-
rorist watch lists.

cer (LEO) or Federal Air Marshal (FAM) on board the aircraft.

• Fingerprint-based criminal history record checks for flight crews.
• Restricted access to the cockpit with a TSA-trained armed law enforcement offi-
• Coordination with the NCRCC prior to departure.
• Utilization of 12 gateway airports as a last point of departure prior to embark-
ing to DCA. Currently, TSA anticipates the following airports will serve as gate-
ways:  Seattle-Tacoma,  WA;  Boston-Logan,  MA;  Houston-Hobby,  TX;  White 
Plains,  NY;  LaGuardia,  NY;  Chicago  Midway,  IL;  Minneapolis-St.  Paul,  MN; 
West Palm Beach, FL; San Francisco, CA; Teterboro, NJ; Philadelphia, PA; and 
Lexington, KY. TSA may revise or expand this list as necessary or appropriate.
• All  general  aviation  operations  at  DCA  will  be  subject  to  cancellation  at  any 

time.

The current plan envisions that the screening of general aviation flights into and 
out  of  DCA  will  be  conducted  by  TSA  screeners  using  existing  resources.  However, 
it  is  anticipated  that  operators  accessing  DCA  will  be  responsible  for  reimbursing 
TSA’s  costs  associated  with  services,  equipment,  and  supplies,  and  will  be  required 
to  pay  a  fee  for  the  cost  of  conducting  required  background  checks  for  crews  and 
passengers. 

As noted, among the measures is the requirement of an armed security officer on 
board all general aviation aircraft arriving at and departing DCA. This officer’s mis-
sion  will  be  protection  of  the  aircraft  and  flight  crew,  not  enforcement  of  Federal 
criminal  laws.  Active  and  retired  Federal,  State,  and  local  LEOs,  vetted  and  cer-
tified  by  TSA,  will  be  eligible  to  perform  this  function.  TSA  is  also  considering  in-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

9

cluding other highly qualified individuals, such as former police officers and former 
military personnel, in this program. TSA will develop rigorous standards and train-
ing  criteria  for  these  individuals  in  coordination  with  the  Department  of  Justice, 
FBI,  and  the  Federal  Air  Marshal  Service.  We  anticipate  that  a  predictable  core  of 
individuals  qualified  to  serve  corporate  and  charter  operators  with  professionalism 
and discipline will develop and stabilize over the course of time. 

DHS will issue an Interim Final Rule—Ronald Reagan Washington National Air-
port:  Enhanced  Security  Procedures  for  Certain  Operations—to  define  the  security 
procedures for aircraft operators and gateway airport operators as well as the secu-
rity  requirements  pertaining  to  crewmembers,  passengers,  and  security  officers  on 
board general aviation aircraft operating to and from DCA. 

Beyond the planned resumption of general aviation operations at Reagan National 
Airport, a further example of progress on general aviation operations in the broader 
Washington, D.C., metropolitan area is demonstrated by the status of the Maryland 
Three  (MD–3)  airports—College  Park  Airport,  Potomac  Airfield,  and  Washington 
Executive/Hyde  Field.  In  accordance  with  a  TSA  Interim  Final  Rule  (IFR),  codified 
at 49 CFR § 1562, operations at these three general aviation airports, which are lo-
cated  within  the  Washington,  D.C.,  Metropolitan  Area  Flight  Restricted  Zone,  have 
been  permitted  to  continue.  The  IFR,  Maryland  Three  Airports:  Enhanced  Security 
Procedures for Operations at Certain Airports in the Washington, D.C., Metropolitan 
Area Flight Restricted Zone, took effect on February 13, 2005, and transfers respon-
sibility  for  airport  security  requirements  and  procedures  from  the  FAA  (issued 
under Special Federal Aviation Regulation (SFAR) 94) to TSA. It also increases the 
flow  of  general  aviation  commerce  by  granting  access  to  transient  aircraft  oper-
ations, that is, pilots not based at the three airports. Under SFAR 94, transient pi-
lots were not allowed to operate to or from the MD–3 airports. Under the IFR, how-
ever,  transient  pilots  are  allowed  to  access  the  airports  if  they  comply  with  TSA-
mandated security requirements and procedures. 

The IFR has specific security requirements to which the MD–3 airports and pilots 
must adhere. Each airport must appoint an airport employee as the airport security 
coordinator,  who  must  undergo  a  TSA  security  threat  assessment,  including  a  fin-
gerprint-based  criminal  history  records  check.  The  airport  security  coordinators 
must ensure the procedures mandated in the IFR, such as monitoring of aircraft at 
the airports during operational and nonoperational hours, are carried out. To be ap-
proved  to  operate  to  or  from  the  airports,  each  pilot  must  undergo  the  same  TSA 
security threat assessment and a check of his or her FAA record; receive a briefing 
that  describes  procedures  for  operating  to  and  from  the  airport;  secure  the  aircraft 
after  returning  to  the  airport  from  any  flight;  comply  with  any  other  requirements 
for operating to or from the airport specified by TSA; and comply with FAA require-
ments for operating inside the FRZ, including filing a flight plan, transmitting a dis-
crete beacon code, and maintaining 2-way radio communication with air traffic con-
trol.  Pilots  must  also  check  in  with  the  airport  security  coordinator  prior  to  access-
ing their aircraft. This measure assures unauthorized persons do not gain access to 
aircraft parked at the airports. 

TSA  has  requested  public  comment  on  the  IFR  and  will  continue  to  work  with 
stakeholders  to  minimize  the  burdens  imposed  by  the  IFR  without  compromising 
the security of the Washington, D.C., Metropolitan Area. The appropriate forms and 
guidance  materials  can  be  accessed  on  the  TSA  General  Aviation  website.  The  Air-
craft  Owners  and  Pilots  Association  (AOPA)  has  also  posted  the  TSA  forms  on  its 
website. 

Locally  and  nationally,  general  aviation  presents  unique  challenges.  The  aircraft 
are  relatively  inexpensive  and  readily  available.  General  aviation  aircraft  are  very 
diverse,  with  the  majority  being  small  and  having  minimal  payload  capacity.  Pilot-
ing  these  smaller  aircraft  generally  requires  less  skill  and  training  than  larger  air-
craft,  but  the  regular  owner/operator  community  is  very  close  knit  and  is  particu-
larly  diligent  in  self  policing.  Two  well-publicized  incidents  involving  crashes  of 
small  general  aviation  aircraft  into  buildings  in  Milan,  Italy,  and  Tampa,  Florida 
can be used by terrorists as examples of new, demonstrated tactics even though the 
incidents  were  not  terrorist-related.  Indeed,  the  April  2003  arrest  of  terrorist 
Waleed  bin  Attash  uncovered  a  plot  to  crash  a  small  aircraft  laden  with  explosives 
into the United States Consulate in Karachi, Pakistan. The diversity of the threats 
and risks precludes a ‘‘one size fits all’’ program for the broad range of aircraft and 
the  approximately  19,000  general  aviation  facilities  nationwide.  Prevailing  cir-
cumstances, risks, vulnerabilities, threats, and potential consequences all factor into 
the nature of the security approach. 

The  plan  for  DCA  and  the  program  developed  for  the  MD–3  airports  reflect  the 
unique  circumstances  that  apply  to  operations  in  this  area.  Other  locations  present 
different  profiles  and  available  resources  vary.  Thus,  differing  approaches  will  be 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

10

the norm. TSA focuses on several particular areas to provide a broad and solid foun-
dation for the security of general aviation.

• Airport  Watch  Program—TSA,  in  partnership  with  the  general  aviation 
stakeholder  associations,  implemented  a  General  Aviation  Hotline  that  is  the 
linchpin  of  the  highly  regarded  Aircraft  Owners  and  Pilots  Association  Airport 
Watch  Program.  We  endorse  the  Airport  Watch  Program  and  aviation  security 
inspectors encourage its use to all airport managers visited in the course of the 
ongoing  general  aviation  outreach  program.  The  hotline  provides  a  mechanism 
to enable any pilot or airport employee to report suspicious activity to one cen-
tral  Federal  Government  focal  point.  It  is  also  cited  as  a  reporting  method  in 
the Flight School Security Awareness Training Program.
• Alien Flight Training—Section  113  of  the  Aviation  and  Transportation  Secu-
rity  Act,  Pub.  L.  107–71  (November  19,  2001),  mandates  that  any  non-Federal 
U.S.  provider  of  flight  instruction  seeking  to  train  an  alien  in  the  operation  of 
an  aircraft  weighing  more  than  12,500  pounds  must  first  ensure  their  can-
didates  are  cleared  by  the  Attorney  General.  The  Department  of  Justice  imple-
mented  this  requirement  with  the  Flight  Training  Candidate  Checks  Program. 
The Vision 100—Century of Aviation Reauthorization Act (Vision 100 Act), Pub. 
L. 108–176 (December 12, 2003), transferred oversight of this program from the 
Department  of  Justice  to  TSA.  The  TSA  IFR,  codified  at  49  CFR  § 1552,  was 
issued on September 20, 2004, and its requirements became effective in October 
2004  for  most  alien  flight  training  candidates  and  flight  schools.  A  60-day  ex-
emption  applied  for  aliens  who  already  held  a  pilot’s  certificate,  the  require-
ments  becoming  effective  on  December  19,  2004  for  this  group.  In  addition, 
flight  schools  are  required  to  provide  employees  with  security  awareness  train-
ing.  TSA  has  developed  a  training  module  that  flight  schools  can  use  to  meet 
this  requirement.  Of  note,  the  IFR  has  been  refined  and  clarified  through  con-
sultation with stakeholders.
• Charter  Operations—For  public  charter  operations  in  aircraft  with  61  or 
more  passenger  seats,  TSA  has  always  required  security  measures,  including 
screening of passengers and property. TSA currently regulates a large segment 
of the charter operations in smaller aircraft, as well as scheduled operations in 
smaller aircraft, through the Twelve Five Standard Security Program. TSA reg-
ulates the larger private charter operations through the Private Charter Stand-
ard Security Program. The Twelve Five Program covers scheduled, public char-
ter  and  private  charter  operations,  passenger  or  cargo,  using  aircraft  with  a 
maximum certificated take-off weight of more than 12,500 pounds while the Pri-
vate  Charter  Standard  Security  Program  covers  private  charter  operations 
using  aircraft  with  a  maximum  certificated  take-off  weight  of  45,500  kg 
(100,309  lbs).  These  programs  include  requirements  for  vetting  of  flight  crew, 
designation  of  a  security  coordinator,  and  checks  against  terrorist  watch  lists. 
Like  the  Twelve  Five  Program,  the  Private  Charter  Program  also  requires 
screening of passengers and their carry-on baggage. TSA has established an in-
spection  regime  to  ensure  the  effectiveness  of  the  programs.  Additionally,  TSA 
is  on  track  to  meet  the  requirement  in  section  4012  of  the  Intelligence  Reform 
and  Terrorism  Prevention  Act  of  2004,  Pub.  L.  108–458  (December  17,  2004), 
to  allow  operators  of  aircraft  with  a  maximum  certificated  take-off  weight  of 
more  than  12,500  pounds  to  request  vetting  of  individuals  seeking  to  charter 
or rent an aircraft against the watch lists.
• Corporate  Operations—In  early  2003,  TSA  launched  a  pilot  project  in  co-
operation with the National Business Aviation Association (NBAA) at Teterboro 
Airport and Morristown Municipal Airport in New Jersey and White Plains Air-
port  in  New  York.  The  initiative  was  conducted  as  a  ‘‘proof-of-concept’’  to  vali-
date  an  NBAA-proposed  security  program  developed  for  operators  of  business 
aviation  aircraft.  TSA  is  currently  considering  a  national  roll-out  of  the  pro-
gram.
• Temporary Flight Restrictions (TFR)—TSA evaluates requests for security-
related  TFRs  based  on  several  criteria,  including  specific  and  credible  threat 
and intelligence information, number of people in attendance, and number of air 
and  ground-based  defense  assets.  TFRs  are  employed  to  mitigate  the  threat  of 
an airborne attack against key assets and critical infrastructure on the ground. 
TFRs  largely  impact  the  general  aviation  community  by  prohibiting  flight  in 
areas  of  concern.  In  response  to  the  Congressional  mandate  in  the  Vision  100 
Act, the FAA issued a Notice to Airmen that permanently establishes TFRs over 
four  types  of  sporting  events:  major  league  baseball  games,  National  Football 
League  games,  major  motor  speedway  events,  and  NCAA  Division  I  football 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

11

games  occurring  in  stadiums  with  a  seating  capacity  of  30,000  or  more.  TSA 
processes  requests  from  general  aviation  operators  for  waivers  to  these  TFRs, 
in  accordance  with  the  criteria  specified  in  the  Vision  100  Act,  and  works  with 
the FAA to issue these waivers.
• General Aviation Airports—On May 17, 2004, TSA published an Information 
Publication  (IP)  entitled,  ‘‘Security  Guidelines  for  General  Aviation  Airports.’’ 
The purpose of the IP is to provide owners, operators, sponsors, and other enti-
ties  charged  with  oversight  of  general  aviation  airports  a  set  of  Federally  en-
dorsed  security  enhancements  and  a  method  for  determining  when  and  where 
these enhancements may be appropriate. Aviation security inspectors are incor-
porating the IP into the TSA outreach program to the general aviation commu-
nity.
• Vulnerability  Assessments—TSA  is  preparing  to  launch  a  general  aviation 
vulnerability self-assessment tool that will facilitate the examination of airports 
and assessment of vulnerabilities. The tool focuses on the characteristics of the 
facility  and  inventories  its  countermeasures.  Initially,  the  tool  will  be  used  to 
assess the approximately 5,600 public use general aviation facilities.
• National Special Security Events (NSSE)—TSA has established an internal 
organization that deals specifically with NSSE events. This group is responsible 
for  coordinating  with  other  agencies  responsible  for  security  of  the  event  and 
overseeing  TSA’s  role  in  establishing  transportation-related  security  controls, 
including  conducting  vulnerability  assessments  at  local  general  aviation  air-
ports  and  security  outreach  programs  to  educate  general  aviation  pilots  on  up-
coming restrictions.

These  initiatives  demonstrate  TSA’s  commitment  to  working  with  the  general 
aviation  community  and  interested  government  agencies  to  ensure  that  the  level  of 
security  is  appropriate  to  the  threat.  We  are  acutely  aware  that  as  vulnerabilities 
within  commercial  aviation  are  reduced,  general  aviation  may  be  perceived  as  a 
more  attractive  target  and  consequently  more  vulnerable  to  misuse  by  terrorists. 
The  diverse  range  of  general  aviation  operations  and  airport  facilities  may  provide 
a tempting target for terrorist exploitation. TSA continues to work with key general 
aviation  associations  to  encourage  their  members  to  avoid  complacency  and  to  re-
main  vigilant  during  every  operation.  We  are  committed  to  making  decisions  based 
on threat analysis and risk management, balanced with common sense. 

Thank you for this opportunity to address the Committee on these matters of im-
portance  to  security  and  economic  vitality  both  in  the  Washington,  D.C.,  area  and 
nationally.

The CHAIRMAN. First let us go to Mr. Michael Cirillo, Vice Presi-
dent for System Operations Services of the Air Traffic Organization 
for the Federal Aviation Administration. Good morning, sir. 
STATEMENT  OF  MICHAEL  A.  CIRILLO,  VICE  PRESIDENT,
TRAFFIC

SYSTEM 
ORGANIZATION, FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION 
Mr.  CIRILLO.  Thank  you  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator  Inouye  and 
Members of the Committee. I’m pleased to appear before you today 
along  with  my  colleague  from  TSA,  to  discuss  the  FAA’s  respon-
sibilities in matters involving general aviation security. 

OPERATIONS 

SERVICES 

AIR 

The CHAIRMAN. Pull that mike up toward you. 
Mr.  CIRILLO.  I’m  sorry.  I  am  pleased  to  appear  before  you  today 
to  discuss  the  FAA’s  responsibility  in  matters  involving  general 
aviation security particularly and in and around the Nation’s Cap-
ital. 

As  you  know  since  September  11th  security  in  and  around  the 
Nation’s Capital has changed significantly. With respect to aviation 
a  number  of  restrictions  and  procedures  have  been  put  in  place, 
that were designed to protect the significant assets in this area. 

For obvious reasons when aircraft approach the National Capital 
Region  we  want  to  know  who  they  are,  and  where  they’re  going. 
There are two airspace zones established around the National Cap-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

12

ital Region. There’s the 2,000 square mile area surrounding Wash-
ington’s three major airports, known as the Air Defense Identifica-
tion  Zone  or  a  ADIZ.  Within  the  ADIZ  and  extending  approxi-
mately  15  miles  around  the  U.S.  Capitol  is  a  flight  restricted  zone 
or  FRZ.  Aircraft  operating  in  these  zones  must  comply  with  oper-
ational  and  procedural  restrictions.  When  they  don’t,  there’s  a  co-
ordinated interagency response. 

The  incident  that  occurred  on  May  11,  2005  can  serve  as  a  good 
example  of  how  FAA  interacts  with  other  agencies,  when  an  un-
identified aircraft approaches Washington D.C. 

At 11:28 a.m. FAA and the National Capital Region Coordination 
Center  became  aware  of  an  aircraft  entering  the  ADIZ  from  the 
northeast. The FAA’s Watch Officer for key communications, work-
ing  with  the  Domestic  Events  Network,  or  DEN,  contacted  the  Po-
tomac TRACON which confirmed to participating NCRCC agencies 
that the aircraft was not in communication with air traffic control, 
had  not  filed  a  flight  plan  and  that  its  transponder  was  not  trans-
mitting  a  unique  code.  All  requirements  for  operating  within  the 
ADIZ.  The  aircraft  was  not  considered  a  threat  until  it  turned 
southbound  toward  the  FRZ,  the  second  restricted  zone  sur-
rounding the Capitol. 

This  information  was  communicated  on  the  DEN  to  the  partici-
pating  NCRCC  agencies.  At  this  point  the  Customs  and  Border 
Protection Office of Marine Operations or AMO, ordered the launch 
of its Blackhawk helicopter and Citation jet aircraft from DCA. 

In  addition  two  F–16  aircraft  were  scrambled  from  Andrews  Air 
Force  Base.  The  AMO  Blackhawk  initially  intercepted  the  aircraft 
about 10 miles north of the Capitol. The aircraft was visually iden-
tified  as  a  high  winged  single  engine  Cessna  type  aircraft.  At-
tempts  by  the  Blackhawk  helicopter  to  signal  to  the  pilots  of  the 
Cessna  and  get  them  to  communicate  on  an  emergency  frequency 
were initially unsuccessful. 

The  Department  of  Defense  authorized  the  F–16  pilots  to  use 
flares  and  they  were  dispensed  when  the  aircraft  was  6.7  miles 
from  DCA.  The  Blackhawk  continued  to  signal  to  get  the  pilots  to 
communicate. Ultimately the Cessna pilots were able to make con-
tact  with  the  AMO  Citation  on  an  emergency  frequency.  The 
Cessna  turned  west  and  proceeded  through  the  prohibited  space 
over the Naval Observatory with the F–16s in escort. 

The Potomac TRACON reported on the DEN that the pilots were 
in  communication  with  air  traffic  controllers  at  12:22  p.m.  The  pi-
lots  reported  to  the  controllers  that  they  had  been  instructed  to 
proceed  to  the  airport  in  Frederick  Maryland.  Escorted  by  the 
Blackhawk,  and  the  F–16s,  the  aircraft  landed  in  Frederick  at 
12:39  p.m.  Upon  landing  the  occupants  of  the  aircraft  were  taken 
into  custody  by  the  FBI,  Secret  Service,  and  Maryland  State  au-
thorities for questioning. 

After  Federal  and  state  authorities  questioned  the  occupants  of 
the aircraft, they determined that there was no criminal intent in-
volved in their actions, and they were released. 

One of the individuals Hayden L. Shaffer, held an FAA pilot’s li-
cense,  the  other  individual,  Troy  Donovan  Martin  holds  a  student 
pilot  certificate.  Although  Mr.  Martin  was  manipulating  the  con-
trols  of  the  aircraft  during  the  entire  incident  in  question,  Mr. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

13

Shaffer  by  virtue  of  being  the  only  fully  certificated  airman  in  the 
aircraft was pilot in command of the flight. 

His  inability  to  navigate  adequately,  his  lack  of  knowledge  of 
how to respond to an intercept, his failure to communicate with air 
traffic  control  despite  being  lost  in  controlled  and  restricted  air-
space, have left FAA to conclude that he lacks the qualification re-
quired  to  hold  an  airman  pilot  certificate.  There  for  on  May  20th, 
2005 FAA issued an emergency order revoking Mr. Shaffer’s pilot’s 
license. 

Mr.  Shaffer  appealed  both  the  merits  of  the  revocation  and  the 
emergency  nature  of  the  action  to  the  National  Transportation 
Safety  Board,  On  June  3,  2005  an  NTSB  Administrative  Law 
Judge sustained the emergency nature of FAA’s revocation and set 
a  hearing  date  of  June  15,  and  16  to  adjudicate  the  merits  of  the 
revocation. 

While  Mr.  Shaffer’s  case  received  an  extraordinary  amount  of 
media  attention,  due  to  how  far  into  the  ADIZ  and  FRZ  he  pene-
trated  and  the  resulting  evacuations,  ADIZ  violations  are  fairly 
common around the D.C. area. Most are inadvertent and the pilots 
do not travel very far into the restricted area. 

The  FAA  has  taken  enforcement  action  against  approximately 
600 pilots for violations of the ADIZ since the beginning of calendar 
year 2003. The other major security issue concerning general avia-
tion  in  this  area,  is  the  continued  restriction  in  place  that  effec-
tively  prevents  general  aviation  aircraft  from  using  Reagan  Na-
tional Airport. 

This  restriction  has  been  in  place  since  September  11,  2001.  I 
know  this  Committee  has  long  supported  reopening  National  Air-
port  to  general  aviation,  and  I  am  pleased  to  say  that  on  May  25, 
2005,  the  Administration  under  the  leadership  of  the  Department 
of  Homeland  Security,  and  TSA  announced  a  plan  to  do  just  that. 
As  the  agency  that  has  control  over  the  airspace,  FAA’s  role  in 
implementing this is critical but limited. The FAA’s representatives 
at the NCRCC and the DEN will develop procedures to timely dis-
seminate and validate information on all approved aircraft and op-
erators. FAA will also be responsible for issuing advisory circulars, 
and  notices  to  airmen,  to  pilots,  that  include  all  new  procedures 
put in place. 

Obviously,  reintroducing  general  aviation  to  DCA  will  be  mon-
itored  closely  by  all  interested  agencies  and  adjustments  to  the 
plan will be made as necessary. 

In conclusion, I’d like to say that although the May 11th incident 
was disturbing and resulted in the evacuation of thousands of peo-
ple, causing alarm and uncertainty for a period of time, from FAA’s 
standpoint the system worked as it was designed to. 

NCRCC  member  agencies,  coordinated  their  decisions  based  on 
accurate  information  that  was  shared  in  real  time.  While  it  is  al-
ways  appropriate  after  an  event  such  as  this  to  review  whether, 
and  to  what  extent  the  government’s  responses  were  proper.  From 
the  coordination  and  communication  standpoint  the  FAA  believes 
the system worked. This concludes my statement and I’ll be happy 
to answer your questions at this time. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Cirillo follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

14

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL A.  CIRILLO,  VICE PRESIDENT,  SYSTEM
SERVICES AIR TRAFFIC ORGANIZATION,  FEDERAL AVIATION

OPERATIONS
ADMINISTRATION 
Chairman  Stevens,  Senator  Inouye,  Members  of  the  Committee:  I  am  pleased  to 
appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration’s  (FAA)  re-
sponsibility  in  matters  involving  general  aviation  security,  particularly  in  and 
around  the  Nation’s  Capital.  This  includes  the  role  FAA  played  with  respect  to  the 
incident that occurred on May 11, 2005, which led to the evacuation of the U.S. Cap-
itol, the White House and the Supreme Court. I will also discuss how FAA will help 
implement  the  Administration’s  recent  decision  to  reopen  Ronald  Reagan  Wash-
ington National Airport (DCA) to general aviation on a limited basis. It’s a pleasure 
to  be  here  with  my  colleague  from  the  Transportation  Security  Administration 
(TSA). 

As you know, since September 11, security in and around our Nation’s Capital has 
changed  significantly.  With  respect  to  aviation,  a  number  of  restrictions  and  proce-
dures  have  been  put  in  place  that  were  designed  to  protect  the  significant  assets 
in  this  area.  At  the  outset,  I  would  note  that  the  restrictions  and  requirements  for 
operating aircraft in this area are unique. Ordinarily, a general aviation aircraft op-
erating  at  low  altitudes  and  under  visual  flight  rules  (VFR)  could  operate  legally 
within  the  National  Airspace  System  without  filing  a  flight  plan  or  communicating 
with air traffic control. Flights occur all the time around the country without direct 
FAA  control  or  contact.  For  obvious  reasons,  however,  that  is  not  the  case  in  this 
area. When aircraft approach the national capital region, we want to know who they 
are and where they are going. 

There  are  two  airspace  zones  established  around  the  national  capital  region. 
There  is  a  2,000  square  mile  area  surrounding  Washington’s  three  major  airports 
known as the Air Defense Identification Zone (ADIZ). How flights are handled head-
ing  toward  or  entering  the  ADIZ  varies  depending  on  the  existing  threat  level,  but 
generally aircraft operating in the zone are required to file a flight plan, be in con-
tinuous  communication  with  air  traffic  control,  and  have  a  functioning  transponder 
that transmits a discrete or uniquely identifiable code. Within the ADIZ and extend-
ing  approximately  15  miles  around  the  U.S.  Capitol  is  the  Flight  Restricted  Zone 
(FRZ).  Additional  operating  requirements  apply  to  general  aviation  aircraft  oper-
ating within the FRZ, including applying for and receiving a TSA and FAA waiver. 
Unidentified  aircraft  operating  in  restricted  airspace  are  taken  very  seriously. 
FAA  is  a  member  of  the  National  Capital  Region  Coordination  Center  (NCRCC),  a 
group comprised of representatives of security and military agencies to ensure that, 
in  the  event  of  a  threat  from  an  unidentified  aircraft,  coordinated  action  can  be 
taken to appropriately address the threat and keep the region safe. 

An  analysis  of  what  happened  on  May  11,  2005,  will  serve  as  a  good  example  of 
how  FAA  interacts  with  other  agencies  when  an  unidentified  aircraft  approaches 
Washington, D.C. At 11:28 a.m., FAA and the NCRCC became aware of an aircraft 
entering  the  ADIZ  from  the  northeast,  approximately  44  miles  from  DCA.  The 
FAA’s watch officer for key communications working with the Domestic Events Net-
work (DEN), contacted the Potomac Consolidated Terminal Radar Approach Control 
(Potomac TRACON), which confirmed to participating NCRCC agencies that the air-
craft  was  not  in  communication  with  air  traffic  control,  had  not  filed  a  flight  plan 
and that its transponder was transmitting a generic, rather than a unique code. At 
this  point,  the  aircraft  was  considered  to  be  a  track  of  interest  (TOI).  Because  the 
aircraft  was  flying  just  within  and  parallel  to  the  northern  boundary  of  the  ADIZ, 
it  was  not  considered  an  immediate  threat  and,  while  it  was  monitored  closely,  no 
intercept action was taken at this point. 

The  aircraft  subsequently  turned  southbound  toward  the  FRZ,  the  second  re-
stricted  zone  surrounding  the  Capitol.  This  information  was  communicated  on  the 
DEN  to  the  participating  NCRCC  agencies.  At  this  point,  the  Customs  and  Border 
Protection  Office  of  Marine  Operations  (AMO)  ordered  the  launch  of  its  Blackhawk 
helicopter  and  Citation  jet  aircraft  from  DCA.  In  addition,  two  F–16  aircraft  were 
scrambled from Andrews Air Force Base. The AMO Blackhawk initially intercepted 
the aircraft about 10 miles north of the Capitol. When the aircraft continued to pro-
ceed  south  toward  the  Capitol,  the  F–16s  moved  in  to  intercept.  The  aircraft  was 
visually identified as a high-winged, single-engine Cessna-type aircraft. 

Attempts  by  the  Blackhawk  helicopter  to  signal  to  the  pilots  of  the  Cessna  and 
get them to communicate on an emergency frequency were initially unsuccessful. At 
noon, the Department of Defense authorized the F–16 pilots to use flares. The flares 
were dispensed when the aircraft was 6.7 miles from DCA. At this time, the Secret 
Service and the U.S. Capitol Police made the decision to evacuate the White House 
and the Capitol, respectively. The Blackhawk continued to signal to the pilots to get 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

15

them  to  communicate  with  them.  Ultimately,  the  Cessna  pilots  were  able  to  make 
contact  with  the  AMO  Citation  on  an  emergency  frequency  and  the  Cessna  turned 
west. The Cessna proceeded through the prohibited airspace over the Naval Observ-
atory with the F–16s in escort. As the aircraft exited the FRZ, the Blackhawk joined 
the escort north. 

The  Potomac  TRACON  reported  on  the  DEN  that  the  pilots  were  in  communica-
tion  with  air  traffic  controllers  at  12:22  p.m.  The  pilots  reported  to  the  controllers 
that they had been instructed to proceed to the airport in Frederick, Maryland. Es-
corted by the Blackhawk and the F–16s, the aircraft exited the ADIZ at 12:25 p.m. 
and landed in Frederick at 12:39 p.m. During the flight, Potomac TRACON control-
lers communicated with the pilots several times to tell them how far they were from 
the airport and to warn them to look for other VFR traffic. There was little commu-
nication back from the pilots of the light aircraft to the controllers during the flight. 
The  Secret  Service  sounded  the  all  clear  at  the  White  House  at  12:14  p.m.  and 
the  U.S.  Capitol  Police  sounded  the  all  clear  at  12:40  p.m.  Upon  landing,  the  occu-
pants of the aircraft were taken into custody by the FBI, Secret Service, and Mary-
land State Authorities for questioning. 

In  this  instance,  we  consider  the  interaction  of  the  agencies  to  have  worked  as 
intended.  The  communication  and  interface  that  took  place  during  this  incident 
were  an  improvement  over  the  interagency  communication  that  took  place  during 
the  incident  last  June  involving  the  Governor  of  Kentucky’s  plane  which,  on  ap-
proach to DCA, was known to FAA controllers, but appeared as an unidentified air-
craft  to  the  other  members  of  the  NCRCC.  By  contrast,  on  May  11th,  the  decision 
to  evacuate  the  Capitol  and  the  White  House  was  made  by  the  U.S.  Capitol  Police 
and the Secret Service based on the accurate information that an unknown aircraft 
operator  had  penetrated  the  ADIZ  and  the  FRZ,  was  heading  toward  the  Capitol, 
and was not immediately responding to the intercept. Once the aircraft changed di-
rection  away  from  the  areas  of  concern,  an  all  clear  was  announced.  All  agencies 
in the NCRCC learned from the June 2004 event and, as a result, today, both FAA 
controllers  and  NCRCC  members  are  seeing  and  acting  on  the  same  information. 
After  Federal  and  state  authorities  questioned  the  occupants  of  the  aircraft,  they 
determined  that  there  was  no  criminal  intent  involved  in  their  actions  and  they 
were  released.  One  of  the  individuals,  Hayden  L.  Sheaffer,  held  an  FAA  pilot’s  li-
cense.  The  other  individual,  Troy  Donovan  Martin,  holds  a  student  pilot  certificate. 
Although Mr. Martin was manipulating the controls of the aircraft during the entire 
incident  in  question,  Mr.  Sheaffer,  by  virtue  of  being  the  only  fully  certificated  air-
man  in  the  aircraft,  was  pilot-in-command  of  the  flight.  As  such,  he  failed  to  navi-
gate  properly  and  to  check  adequately  for,  and  adhere  to,  airspace  restrictions  dur-
ing the flight. This resulted in the aircraft penetrating the Class B airspace around 
BWI  Airport,  the  restricted  airspace  around  the  national  capital  region  (both  the 
ADIZ and the FRZ), and the prohibited airspace over the Naval Observatory without 
authorization  and  in  violation  of  FAA  regulations  and  procedures.  His  inability  to 
navigate  adequately,  his  lack  of  knowledge  of  how  to  respond  to  an  intercept,  his 
failure  to  communicate  with  air  traffic  control  despite  being  lost  in  controlled  and 
restricted  airspace,  have  led  FAA  to  conclude  that  he  lacks  the  qualification  re-
quired to hold an airman pilot’s certificate. Therefore, on May 20, 2005, FAA issued 
an  emergency  order  revoking  Mr.  Sheaffer’s  pilot’s  license.  The  emergency  nature 
of  the  order  means  that  the  revocation  is  effective  immediately.  Mr.  Sheaffer  ap-
pealed  both  the  merits  of  the  revocation  and  the  emergency  nature  of  the  action  to 
the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  (NTSB).  On  June  3,  2005,  an  NTSB  ad-
ministrative  law  judge  (ALJ)  sustained  the  emergency  nature  of  FAA’s  revocation 
and  set  a  hearing  date  of  June  15  and  16  to  adjudicate  the  merits  of  the  action. 
The  ALJ’s  ruling  could  be  appealed  to  the  members  of  the  NTSB.  A  final  NTSB 
decision  is  appealable  to  the  U.S.  Courts  of  Appeal.  Because  Mr.  Sheaffer’s  case  is 
ongoing,  I  am  limited  in  what  I  can  discuss  with  respect  to  our  investigation  and 
subsequent enforcement action. 

While  Mr.  Sheaffer’s  case  received  an  extraordinary  amount  of  media  attention 
due to how far into the ADIZ and FRZ he penetrated and the resulting evacuations, 
ADIZ violations are fairly common around the D.C. area. Most are inadvertent and 
the pilots do not travel very far into the restricted area. Although not all pilot devi-
ations  have  resulted  in  enforcement  action,  the  FAA  has  taken  enforcement  action 
against  approximately  600  pilots  for  violations  of  the  ADIZ  since  the  beginning  of 
calendar  year  2003.  Our  sanction  guidance  recommends  a  30  to  90  day  suspension 
of a pilot’s license for a typical ADIZ violation. However, that guidance does not pre-
clude  imposing  a  more  severe  sanction  should  the  circumstances  warrant.  In  one 
case, a revocation was sustained due to the intentional nature of the violation. The 
case  against  Mr.  Sheaffer  is  not  just  an  ADIZ  case.  It  involves  his  basic  qualifica-
tions to hold an airman pilot certificate. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

16

The other major security issue concerning general aviation in this area is the con-
tinued  restriction  in  place  that  effectively  prevents  general  aviation  aircraft  from 
using  Reagan  National  Airport.  This  restriction  has  been  in  place  since  September 
11,  2001.  I  know  that  this  Committee  has  long  supported  reopening  National  Air-
port to general aviation and I am pleased to say that on May 25, 2005, the Adminis-
tration,  under  the  leadership  of  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  and 
TSA announced a plan to do just that. As the agency that has control over the air-
space, FAA’s role in implementing this plan is critical, but limited. 

FAA will work with TSA and other stakeholders to solidify all procedures and re-
quirements necessary to implement the Administration’s plan. The FAA’s represent-
atives  at  the  NCRCC  and  the  DEN  will  develop  procedures  to  timely  disseminate 
and validate information on all approved aircraft and operators. We are working on 
a  Web  based  program  to  streamline  this  process.  FAA  will  also  be  responsible  for 
issuing  advisory  circulars  and  notices  to  airmen  and  to  pilots  that  include  all  new 
procedures  put  in  place.  At  this  time,  we  do  not  anticipate  that  approved  general 
aviation  aircraft  will  be  required  to  install  special  equipment  beyond  what  would 
already be required. Obviously, reintroducing general aviation to DCA will be mon-
itored  closely  by  all  interested  agencies  and  adjustments  to  the  plan  may  be  made 
as necessary. We see the announcement of this plan as a significant benefit for gen-
eral aviation in the D.C. area. 

In  conclusion,  I  would  like  to  say  that,  although  the  May  11  incident  was  dis-
turbing  and  resulted  in  an  evacuation  of  thousands  of  people,  causing  alarm  and 
uncertainty  for  a  period  of  time,  the  system  worked  as  it  was  designed  to.  NCRCC 
member  agencies  coordinated  their  decisions  based  on  accurate  information  that 
was  shared  in  real  time.  While  it  is  always  appropriate  after  an  event  such  as  this 
to review whether and to what extent the government’s responses were proper, from 
a coordination and communication standpoint, the FAA believes the system worked. 
This  concludes  my  statement.  I  will  be  happy  to  answer  your  questions  at  this 

time.

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. First, let me apologize on 
behalf  of  myself  and  the  Co-Chairman  for  starting  this  hearing 
late.  We  were  with  the  Chinese  members  of  the  U.S.-China  Par-
liamentary  Conference,  and  they  did  not  depart  from  that  meeting 
until  just  before  10:30,  so  we’re  sorry  to  get  started  late,  but  I 
again apologize. 

Now  I  am  a  pilot  of  sorts.  I  was  interested  in  the  fact  that  this 
plane  that  we  were  talking  about  on  May  11,  was  really  a  fairly 
slow  moving  plane.  And  I  agree,  as  I’ve  indicated  before,  that  the 
system  worked.  But  would  it  have  worked  if  that  had  been  a  high 
speed jet? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  Yes,  sir  I  believe  it  would  have.  Different  proce-
dures are taken into consideration. A slow moving aircraft squawk-
ing 1200 around the boundary of the ADIZ is a fairly normal occur-
rence.  A  fast  moving  aircraft  inbound  to  the  ADIZ,  not  identified, 
not talking, and not squawking would be highly unusual and would 
raise suspicion much earlier, 60 miles to 100 miles out. 

The CHAIRMAN. We had the situation with the Kentucky airplane 
that  did  just  that.  And  it  was  almost  through  the  airspace  wasn’t 
it, before it was intercepted? 

Mr. CIRILLO. In the case of May 11, we identified the aircraft, we 
followed  correct  procedures.  In  the  case  of  the  Governor  of  Ken-
tucky, correct procedures were not followed. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Tell  me  how  FAA  has  changed  those  procedures 

so it won’t happen again. 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  We’ve  have  done  a  number  of  things,  we  have  pro-
vided equipment to the people in the NCRCC so that they have the 
same  picture  as  the  people  in  the  air  traffic  control  facilities.  We 
have done training, so that the identification of an aircraft without 
a transponder, even if it contains a data block is clearly identified, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

17

and  also  we  have  clarified  coordination  responsibilities  relative  to 
that incident. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  How  far  out  of  the  zone  would  you  intercept  a 

high speed jet that was not squawking at all? 

Mr. FLEMING. That would completely depend on the situation sir. 
Certainly  a  number  of  individuals  whether  it’s  DOD  or  FAA  and 
CBPAMO  are  watching  that  air  traffic  within  a  100  mile  radius, 
150 mile radius. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  he  came  in  from  Kentucky  and  he  wasn’t 
squawking  at  all  anytime.  What’s  our  procedure  for  intercepting 
such a plane? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  Actually  its  transponder,  sir,  was  malfunctioning 
so it did squawk, just enough to pass the identity to FAA’s system. 
And  so  it  was  an  intermittent  transponder,  it  was  working,  and 
was  recognized,  was  captured  by  the  FAA  system.  Since  then  we 
have  been  able  to  correlate  two  systems  that  were  not  in  one  loca-
tion.  And  very  soon  after  the  Governor  Fletcher  incident,  that  sys-
tem  was  installed  at  the  TSOC  which  would  eliminate  the  possi-
bility of that sort of failure happening again. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  All  right.  One  last  question  Mr.  Fleming.  Your 
proposal  for  the  reopening  of  the  Ronald  Reagan  Washington  Air-
port as I understand it, says that a general aviation aircraft would 
have to have onboard an armed law enforcement person. Now some 
of those aircraft are not very large. The proposal requires that the 
aircraft, its crew and passengers and baggage must be screened at 
the airport from which it departed. 

Why  do  you  need  an  armed  law  enforcement  officer  on  a  small 

plane if you have had those four procedures complied with? 

Mr. FLEMING. Yes sir. In an effort to ensure that the security lev-
els  afforded  to  GA  are  commensurate  with  those  commercial  air-
craft.  Many  of  these  smaller  GA  aircraft,  or  corporate  jets  do  not 
have the ability to have a hardened cockpit door, meaning that de-
spite  the  fact  that  we’ve  done  background  checks  on  the  individ-
uals,  there’s  no  physical  barrier  in  many  aspects  between  the  pas-
sengers and the actual pilot. That’s why we recommended that law 
enforcement  personnel  be  onboard  to  ensure  that  there  is  a  phys-
ical barrier between the cockpit and passengers. 

The CHAIRMAN. We all fly from time to time on general aviation. 
Where  are  you  going  to  find  a  supply  of  law  enforcement  officers 
to  fly  in  from  these  airports,  that  general  aviation  enter?  They 
have  to  land  somewhere  on  the  circle  outside  of  the  Capitol  don’t 
they? 

Mr. FLEMING. Yes sir, there’s 12——
The  CHAIRMAN.  Isn’t  that  an  extreme  procedure,  without  regard 
where they came from? I mean if I come in from Seattle I am going 
to land at an airport before I land at Reagan, right? 

Mr. FLEMING. That’s correct, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  And  I’m  going  to  go  through  a  second  screening 
procedure,  I’ve  gone  through  one  in  Seattle,  but  I’m  going  through 
another one now? I’m the pilot of a small general aviation jet, and 
I’ve  got  7–8  passengers.  I’m  going  to  have  to  take  one  of  them  off 
to bring in a law enforcement person, is that right? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  If  you  were  to  do  that  sir,  when  you  submitted 
your  plan  to  fly  into  DCA  there  would  typically  be  no  screening  at 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

18

the  Seattle  end  of  things.  Your  screening  would  occur  at  the  gate-
way airport. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well  I  have  news  for  you,  almost  everyone  of 
general  aviation  fixed  space  operators,  you  go  through  screening 
now.  I  haven’t  left  any  one  of  them  recently  that  we  haven’t  gone 
through  screening.  They  are  aware  that  there’s  a  new  standard 
through general aviation. But what I’m saying to you, it looks like 
to  me  you  are  going  to  take  a  passenger  off  those  general  aviation 
planes to put on a law enforcement person. Now how do I get one, 
if I am coming out of Seattle. 

Mr.  FLEMING.  We’re  working  on  a  plan  now  sir,  that  we  think 
will  provide  access  to  a  lot—various  law  enforcement  officials,  as 
well  as  security  officials  working  very  closely  within  the  Depart-
ment to coordinate the training requirements for individuals, so we 
can have a fairly large community of people to draw from to fulfill 
that job. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well  I  hope  you  take  a  good  look  at  what  you’re 
doing.  Because  being  on  those  planes  is  not  cheap  to  start  with.  If 
I have to pick up a law enforcement officer somewhere say in Ken-
tucky  or  Ohio  and  bring  him  in  here  then  I  am  going  to  have  to 
send  him  back.  And  the  persons  chartering  those  planes  are  soon 
going to be deterred from chartering a general aviation plane. 

I  think  that  burden  is  too  great  to  put  a  law  enforcement  offi-
cer—I’d  rather  see  you  hire  ten  people  and  put  them  at  that  fixed 
base  operator  and  make  them  search  the  plane  and  allow  them  to 
get  onboard  whatever  you  want.  But  the  concept  of  putting  a  law 
enforcement  officer  on  and  then  having  the  duty  to  get  him  back 
where  he  came  from.  I  think  that’s  a  burden  that’s  just  going  to 
kill  general  aviation  in  terms  of  private  charters  that  want  to  ter-
minate here in Washington. 

As  a  matter  of  fact,  I  think  there  would  be  no  question  they 
won’t  terminate  there.  They’ll  take  us  to  Philadelphia,  or  take  us 
to  New  York,  they’ll  take  us  to  somewhere  in  Virginia  and  let  us 
off,  they  are  not  going  to  go  through  this.  And  you’re  killing  the 
very  thing  we  want  to  do  and  that’s  sinuate  rapid  access  for  those 
people coming in and going out the same day. Senator Inouye. Oh, 
I had one other question, pardon me if I may. And that was to Mr. 
Cirillo.  I  have  some  question  about  the  delay  in  giving  the  ‘‘all 
clear.’’  And  until  you  give  the  ‘‘all  clear’’  we  all  stand  out  in  the 
street.  That  was  a  considerable  delay  on  May  11.  What  have  we 
done to change that so that the ‘‘all clear’’ will be put into the sys-
tem and it’s really not a crisis, the government can go back to work 
in Washington D.C.? 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  Actually  sir,  the  FAA  provides  all  available  infor-
mation  relative  to  the  status  of  the  flight  but  does  not  actually 
issue  the  ‘‘all  clear.’’  We  provide  it  to  the  appropriate  law  enforce-
ment  agency  so  that  they  may  determine  the  status  of  the  threat 
level. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Who’s  going  to  be  responsible  for  giving  the  ‘‘all 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  I’m  not  actually  sure  who  is  responsible  for  giving 

clear? ’’

the ‘‘all clear.’’

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Fleming? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

19

Mr.  FLEMING.  Sir,  if  I  may.  The  all  clear  being  given  as  far  as 
evacuation procedures are concerned, would be given by the agency 
tasked  with  the  protection  of  that  particular  building.  Our  goal 
within TSA, and within the Department, is to make sure they have 
the  accurate  information  of  the  incident  as  it  occurs  so  they  can 
make that assessment independently. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  That’s  not  what  we  were  told.  I  was  in  a  secure 
location,  believe  me.  Our  people  waited  until  you  gave  the  ‘‘all 
clear.’’  That  was  a  considerable  amount  of  time.  I  think  that  has 
to  be  looked  at,  because  we  leave  these  buildings,  the  Supreme 
Court  left  their  building,  the  President  left  his  building,  everyone 
left  their  building  and  we  are  out  there  until  we  get  an  ‘‘all  clear’’ 
from  somebody.  And  it  was  very  unclear  who  had  the  authority  to 
give  the  ‘‘all  clear.’’  I  think  that  must  be  cleared  up.  We  request 
that  you  notify  this  Committee  what  is  the  procedure  for  deter-
mining the ‘‘all clear.’’

Mr. FLEMING. I’ll take that for action, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Inouye. 
Senator INOUYE. Mr. Chairman, if I may followup we were evacu-
ated,  and  we  were  advised  by  CNN  that  it  was  all  clear.  But  yet 
the  Sergeant  at  Arms  was  not  authorized  to  do  so  because  he  said 
‘‘I  haven’t  received  word  from  higher  up  that  everything  is  clear.’’ 
Can you explain that to me? Why was CNN notified before our Ser-
geant at Arms? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  Sir,  I  don’t  know  how  that  communication  took 
place  and  who  notified  CNN.  I  do  know  that  considerable  commu-
nication  came  from  the  Department  on  the  status  of  the  incident 
to the various entities. 

However  since  the  incident  I  also  know  that  considerable  work 
has been done to improve that communication through text, as well 
as  voice  capabilities.  So  I  believe  there’s  been  some  enhancement 
there.  I  would  certainly  like  to  defer  that  to  the  appropriate  De-
partment officials that can explain better the traction we’ve gotten 
toward that. 

Senator  INOUYE.  I’m  certain  you’re  aware  that  after  the  ‘‘all 
clear’’ the Chief of Police of the District of Columbia told the press 
that his department had not been notified? Why was that? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  Sir,  I’d  have  to  defer  that  to  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security  Operation  Center.  I  know  they  have  a  number 
of predetermined notifications in place that had been agreed upon. 
But  I  can’t  speak  directly  to  those.  I  will  defer  that  to  the  Depart-
ment for some more specific answers for you, sir. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Now  that  you  are  going  to  open  up  Ronald 
Reagan  for  general  aviation  I’ve  already  heard  reports  that  people 
are  trying  to  loosen  the  security  requirements  that  you  have  in 
place.  What  do  you  say  to  us?  Are  you  going  to  make  it  tighter  or 
loosen it up again? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  I  think  the  plan  as  stated  is  an  excellent  base 
point. I think as we implement that plan, we’ll continue to monitor 
and make adjustments as necessary. 

Senator  INOUYE.  What  do  you  think  of  Chairman  Stevens’  con-

cern about general aviation? 

Mr. FLEMING. I think we certainly have communicated often with 
the industry that would like access to Ronald Reagan. I believe this 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

20

plan  not  only  meets  our  security  needs  but  meets  their  access 
needs.  Again,  this  is  a  base  starting  point  for  us.  As  we  move  for-
ward  with  this  plan  if  the  adjustments  need  to  be  made,  if  it’s 
found  to  be  too  onerous,  or  we  can  adjust  the  security  levels  we’ll 
certainly continue to monitor that. 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you, very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Burns? 
Senator  BURNS.  I’m  interested  in  a  couple  areas,  you  have  only 
chosen  this  one  gateway  airport  here  at  DCA  for  this  time.  Are 
other airports going to be chosen? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  From  a  gateway  standpoint  sir,  we  have  12  air-
ports  around  the  country  that  were  selected  as  gateways,  which 
would  be  screening  points  that  would  allow  you  to  access  Ronald 
Reagan.  So  if  you  are  coming  from,  somewhere  in  the  country, 
you’ve  got  a  choice  of  12  different  airports.  We  selected  those  air-
ports, based on various factors, primarily those airports that served 
the largest portion of traffic in the DCA prior to 9/11. And then we 
also selected some additional airports just for access and ease of op-
eration. 

Senator BURNS. Mr. Fleming, will you describe the criteria that’s 
involved now whenever they land at a gateway airport to come into 
the DCA? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  Yes  sir,  the  first  step  would  be  part  of  the  access 
program.  There  are  some  program  requirements  which  include 
some  physical  security  requirements  at  the  FPO  itself.  Once  that’s 
been  established  you  would  communicate  your  requirements  to 
enter DCA. You would provide us a list of your crew and your pas-
sengers,  and  those  would  be  vetted.  You  would  proceed  to  that 
gateway airport where we would do physical screening, both of the 
aircraft,  the  passengers,  carry-on,  as  well  as  any  checked  baggage 
if that’s appropriate. 

A law enforcement officer would be added potentially at the gate-
way  or  could  be  brought  from  the  location  in  which  the  aircraft 
originated.  And  from  that  point  they  would  contact  the  NCRCC 
and notify their intent to fly into the DCA area and depart. 

Senator  BURNS.  All  this  costs  money.  Where  does  it  come  from? 
Mr.  FLEMING.  Yes,  sir.  In  the  plan  now  we  plan  to  pass  the  cost 
of screening equipment, and other associated cost to those that de-
sire  access  to  DCA.  We  currently—in  that  current  configuration 
those fees would be transmitted into the general fund and in order 
for  that  revenue  to  go  back  to  TSA,  the  legislation  would  have  to 
be enacted to allow TSA to keep those funds. 

Senator BURNS. Those are all the questions I have. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Nelson? 

STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  thank  you  Mr.  Chairman.  First  of  all,  I 
want  to  commend  you  for  an  effort  to  reopen  general  aviation  at 
National  so  close  to  all  of  us  who  can  come  in  and  come  out.  I  be-
lieve  in  a  belt  and  suspenders  approach.  I  can’t  believe  you  would 
choose  gateway  locations  requiring  then  security  as  opposed  to  re-
quiring a hardened door. I don’t understand why if someone wants 
to fly in a private plane that it wouldn’t be more feasible to require 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

21

a hardened door. And when they stop at the gateway airport it can 
be verified that they have a hardened door. I can see going through 
the  manifest  to  see  who  the  passengers  are,  vet  them,  work  your 
way through it. 

But once you have a hardened door the chances of the misuse of 
that  airplane  have  been  reduced  significantly.  And  probably  re-
duced more than even with a security person onboard. So it seems 
to  me  that  we  have  chosen  the  right  course,  the  wrong  way.  And 
I  don’t  understand  why,  perhaps  you  can  enlighten  me.  Either  of 
you,  I’m  not  picking  on  anyone.  Choose  between  yourselves,  it 
doesn’t matter to me. 

Mr. FLEMING. From a security standpoint hardened doors are an 
incredible  asset.  However,  from  an  air  frame  standpoint  which  I 
can  defer  to  the  FAA,  a  large  percentage  of  these  aircraft  that 
would  like  access  to  DCA  are  not  capable  of  being  retrofitted  for 
hardened cockpit doors. 

Those  that  are  would  require  considerable  expense  in  doing  so 

and I’d defer to the FAA on that process. 

Mr. CIRILLO. Actually that’s not my area of responsibility, so I’m 
not exactly sure what the process is. But we can get you that infor-
mation. 

Senator  BURNS.  But  couldn’t  you  make  it  either  or?  In  other 
words, I don’t know why we have a one-size-fits-all approach here, 
as opposed if you have the hardened door, or if you can harden the 
door, why would you have to have a security passenger as well? It 
seems  to  me  we  ought  to  have  some  flexibility  here  that  makes 
sense to recognize that some may choose to do it one way, and oth-
ers may choose to do it another way. But I commend you for trying 
to find a way to do it. I just don’t want it to be an impossible task 
or put the barrier so high that it’s very difficult for anybody to real-
ly meet it, feasibly. 

I  don’t  see  that  this  is  feasible  quite  honestly.  I  don’t  know  why 
you  don’t  just  keep  it  closed  as  opposed  to  putting  up  a  standard 
that very few are going to be able to meet or want to meet. Or the 
cost is going to be so great that it becomes difficult to meet. Thank 
you, Mr. Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Allen? 

STATEMENT OF HON. GEORGE ALLEN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you,  for  hold-
ing  this  hearing.  I  have  a  statement  that  I  would  like  to  be  part 
of record. 

The CHAIRMAN. It will be, thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Allen follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. GEORGE ALLEN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman.  I  appreciate  you  convening  this  hearing  so  we  can  ex-
amine our policies pertaining to the District’s airspace and the importance of allow-
ing general aviation flights to again operate at Reagan National Airport. 

Following  the  terrorist  attacks  of  September  11  it  was  necessary  to  take  extreme 
security  precautions  to  make  sure  further  attacks  could  not  be  carried  out.  One  of 
these precautionary measures was the closure of Reagan National Airport to general 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

22

aviation  flights  and  strict  limits  on  aircraft  permitted  to  fly  into  Washington,  D.C. 
airspace. 

Since  that  time,  we  have  progressively  re-opened  our  civil  aviation  system  and 
today  virtually  all  flights  and  airports  are  as  accessible  as  they  were  prior  to  Sep-
tember  11.  An  exception  is  obviously  access  to  D.C.  airspace  and  general  aviation 
flights into and out of Reagan National Airport. 

The  policies  that  have  been  implemented  to  limit  access  to  the  airspace  of  the 
Capital  Region  are  providing  the  necessary  degree  of  security.  The  agencies  tasked 
with protecting D.C. airspace are continuing to work together and improve the way 
in which information is shared and analyzed. 

There  have  been  two  high-profile  incursions  into  restricted  D.C.  airspace.  This 
should  be  cause  for  concern,  but  not  panic.  I  understand  there  was  a  transponder 
problem in the case regarding the Kentucky Governor, and that FAA identified defi-
ciencies in its own response procedures that were subsequently corrected. 

The second incident involved a pilot that ‘‘froze’’ once his aircraft was intercepted. 
There were numerous and clear signals given to the pilot to divert and he ultimately 
did. 

I do not believe these two incidents should affect how we establish policy with re-

gard to general aviation at Reagan National Airport. 

I  am  pleased  that  the  Administration  has  agreed  to  again  allow  general  aviation 
to operate in and out of Reagan National Airport. In reviewing TSA’s plan, I would 
submit that it is a good first step. 

This  is  an  important  victory  for  the  airport  and  many  surrounding  businesses. 
Non-scheduled  air  carrier  operations  at  Reagan  National  once  generated  an  esti-
mated  $50  million  a  year  in  direct  economic  activity  from  charter  revenue,  aircraft 
handling and refueling services. The lack of charter and general aviation passengers 
coming  into  the  city,  hotels,  restaurants  and  other  service  businesses  near  Reagan 
National  have  suffered  a  significant,  negative  economic  impact  as  well.  Hopefully 
the implementation of this plan will bring those revenues back. 

As  many  know,  I  have  been  working  on  this  issue  for  quite  some  time.  I  intro-
duced  legislation  directing  the  Administration  to  allow  general  aviation  flights  at 
Reagan  National,  but  also  provided  for  some  reasonable,  practical  conditions  to  be 
included in any plan to re-open the airport. 

Security is and will remain the paramount consideration with this change in pol-
icy. I understand the Administration’s plan contains a number of additional security 
measures  (similar  to  those  in  my  legislation)  that  are  going  to  be  required  for  gen-
eral  aviation  flights  to  operate  out  of  Reagan  National.  I  believe  that  is  a  prudent 
approach at this time. 

I do however want to make sure these conditions are not so impractical that gen-
eral  aviation  operators  are  unable  to  meet  them.  It  is  important  that  we  give  this 
policy  a  chance  to  succeed.  Overly  restrictive  regulations  that  go  far  beyond  those 
applicable to commercial aviation will not give us a fair determination that general 
aviation can be safely operated at Reagan National Airport. 

Should  the  implementation  of  this  plan  go  smoothly,  it  is  important  that  we  re-
evaluate the current restrictions and consider opening Reagan to more general avia-
tion flights each day. 

Again,  I  view  the  plan  the  Administration  has  put  forward  as  a  good  and  appre-
ciated  first  step.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  TSA  and  FAA  in  the  future  to  en-
sure  the  safety  and  practicality  of  general  aviation  flights  at  Reagan  National  Air-
port.

Senator  ALLEN.  This  is  an  issue  that  as  Members  of  this  Com-
mittee  and  those  in  Administration  know,  I  have  been  focusing  on 
for many years because of the impact, the adverse impact that the 
closure  of  Reagan  National  to  general  aviation  has  had,  in  jobs,  in 
revenue, as well as obviously in access to our Nation’s Capital. 

I want to applaud the Administration for finally coming up with 
a plan for reopening Reagan National. I introduced a measure this 
year, Senate Bill 433 that had the understanding in it, in directing 
the  Administration  to  reopen  Reagan  National  so  that  they  could 
have  additional  security.  It’s  logical  to  have  additional  security  re-
quirements for Reagan National. 

The  requirements  should  be  rational,  they  should  be  reasonable, 
and  they  should  be  practical.  This  is  a  first  step,  you  called  it  a 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

23

start, a base plan, I am referring to Mr. Fleming taking those notes 
down.  In  looking  at  it,  the  questions  from  Senator  Burns  and  our 
Chairman, are ones of practicality. In fact even in Senator Nelson’s 
proposal  to  get  a  hardened  cockpit  door,  you  would  need  to  have 
a law enforcement officer onboard. 

I  think  in  most  cases  for  general  aviation  it’s  pretty  hard  to  get 
in  a  hardened  cockpit  door,  when  you  think  of  what  pilots  do  on 
such  planes  and  some  of  them  they’re  just—it’s  just  as  a  practical 
matter  difficult  to  do.  However,  some  may  want  to  do  that,  and  if 
they do meet that criteria, you ought to have the flexibility of say-
ing  we  want  this  added  security,  but  have  the  flexibility  on  dif-
ferent  ways  that  it  can  be  done.  It  will  probably  have  to  be  in  a 
place like Lexington, Kentucky, a lot of these law enforcement offi-
cers ready to get hired on. 

They  maybe  deputy  sheriffs,  they  be  who  knows  what,  just  to 
take  this  flight  in.  Most  general  aviation  planes  do  not  have  hun-
dreds of seats on them. There’s usually anywhere from 8 to maybe 
12, I suppose, and so that could be a limit. The other thing you all 
need to understand is with the closure of Reagan National, it really 
clogs  up  Dulles  Airport  for  general  aviation,  where  you  have  the 
cargo and commercial and folks who are on that runway for a long 
time.  Smaller  planes,  as  well  as  the  big  commercial  aircraft.  What 
I would like to know from you, Mr. Fleming, is that first when are 
we  likely  to  get  this  final  rule  accomplished?  Because  once  this 
final rule is accomplished, then you’re going to see how many want 
to  avail  themselves  of  these  added  burdens  of  flying  into  Reagan 
National. Can you give us a date when you think this will actually 
kick in? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  It’s  a  very  high  priority  of  the  Department.  We’re 
finalizing  that  IFR,  now.  I  don’t  have  a  specific  date  for  you.  But 
I  assure  you  it’s  a  high  priority  and  we’re  in  the  finalization  proc-
ess. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Do  you  think  it  will  take  a  month?  Will  it  be 
done by, for example, Independence Day, or August 1 when do you 
think this will——

Mr.  FLEMING.  Sir,  I  don’t  have  a  date.  I  do  know  that  we’re  just 
in  the  finalization  process  of  the  rule  now.  I  don’t  anticipate  a 
lengthy delay. 

Senator ALLEN. All right. Let’s assume this kicks in, in a month 
or so. And you will be monitoring this, and there are a certain lim-
ited number of slots that are available. What will be the indicators 
to  you,  as  to  when  you’re  monitoring  this  first  step  that  adjust-
ments need to be made? What will be the indicators? Will it be that 
there  are  fewer  flights  coming  in  than  there  are  available?  Will  it 
be comments from those who say, gosh I would like to come in but 
it’s so impractical to fly the way that we have to fly in these gate-
way  airports,  so  you  may  actually  increase  the  number  of  gateway 
airports. Or maybe modify the law enforcement officer requirement, 
or  any  other  sort  of  things  that  would  come  up.  What  will  be  the 
criteria,  so  that  people  if  they  do  have  comments,  ideas  for  nec-
essary changes, greater practicality, how will that be taken in, and 
what will be the conduit? And what will be the criteria you will use 
to determine more gateway airports, or whether or not this is actu-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

24

ally having the desired effect of allowing more to use general avia-
tion at Reagan National? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  Sir,  I  think  certainly  a  primary  conduit  would  be 
the  industry  itself  in  general  feedback  on  the  plan.  For  those  that 
do  enter  into  this  security  program,  each  of  them  will  be  identi-
fying a security point of contact. And that will be our main contact 
between  those  private  entities  and  TSA  on  how  that  program  is 
going. We have a normally instituted feedback with our compliance 
group with that security point of contact within the industry. So we 
plan  to  get  feedback  through  both  those  mechanisms,  and  adjust 
accordingly. 

In addition to that, we’ll continue to work with our Federal part-
ners within the Department, and outside the Department on access 
and availability. 

Senator ALLEN. How do you envision today this requirement of—
the requirement of a law enforcement officer on a flight. Do you en-
vision  a  training  program  for  individuals  and  that  will  be  in  dif-
ferent  parts  of  the  country,  or  how  do  you  actually  envision  that 
taking place? 

Mr. FLEMING. Yes sir. 
Senator  ALLEN.  I  am  trying  to  get  the  practicality  for  those  who 
may  want  to  use  it.  I  know  there  are  a  lot,  very  many  who  want 
to reopen Reagan for general aviation. That is probably going to be 
the most problematic matter not just taking up a seat in a smaller 
aircraft.  But  how  do  you  actually  get  such  personnel  on  a  plane? 
And  you  know,  who’s  qualified?  If  you  can  share  with  us  how  that 
would actually work as a practical matter? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  We’re  working  now  to  establish  a  level  of  training 
required and background required to act in this capacity. Our goal 
is, once that’s established and we are finalizing that now, once that 
is established to ensure that training is readily available across the 
United States, so that access is open. So that’s our program for the 
security  officer  on  board  and  we  should  be,  you  should  see  details 
of that delineated in the IFR as soon as it’s issued. 

Senator ALLEN. Do you envision the TSA conducting this training 
or could it be done from law enforcement, say local or state law en-
forcement, or others who would be conducting—excuse me. 

The CHAIRMAN. Go ahead. 
Senator  ALLEN.  If  you  would  just  say  who  would  you  envision 

being the instructor of such training to meet this criteria? 

Mr. FLEMING. We think there are other entities, other than TSA, 
that  may  be  able  to  provide  this  training.  We  are  exploring  that 
now. 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Sorry to interrupt you. But I’m trying to keep the 

time down. 

Senator ALLEN. Understood. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Rockefeller. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV,

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  have  to  say 
that  I  find  it  a  bit  ironic  that  this  hearing  concerns  itself  with 
opening up Reagan National Airport, which is what would certainly 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

25

be  convenient  for  all  of  us  and  all  the  lobbyists  that  come  into 
town.  In  the  meantime  there  are  200,000  general  aviation  planes 
that take off every day. And two-thirds of them, in fact three-quar-
ters  of  all  traffic  in  the  air  is  general  aviation,  private  aviation. 
Two-thirds of that is single engine. 

Now I’m—that’s fine we open up Reagan National that’s fine. I’ve 
never  found  any  crowding  at  Dulles.  I  have  to  charter  sometimes, 
I  have  to  drive  a  half  hour,  so  what.  In  West  Virginia,  we  have  to 
do  that  all  the  time.  I  am  worried  about  that  200,000  that  are  not 
being  monitored,  have  virtually  no  protocol  for  security  for  which 
you have, I believe you cannot testify other than that you have ten 
or  fewer  people  associated  with  looking  at  their  protocol  in  which 
there are no substantial pilots licenses, no checking, people just get 
on and get off airplanes. The 9/11 Commission made a big point of 
this,  that  it’s  a  lethal  weapon.  The  single  engine  plane  is  a  lethal 
weapon.  So  are  any  of  them.  And  we’re  talking  about  Reagan  Na-
tional. I am happy to talk about Reagan National. But I would like 
to  know,  is  it  true  that  you  have  zero  dollars,  and  about  ten  em-
ployees  that  are  monitoring  200,000  plus  private  airplanes  across 
this country that take off—that are in the air every day? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  I  believe  the  funding  level  is  at  the  1.5  million 
level,  and  I  believe  it’s  12  FTE  that  are  dedicated  toward  general 
aviation, sir. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Twelve. I stand corrected then, it’s 12 not 
10.  The  9/11  bill  said  that  we  had  to  improve  the  existing  pilot  li-
censes,  they’re  kind  of  paper,  with  a  photograph.  And  it  talked 
about upgrading them substantially including the use of biometrics 
is any of that in process? Except for the 12—I assume that’s going 
to be on the 12 entry points, is that going to be effective anywhere 
else, anybody doing any work on that? 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  The  FAA  is  working  on  the  modified  pilot  license, 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. What does that mean? 
Mr. CIRILLO. To——
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  I  know  what  a  modified  pilot  license  is. 
What do you mean, is working on it. I am working on lots of things, 
it doesn’t mean I get them all done. 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  It’s  in  process,  it  involves  rulemaking,  and  it’s  in  a 

yes, sir. 

certain stage of that process. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. I don’t know what that means. It involves 
rulemaking and it’s under a—is it being done or not? Is it halfway 
done, two-thirds done? 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  I’m  not  sure  exactly  the  time  line  for  completion  of 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Is biometrics involved? 
Mr.  CIRILLO.  I’m  not  absolutely  sure  what  the  final  criteria  is 

it. 

going to be. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Is there any other general aviation plane 
in  the  country,  other  than  the  one  that  you’re  talking  about  which 
is having any of its luggage checked, which is having any of its pas-
sengers  wanded  or  any  of  its  pilots  using  other  than  the  regular 
form  paper  license  with  the  photograph  attached  primitive  stop?  I 
am  not  trying  to  be  hostile,  I  think  it’s  a  very  dangerous  situation 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

26

for  Homeland  Security.  It’s  an  extremely  dangerous  situation. 
Every  single  hour  of  the  day,  we  know  something  about  that  here. 
Mr.  CIRILLO.  Relative  to  security  measures  I  can’t  answer  to 
that,  but  the  change  in  the  pilots  license  has  not  occurred.  It  is 
being worked. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. I think that you are, Mr. Fleming you are 
the Chief Operating Officer of TSA. You ought to be able to answer 
that question. 

Mr. FLEMING. Sir, we’ve have taken a number of approaches from 
a  TSA  standpoint,  the  threat,  vulnerability,  and  consequence  of 
general  aviation  compared  to  commercial  aviation,  there  are  some 
obvious  differences.  However  you  do  point  out  the  size  of  the  com-
munity.  And  we  look  at  the  size  of  the  community,  compared  with 
that  threat,  vulnerability  and  consequence.  We  have  leveraged  a 
number  of  programs.  We  are  instituting  and  working  with  the  in-
dustry to institute a vulnerability assessment program that GA air-
ports  and  FBOs  will  institute.  We  have  issued  guidelines  in  work-
ing with Civil Aviation Security Working Group——

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Guidelines,  but  essentially  they’re  self 

regulating, is that correct? 

Mr. FLEMING. That is true, sir. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. So the commercial is under control of the 
TSA,  they’re  the  minority  of  the  planes  flying  and  the  majority  of 
the planes flying are self regulating? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  That  is  correct.  The  majority  of  the  planes  flying 
that  have  a  high  threat,  vulnerability,  and  high  consequences  are 
the ones we have regulated to date. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. My time is up, I thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Rockefeller follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV,

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

I  would  like  to  thank  Senator  Stevens  for  holding  this  hearing  today  and  would 

like to welcome our witnesses. 

First,  I  would  note  that  I  have  supported  legislation  re-opening  National  Airport 
to general aviation, but have always predicated my support on whether or not suffi-
cient security protocols could be established. 

The  Administration  has  developed  a  rigorous  security  program  for  National  and 
before  anyone  wants  to  ease  these  requirements,  I  believe  it  would  be  prudent  to 
implement  them  and  then  see  what,  if  any,  future  adjustments  need  to  be  made. 
Although much of this hearing will be devoted to issues surrounding the re-open-
ing  of  National  Airport  to  a  limited  amount  of  general  aviation  traffic,  I  believe  it 
is important to take this opportunity to explore what I believe is one the most press-
ing  issues  in  aviation  security  today—the  lack  of  a  comprehensive  Federal  security 
regime for general aviation. 

As  we  all  know,  the  9/11  report  and  other  recent  DHS  reports  confirm  that  gen-
eral aviation represents a substantial security risk. As we strengthen our passenger 
and cargo security systems the terrorists will seek other avenues. I believe that gen-
eral aviation remains a rich and easy target for terrorists. I do not make this state-
ment lightly. We have a serious problem and we must address it. 

In  reviewing  the  Transportation  Security  Administration’s  actions  on  general 
aviation security, I remain deeply troubled. To be blunt, the Agency is doing nothing 
but  relying  on  voluntary  self-compliance  from  the  affected  stakeholders  to  devise  a 
security  system  for  general  aviation.  This  simply  is  not  good  enough.  I  know  our 
panel of industry representatives will argue that their voluntary measures are suffi-
cient, but I disagree. 

The reason the Federal Government is relying on industry for general aviation se-
curity is because TSA does not have the resources and staff to do it themselves. This 
is  another  glaring  example  of  the  Administration  shortchanging  our  aviation  secu-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

27

rity  needs  because  of  irresponsible  budget  policy.  It  is  my  understanding  that  TSA 
has only a limited number of staff devoted to general aviation security and no dedi-
cated budget. Given the size of the industry, this lack of resources and commitment 
is stunning. 

I  also  dispute  the  notion  that  the  size  of  the  aircraft  limits  its  damage  potential. 
We  evacuated  the  Capitol  weeks  ago  because  the  government  did  not  know  what 
might be in that small plane. A small plane packed with lightweight explosives, bio-
logical or chemical agents can be as much of a threat as a commercial airliner. 

I want to work with the other Members of the Committee, the Administration and 
the general aviation community in establishing an effective Federally operated secu-
rity regime and to strengthen aviation security as a whole. This may take an imple-
mentation of a general aviation security fee. I strongly believe that general aviation 
needs to be kept operating, but there is a legitimate need for more security.

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Lautenberg. 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  ask  that  my  full  state-

ment be included in the record. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. As do I. 
The CHAIRMAN. Yes sirs, they will be. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  First  of  all  let  me  clearly  say  that  I  sup-
port  the  access  to  general  aviation  for  those  who  are  fortunate 
enough to use it and those who go along with those who can afford 
it.  The  fact  is  that  it’s  a  significant  convenience,  a  significant  part 
of our culture. Terrorism has inflicted many new, complex problems 
on us. We see it every day, and every time we go to the airport and 
wait  in  the  long  security  lines  et  cetera.  That’s  the  price  you  pay 
for  protecting  our  public.  Now,  Newark  airport  is  short  the  full 
complement of security screeners that we are supposed to have. Of-
ficials  at  the  airport  say  we  need  1,440  in  round  numbers,  but  we 
only  have  1,200.  In  Teterboro,  there  is  a  very  active  airport  that 
serves the New York marketplace. And prior to 9/11, Teterboro also 
sent  more  GA  aircraft  to  Washington  National  on  a  regular  basis 
than any other airport of origin. 

Well  now,  the  Administration  wants  to  take  something  like  3  to 
5  only,  just  a  small  number  of  screeners,  over  to  Teterboro  from 
Newark,  which  is  already  short  screeners  all  together.  So  Mr. 
Cirillo, is that something you are looking at and what’s the answer 
to that? 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  Sir,  I  think  I  once  again  defer  to  Mr.  Fleming  for 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Sorry. I’ve still got the jurisdictions mixed 

that question. 

up here. Please go. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Lautenberg]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing  and  giving  us  an  opportunity 

to examine important issues affecting General Aviation. 

General  Aviation  (GA)  accounts  for  three-fourths  of  flights  in  the  United  States 
each  day.  There  are  more  than  200,000  active  GA  aircraft,  operating  at  almost 
19,000 airports. All of these aircraft pose a tremendous challenge for the Transpor-
tation  Security  Administration.  Federal  intelligence  agencies  have  reported  on  sev-
eral  occasions  that  terrorists  have  considered  using  GA  aircraft  to  launch  attacks. 
And the report of the 9/11 Commission found that ‘‘major vulnerabilities’’ still exist 
in GA security. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

28

In  the  immediate  aftermath  of  9/11,  GA  flights  were  restricted  in  a  number  of 
areas  around  the  country,  especially  the  Washington,  D.C.  region.  In  May  of  this 
year,  however,  the  TSA  proposed  re-opening  Washington  National  Airport  to  GA 
flights from 12 designated airports around the country—including Teterboro Airport 
in New Jersey. 

In  order  to  upgrade  security  operations  at  Teterboro,  the  TSA  indicated  it  will 

transfer security screening personnel from Newark Liberty Airport. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  certainly  agree  that  security  personnel  are  needed  at  Teterboro, 
but  it  would  be  wrong  to  divert  resources  from  Newark  Liberty  Airport,  which  is 
one  of  the  largest  in  the  country.  It  is  also,  I  must  remind  my  colleagues,  one  of 
the airports that the terrorists used on 9/11. 

Newark  Liberty  is  already  understaffed.  Officials  say  they  need  another  200 
screeners  to  handle  the  amount  of  traffic  at  this  busy  airport.  I  also  think  that  be-
fore  we  begin  allowing  more  flights  from  Teterboro  to  National  Airport,  we  must 
have a clear picture what the impact on the local community will be. 

Speaking  of  small  aircraft  flying  to  the  Washington  region,  several  important 
questions were raised by the recent air incursion that caused the emergency evacu-
ation  of  the  Capitol  and  Congressional  office  buildings.  For  one  thing,  despite  the 
possibility  of  an  airborne  attack  with  biochemical  weapons,  local  authorities  in  the 
District  of  Columbia  were  not  notified.  Also,  even  though  the  situation  was  serious 
enough that the First Lady was removed from the White House, the President, who 
was just a few miles away riding a bicycle, was not informed of the situation. 

With the resumption of General Aviation flights to the Washington Region, I hope 
that the protocols for handling possible security threats can be developed more thor-
oughly.  Once  again,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  thank  you  and  our  witnesses  for  this  oppor-
tunity to learn more about this important issue.

Mr.  FLEMING.  Sir,  resources  within  TSA  is  something  that  we 
constantly  look  at  and  evaluate,  and  to  balance  the  needs  across 
the  system  is  something  that  we  need  to  be  constantly  mindful  of. 
We  do  have  a  history  and  Newark  Airport  is  operating  from  a 
metric  standpoint  very  nicely  within  the  operating  environment, 
with  the  screeners  that  they  have.  With  orange—the  orange  level 
increase in the New York area last summer, we did deploy screen-
ers from Newark to Teterboro to conduct some screening. And dur-
ing  the  RNC  process,  we  set  up  gateways  and  did  screening  with 
assets  from  Newark.  That  did  not  prove  to  be  taxing,  however  we 
will continue to watch that. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Well, Mr. Fleming, if you saw some of the 
lines  that  we  have  at  Newark,  you’d  see  that  it’s  a  very  busy  air-
port. And frankly, I have spoken to some of the TSA screeners dur-
ing  a  few  minute  opportunity  that  I  had  to  talk  to  some  of  them, 
and  they  complained  about  the  break  time  and  other  working  con-
ditions. That it’s hard to focus on the passing of baggage on a reg-
ular  basis  when  they  are  shorthanded.  And  they  are.  I  mean  you 
say  it’s  operating  well.  It’s  operating,  it’s  quite  a  secure  airport,  I 
think.  But  the  fact  is  that  they  want  200  persons  more  screening 
baggage  and  now  we  are  going  to  take  screeners  away  from  New-
ark. I’d like not to see that happen if we can do it. 

I  started  by  saying  that  I  believe  we  should  be  securing  general 
aviation.  It’s  a  part  of  our  culture,  and  a  part  of  the  convenience 
for important matters that occur in the business world and private 
world as well. I want to ask you this. What do you mean when you 
say  that  every  GA  airplane  that’s  coming  to  Washington  National 
is going to have a law enforcement officer aboard? 

Mr. FLEMING. That is part of plan, sir. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. That is part of the plan. 
Mr. FLEMING. Although we are looking at, as was mentioned ear-
lier,  the  hardened  cockpit  door  in  those  few  aircraft  that  we  think 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

29

are in the community that can support that, we are looking at the 
possibility of replacing that requirement for those. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Would  there  be  a  rule  that  says  you  can’t 
have  an  airplane—So  it’s  true  what  you  would  like  to  do  is  have 
a  law  enforcement  officer  aboard  every  plane.  Is  that  correct,  sir? 

Mr. FLEMING. Yes, sir. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  What’s  that  going  to  take  in  terms  of  ex-
panded Departmental resources? Do you know how many more peo-
ple you might need? 

Mr. FLEMING. Sir, that’s not going to be a law enforcement officer 
that’s provided by the Department. We are going to set some train-
ing  and  background  standards  and  then  work  to  get  that  training 
program  throughout  the  country.  So  that  law  enforcement  officers, 
off  duty  law  enforcement  officers  can  avail  themselves  to  that 
training, and provide that service to the operators. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  It  may  not  sound  fair  but  could  you  bar, 
let’s say single-engine airplanes from coming in? Some of them are 
pretty  big  these  days.  But  can  you  put  a  handle  on  identification 
of the kind of aircraft that should be allowed through? Also, would 
every airplane have to have at least two persons aboard in addition 
to  the  law  enforcement  person?  I’m  saying  that  you  have  to  have 
at  least  two  persons  in  the  aircraft,  and  the  background  on  each 
of  them  would,  I  assume,  be  checked.  Are  you  looking  at  this  as 
part  of  a  rule  for  general  aviation  operations  coming  into  Wash-
ington National? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  We  have  not  envisioned  focusing  on  the  numbers 
of  passengers,  or  persons  onboard  the  aircraft.  The  requirement 
would  remain  the  same  for  any  number  of  passengers  that  hap-
pened to be onboard, the prevetting of their backgrounds. We have 
looked  at  the  size  of  aircraft  and  what  sort  of  operations  the  air-
craft are taking. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. And along the way would they be checking 
in with flight service stations so that their identification is updated 
as  they  go  along?  Or  would  they  have  filed  for  Washington  Na-
tional  Airport  anyway?  But  there  should  be  a  routine  that  would 
require  check-in  on  a  regular  basis.  I  would  ask  one  last  question 
Mr.  Chairman.  And  that  is,  at  what  point  does  interference  with 
a flight take place by the military if someone is coming in. 

Do  they—are  they  going  to  be  constantly  supervised  by  military 
planes  in  the  sky?  Because  for  several  of  airports  you’re  talking 
about  less  than  an  hour  ride  from  Washington—the  gateway  air-
ports, right? 

Mr. FLEMING. Yes, sir. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  So  at  what  point  would  one  take  military 
action?  Would  you  wait  until  they  are  right  up  at  the  door  or  the 
circumference  of  the  circle  that  is  prohibited  space?  At  what  point 
is the notice given to scramble aircraft for the military? 

Mr. FLEMING. Sir, I would defer to the Department of Defense to 

answer their scramble procedures. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Well, Mr. Fleming, you’re here. You’re rep-
resenting  the  TSA  and  you  are  the  folks  that  manage  the  security 
around these places. And I assume that you’re close enough to the 
Defense  Department  to  know  you  would  issue  an  order  when  an 
order should be issued to say: ‘‘hey, get in the way of this guy.’’

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

30

Mr. FLEMING. From a monitoring standpoint the NCRCC, and all 
the  agencies  that  are  resident  there,  they  are  watching  aircraft  in 
and around the ADIZ, or the D.C. area. At any time we feel uncom-
fortable with the actions, or lack of communication, or other indica-
tors of the aircraft there are immediate protocols to engage all the 
authorities  necessary.  In  many  cases  the  Department  of  Defense 
does engage. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Let me just make sure that my friend from West 
Virginia  stated  the  number  of  private  planes  that  are  out  there.  I 
think  one  area  of  private  planes  that  is  the  acute  area,  is  that 
those entities that lease private planes. My state has more private 
planes per capita than anywhere in the world. We have more pilots 
per  capita  than  anywhere  in  the  world.  We  don’t  have  buses  or 
taxicabs,  we  don’t  have  street  cars,  we  have  airplanes.  And  I  can 
tell you that in most areas of the country I’ve visited fix base oper-
ators  know  who  owns  which  plane  and  who  can  fly  that  plane. 
They would be very quick to try to prevent anyone from taking up 
a plane that didn’t belong to them. It’s the leasing of airplanes that 
is the greatest risk to security in my opinion. 

Have you concentrated on that at all? 
Mr. FLEMING. We are looking at that, sir. We are looking at that. 
We have not formulated an opinion specifically on our approach on 
leased aircraft, but we are in negotiations on that now. 

The CHAIRMAN. I do think we ought to find some way to increase 
the  responsibility  of  fix  base  operators  to  know  those  who  use  the 
facilities  and  to  check  their  identity,  and  not  just  the  drivers  li-
cense but real identity. We would cooperate with that in every way. 
I have no problem about identification. I don’t know if any general 
aviation  pilot  that  I’ve  ever  met  would  refuse  to  have  a  change  in 
the license, biometrics or whatever you want. 

But the real problem is to try to control those who abuse the sys-
tem,  not  those  who  use  the  system.  So  I  would  urge  you  to  try  to 
look  at  the  abuse,  and  not  the  use  of  the  general  aviation  system. 
But  thank  you  very  much  for  appearing  today.  We  have  another 
panel  we  would  like  to  get  that  if  we  could.  I  assume  no  one  else 
has any further questions of these gentlemen? 

Senator  BURNS.  I  have  a  question.  One  short  question  in  slots. 
I  have  one  short  question  and  slots.  If  you  know,  DCA  has  con-
trolled slots. And how they will be allocated among those gateways. 
Can one gateway city take up all the slots and leave somebody else, 
out in the cold. I think they’re allotted, and how that will be done. 
Is that first come first serve, but I think it’s a logical question? 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  I  think  from  the  FAA  standpoint  we  will  receive  a 
vetted  request  for  a  slot  from  TSA,  and  we  will  allot  those  on  a 
first come first serve basis. 

tion? 

Senator  ALLEN.  Mr.  Chairman,  may  I  just  ask  one  quick  ques-

The CHAIRMAN. Yes sir. 
Senator  ALLEN.  As  I  was  mentioning  earlier  on  these  airports, 
the  12  gateway  airports.  As  you  monitor  this  and  just  looking  at 
logistics from the west if somebody is coming from some place from 
the  west,  which  is  east  of  certain  areas  they  are  going  to  have  to 
stop,  probably  in  Lexington,  if  they  are  going  to  come  to  the  west 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

31

from  here  to  Reagan  National.  From  the  north  there’s  a  lot  of 
Teterboro in light planes and so forth up north including Philadel-
phia.  If  you  are  coming  from  the  south  there  are  none  other  than 
West Palm Beach as a practical matter, or Houston. Would you en-
vision  for  those  that  are  coming  from  a  place  like  Charlotte  or  At-
lanta  or  Nashville,  or  Memphis,  that  you  set  up  a  gateway  airport 
closer in. Whether that’s practical. I’m not trying to do this just for 
Virginia,  but  there’s  a  logic  if  Lexington  from  the  west—Lexington 
is going to be your gateway, if you are coming from a place like the 
plains, or you want to go to Minneapolis. 

If  you  look  at  this  logistically  in  the  country,  if  you’re  coming 
from  the  south  other  than  West  Palm  Beach,  Florida,  or  Houston, 
Texas  you’re  going  to  have  to  divert  somewhere,  unless  you  want 
to  backtrack  down  to  southern  Florida  or  backtrack  all  the  way 
back to Texas. Would you think of having some perimeter airports? 
It  may  be  Richmond  or  Roanoke.  It  might  be  for  that  matter,  it 
might be Danville, it might be Greensboro, North Carolina. 

Do  you  understand  what  I’m  saying,  just  for  the  practicality  of 
those  that  are  not  flying  from  places  like  Houston  or  West  Palm 
Beach  they  are  going  to  have  a  heck  of  a  time  getting  up  here. 
Maybe  they  will  have  to  go  to  Lexington,  but  do  you  understand 
what I’m saying? 

Mr. FLEMING. Yes sir. 
Senator ALLEN. Do you envision or will you have the practicality 
to be flexible? Say we’re going to have another gateway airport just 
to service those coming from non-gateway airports in the south? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  Absolutely,  I  think  these  initial  gateways  that 
were  laid  out,  were  really  based  on  the  market  requirements  prior 
to  9/11.  If  we  get  into  this  and  find  out  that  these  don’t  meet  the 
needs,  we  will  certainly  look  at  that  and  make  adjustments  to  it 
if necessary. 

Senator ALLEN. All right. And you’ll see that maybe it will make 
sense  to  use  Newport  News  for  an  airport  for  whatever  reason,  as 
a  gateway  airport.  Even  though  there  are  not  many  flights  that 
may originate from Newport News, it will at least get all the Caro-
linas and Georgia covered. 

Mr. FLEMING. Sure. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Chairman, I’ve have got one question. 
The CHAIRMAN. I would hope we’d get on to the other panel. But 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes,  please.  The  9/11  Commission  rec-
ommended  a  Transportation  Security  Plan.  And  under  the  leader-
ship  of  Senator  McCain,  Congress,  the  Senate  passed  it.  Now,  it’s 
4  years,  and  we  still  don’t  have  a  Transportation  Security  Plan.  Is 
there, do you know of any plan that’s in development Mr. Fleming, 
and when it might be available? 

Mr.  FLEMING.  Definitely  in  development.  I’m  working  with  the 

new leadership to get that vetted and out. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. How long might that take? 
Mr. FLEMING. I’m sorry, sir. I don’t have a time line on that. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  would  add  some  urgency  to  it.  Thank 

yes, sir. 

you. Thank you Mr. Chairman. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  We  have  available  peripheral  airports  now,  Dul-
les and Maryland. We just checked what the estimate would be on 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

32

an  average  day,  there’d  be  about  24  of  these  planes  landing  at 
Reagan. That would be 8,760 slots per year. If you put a $500 dol-
lar  fee  on  them  you  are  talking  about  $2,787,000  for  revenue.  The 
burden  that  you  are  putting  on  those  planes  are  such  that  they’re 
not  going  to  come.  They’re  going  to  go  to  Dulles,  and  they’re  going 
to  Maryland.  Unless  you  find  some  way  to  take  the  burden  off.  If 
you  really  want  to  land  there  has  to  be  another  way  to  solve  this 
problem.  Thank  you  very  much  gentlemen.  We’ll  call  the  second 
panel. 

Next panel is Ed Bolen, President and CEO of the National Busi-
ness  Aviation  Association.  James  K.  Coyne,  President  of  the  Na-
tional  Air  Transportation  Association.  Mr.  Andrew  Cebula,  Senior 
Vice President of Aircraft Owners and Pilots Association. 

Gentlemen,  we  thank  you  very  much,  and  appreciate  your  will-
ingness  to  appear,  and  give  us  your  views.  I  believe  if  it  will  be 
proper as far as you are concerned we’ll go in the order that I read 
the names. If we’ll just proceed, Mr. Bolen. 

STATEMENT OF ED BOLEN, PRESIDENT AND CEO, NATIONAL 

BUSINESS AVIATION ASSOCIATION 

Mr.  BOLEN.  Well,  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  con-
vening  this  hearing.  I  would  ask  that  my  full  statement  be  made 
part of the record. Thank you very much. 

Mr.  Chairman,  as  you  and  the  others  on  the  Committee  well 
know,  general  aviation  is  a  vital  part  of  our  Nation’s  air  transpor-
tation system and an important cog in our economic engine. Every-
one on this Committee also knows that general aviation is different 
and  distinct  from  the  commercial  airlines.  And  as  a  result  of  that, 
the  security  approaches  need  to  be  different  and  they  need  to  be 
distinct. They also need to be effective. 

Now  since  September  11,  2001,  the  general  aviation  community 
has  come  together  and  it’s  worked  very  hard  to  try  to  understand 
our vulnerabilities. We hired outside experts, we’ve met together in 
groups and as a result of that we have offered a number of security 
recommendations  and  more  importantly  implemented  a  number  of 
security  initiatives  that  we  believe  have  enhanced  the  security  of 
general aviation since 9/11. 

And in my written testimony I go through a number of those. We 
think  that  this  diligence  that  we  have  taken  toward  addressing 
general  aviation’s  security,  combined  with  the  tremendous  leader-
ship of Congress and with the commitment from the new Secretary 
of the Department of Homeland Security, and the Deputy Secretary 
has  really  led  to  the  resumption  of  general  aviation  operations  at 
Reagan National Airport. And we’re profoundly grateful for the op-
portunity  to  once  again  be  able  to  have  access  to  that  important 
airport. 

We recognize as all of you have talked about that it is a very lim-
ited  opening.  The  restrictions  are  very  very  onerous.  But  I  don’t 
think  we  should  lose  sight  of  how  important  this  first  step  is.  Be-
cause it means we are beginning to evolve our approach to security. 
After  9/11  we  had  a  very  crude,  effective,  but  crude  response  and 
that  was  to  immediately  ban  all  general  aviation  flights.  And  over 
time  we  began  to  bring  back  general  aviation,  we  brought  it  back 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

33

everywhere but Reagan National Airport. We continued to use that 
crude instrument of just creating a no fly zone. 

That needs to evolve. We need to find a way over time to do more 
with  less.  What  I  mean  by  that  is  we  need  to  do  more  security, 
with  less  interruption  to  our  individuals’  mobility,  and  the  open-
ness of our society. And so the first steps here at Reagan National 
Airport  are  really  important  because  they  say  we  are  going  to  do 
something that enhances security at Reagan National Airport, and 
at the same time facilitates mobility. And I think over time we con-
tinue to work on that and we can continue to evolve it. 

I  know  that  those  of  us  in  the  general  aviation  community  have 
been working very hard at how we can do that. NBAA, the commu-
nity  that  I  have  the  pleasure  and  honor  of  representing,  has 
worked  on  a  tool,  that  we  think  goes  a  long  way  toward  that.  It’s 
called  Transportation  Security  Administration  Access  Certificate 
(TSAAC).  It’s  a  pilot  program  that’s  been  instituted  in  the  New 
York area. Twenty-four companies are participating in it. They are 
providing  a  lot  of  information  to  the  TSA,  and  in  return  they  are 
receiving some benefit on international operations. 

In  some  ways  it’s  very  similar  to  a  registered  traveler  program 
for business aviation operators. And we would like to see that par-
ticular  program  rolled  out  on  a  nationwide  benefit.  We  think  the 
benefits  ought  to  be  expanded  beyond  international  waivers,  but 
perhaps  be  used  to  also  provide  access  to  temporary  flight  re-
stricted  airspace.  The  idea  on  a  lot  of  security  is  that,  with  trying 
to  find  a  terrorist,  you  are  trying  to  find  a  needle  in  a  haystack. 
With programs like the TSAAC you’re able to remove some of that 
hay and make it a little easier to find a needle in the haystack. So, 
were excited about that. 

But  as  I  said  before,  the  important  thing  for  us  is  to  constantly 
work  with  ourselves,  with  the  security  experts,  with  Congress  and 
with  the  TSA  to  constantly  try  to  find  security  initiatives  that  can 
simultaneously  enhance  security  but  also  promote  the  openness  of 
our society, and the mobility of our individuals. Because I think we 
believe that it’s important for us to preserve our national values at 
the  same  time  we  are  enhancing  security.  And  we  believe  it’s  ev-
eryone’s responsibility. 

So  we  look  forward  with  working  with  the  Committee  on  that 
and  I  want  to  also  take  the  opportunity  to  once  again  thank  you 
for the tremendous leadership that this Committee showed in mak-
ing the opening of Reagan National a reality. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Bolen follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ED BOLEN, PRESIDENT AND CEO, NATIONAL BUSINESS 

AVIATION ASSOCIATION 

Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  am 
pleased  to  be  here  today  representing  the  National  Business  Aviation  Association 
(NBAA).  While  I  have  testified  before  this  Committee  representing  GAMA  and  as 
a  member  of  the  FAA’s  Management  Advisory  Council,  this  is  my  first  opportunity 
to appear before you as the president and CEO of NBAA. 

Before  I  begin,  on  behalf  of  NBAA,  I  would  like  to  express  our  appreciation  and 
gratitude  to  the  Committee  for  their  ongoing  support  of  General  Aviation’s  efforts 
to  regain  access  to  Reagan  Airport.  I  would  also  like  to  commend  DHS  Secretary 
Chertoff  and  Deputy  Secretary  Jackson  and  the  leadership  at  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security  and  DOT  Secretary  Mineta  and  FAA  Administrator  Blakey  for 
their work to make this plan a reality. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

Facts About Business Aviation 

34

Today, there are over 10,000 companies in the United States that utilize General 
Aviation  aircraft  to  help  them  compete  in  what  has  become  a  global  marketplace. 
Business  aviation  operators  encompass  a  broad  cross-section  of  interests,  includ-
ing  businesses  (large,  medium  and  small),  governments,  schools  and  universities, 
churches, foundations, and charitable organizations.

most of which own and operate a single airplane.

• Approximately 85 percent of these companies are small or midsize companies—
• Surveys  indicate  that  86  percent  of  business  aircraft  passengers  are  marketing 
and  sales  personnel,  technical  experts,  other  company  representatives  and  cus-
tomers. Only 14 percent of passengers are top company managers.
• Piston-twins  and  turboprops  make  up  the  majority  of  the  business  aviation 
• Business aviation tends to fly at altitudes above or below the commercial airline 
traffic that prefers to operate in the range between 29,000 feet and 39,000 feet.
• We also tend to use different airports. In fact, business aviation represents less 
than  3.5  percent  of  the  total  operations  at  the  Nation’s  20  busiest  commercial 
airports.  The  ability  to  use  these  smaller,  less-congested  facilities  is  key  to  the 
value and flexibility of business aviation aircraft.

fleet.

General Aviation Security 

America  is  a  different  place,  41⁄2 years  after  September  11,  2001.  Security  is  at 
the forefront of our Nation’s conscience. But much has been done to reduce our vul-
nerability to terrorist attacks, especially within the aviation community. 

The General Aviation community, that segment of aviation that includes all activ-
ity except for the scheduled airlines and the military, has made significant security 
enhancements.  These  efforts,  while  no  less  important  than  those  designed  for  the 
commercial airline industry, have received less public attention which has led some 
to question whether General Aviation is less secure. The facts tell a different story. 
As a result of efforts from NBAA, government security agencies and other General 
Aviation interests, several important programs are now in place that proactively re-
duce the vulnerability of General Aviation:

• The  Airport  Watch  Program,  developed  by  AOPA,  encourages  pilots  at  General 
Aviation  airports  to  report  suspicious  activity  to  a  toll-free  number  staffed  24 
hours a day by TSA operations staff.
• The aircraft manufacturing and sales community has adopted procedures to re-
port suspicious financial transactions during the purchase or sale of an aircraft.
• The flight-training industry is complying with strict government standards that 
• The  FAA  has  begun  issuing  tamper-proof  licenses  for  pilots,  flight  instructors, 
air  traffic  controllers  and  maintenance  technicians.  Previously,  these  licenses 
were printed on readily available card-stock.

screen non-U.S. citizens seeking flight training in the United States.

censes issued by the FAA.

Pilots  must  now  carry  government-issued  photo  identification  in  addition  to  li-
• The  Nation’s  law  enforcement  agencies  have  cross-checked  the  FAA’s  airman 
• Chartered  business  aircraft  weighing  over  12,500  pounds  must  comply  with 

and aircraft registries against known terrorist and criminal databases.

TSA mandated security procedures similar to those of the scheduled airlines.

TSA’s Aviation Security Advisory Committee, consisting of government and indus-
try  security  experts,  developed  best  practices  and  recommendations  to  strengthen 
security at General Aviation airports.

These  specific  actions,  along  with  heightened  security  awareness  within  the  Gen-
eral Aviation community have reduced the vulnerability of General Aviation aircraft 
to terrorist activity. 

For everyone in General Aviation—which includes more than 200,000 air-
craft—the security of airports, including Reagan Washington National, and 
aircraft  is  paramount.  That’s  why  the  industry  voluntarily  worked  with  Federal 
officials  to  enhance  security  at  General  Aviation  airports  and  aircraft,  large  and 
small, following the 9/11 terrorist attacks. 
Transportation Security Administration Access Certificate (TSAAC) 

NBAA  has  worked  with  government  officials  to  take  even  further  action  on  Gen-
eral  Aviation  security.  NBAA  has  supported  the  Transportation  Security  Adminis-
tration  (TSA)  on  the  development  of  a  TSA  program  with  new  voluntary  security 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

35

procedures  for  personnel,  facilities,  aircraft  and  in-flight  operations.  The  program, 
which is in a test phase, is called the Transportation Security Administration Access 
Certificate, or ‘‘TSAAC.’’ Broader implementation of TSAAC would enhance security 
and could be used to enhance access to currently restricted airspace. 

In  2003,  NBAA  and  the  TSA  began  a  proof  of  concept  program  to  demonstrate 
the capability of the TSAAC program. The current test program involves 24 compa-
nies based at airports in Morristown and Teterboro, New Jersey, and White Plains, 
New  York.  These  companies  voluntarily  stepped  up  to  additional  security  require-
ments that focus on the aircraft, the facilities and the personnel. 

The program includes rigorous security requirements like: flight crew background 
checks; screening/inspection of passengers and baggage; integration of pre-flight, in-
flight and ground security programs; and, utilization of threat intelligence. Designed 
to provide the Federal Government with more information about some of the compa-
nies that operate General Aviation aircraft, the current TSAAC ensures appropriate 
security  practices  by  these  U.S.  companies  and  grants  additional  international  ac-
cess  in  return  for  compliance.  TSA  has  audited  all  24  participating  companies  and 
found each company in full compliance with the TSAAC standards. 

Voluntary  programs  that  provide  additional  privileges  are  not  new  to  either  the 
aviation  or  security  communities.  For  example,  the  airspace  surrounding  the  Na-
tion’s busiest airports requires aircraft to carry equipment such as a two-way radio 
and  a  transponder  and  also  requires  VFR  pilots  to  receive  permission  to  enter  the 
airspace.  In  return  for  these  equipage  requirements,  pilots  can  receive  clearances 
through that airspace which reduce travel time and increases government oversight 
of that flight. 

Similarly,  the  security  community  has  adopted  voluntary  programs  such  as  the 
TSA’s Registered Traveler (RT) program, currently being tested at five airports. Air-
line passengers who participate in the RT program submit to extensive background 
and personal history checks in exchange for expedited processing at airport security 
checkpoints.  Many  of  the  components  of  the  RT  program,  such  as  name,  address, 
phone  number  and  date  of  birth  along  with  biometric  data,  including  a  fingerprint 
and/or an iris scan would also prove valuable under the TSAAC program. 

In  both  of  these  scenarios,  participation  is  voluntary.  Pilots  who  have  no  need  to 
access  the  complex  airspace  surrounding  busy  and  congested  airports  do  not  need 
to  outfit  their  aircraft  with  expensive  equipment.  Those  same  aircraft  are  not  able 
to access reliever airports surrounding busy hubs as they often fall within the com-
plex airspace of the hub airport. Similarly, travelers not participating in the RT pro-
gram  cannot  access  special  screening  lines  at  the  TSA  airport  security  checkpoints. 
Finally, another program managed today by the U.S. Customs and Border Protec-
tion  Agency  contains  many  of  the  elements  used  in  the  TSAAC  program.  The  Cus-
toms  program  known  as  Customs-Trade  Partnership  Against  Terrorism  (C–TPAT) 
is  a  joint  government-business  initiative  to  build  cooperative  relationships  that 
strengthen  overall  security.  Through  this  initiative,  Customs  is  asking  businesses 
to  ensure  the  integrity  of  their  security  practices  and  communicate  their  security 
guidelines to their business partners. 

Participation  in  C–TPAT  requires  companies  to  sign  an  agreement  that  commits 
them to a number of actions including a security program that focuses on the facil-
ity,  theft  prevention,  and  information  security  controls.  The  program  emphasizes 
personnel security with emphasis on pre-employment screening and background re-
views, employee security training and internal controls. It also covers requirements 
for  service  providers  including  written  standards  and  internal  controls  for  their  se-
lection.  All  of  this  information  is  available  to  the  Customs  Department  which  may 
be  audited  at  any  time.  It  is  our  understanding  that  this  program  essentially  rep-
resents a registered traveler-type program for cargo. 

Simply  put,  these  voluntary  aviation  and  security  programs  that  provide  addi-
tional  benefits  to  participating  companies  and  individuals  have  been  successful  at 
focusing limited government resources on only those aircraft and people needing ad-
ditional attention. The TSAAC program would build upon these existing concepts for 
a  security  program  designed  for  those  with  a  need  to  access  restricted  airports  and 
restricted  airspace  in  return  for  additional  information  and  heightened  security 
standards. 

NBAA  believes  that  expansion  of  the  TSAAC  program  to  airports  and  operators 
beyond  the  New  York  City  area  will  yield  significant  benefits  for  government  secu-
rity  specialists  but  companies  need  an  incentive  to  participate  in  the  program.  The 
TSAAC  program  requires  the  submission  of  extensive  personal  and  corporate  infor-
mation,  allowing  the  government  to  conduct  a  thorough  security  assessment.  Last 
December,  the  TSA  announced  that  the  Agency  and  NBAA  ‘‘are  continuing  their 
successful  partnership  to  further  enhance  the  TSAAC . . .’’  As  stated  in  the  press 
release,  ‘‘The  TSAAC  program  is  a  cooperative  effort  that  enhances  security  by  en-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

36

suring appropriate security procedures are in place, while at the same time allowing 
increased  access  to  our  Nation’s  airspace.’’  We  look  forward  to  working  with  the 
Agency as they develop the details for the program’s expansion. 

TSAAC can serve as a foundation for a process to allow security-qualified General 
Aviation aircraft to have the same access to airspace and airports as the scheduled 
airlines.  Following  the  terrorist  attacks  of  September  11,  2001,  scheduled  airlines 
resumed  their  operations  within  days  while  most  General  Aviation  operations  were 
grounded for weeks, and in some cases months. Even today, General Aviation oper-
ations  are  restricted  from  certain  airspace  and  at  certain  airports.  The  post-9/11 
delay  in  the  resumption  of  General  Aviation  flights  and  continued  restrictions  on 
General  Aviation  access  to  airports  and  airspace  have  caused  significant  harm  to 
companies  and  communities  that  depend  on  this  important  form  of  transportation. 
A  key  reason  for  the  delay  in  the  resumption  of  General  Aviation  flights  and  the 
continued  restrictions  on  airspace  and  airports  is  that  those  charged  with  ensuring 
our Nation’s security have only limited knowledge of General Aviation operators and 
their security practices. This resulted in significant restrictions to General Aviation 
aircraft in the form of TFRs and restricted airspace. 

Domestic  flight  restrictions  create  significant  challenges  to  businesses  conducting 
time-sensitive,  mission  critical  flights.  Temporary  flight  restrictions  (TFRs)  that 
‘‘pop  up’’  with  little  notice  prevent  companies  from  developing  contingency  plans  to 
address restricted airports and airspace. Often this results in grounded aircraft un-
able to arrive or depart until the TFR expires. Since September 11 more than 3,000 
Temporary Flight Restrictions (TFRs) have been ordered over the Nation’s airspace. 
It  is  important  to  note  that  TSAAC  is  a  program  that  could  permit  approved  ac-
cess to TFRs and other security sensitive areas without restricting the government’s 
ability to issue TFRs. Airspace protection is a solemn responsibility of the U.S. gov-
ernment. TSAAC would simply provide the government with the ability to allow ad-
ditional security-qualified aircraft operators into secured airspace and airports. 
Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport 

Along with our efforts on TSAAC, NBAA has been a leading advocate of restoring 
General  Aviation  access  to  Ronald  Reagan  Washington  National  Airport.  Last 
month,  the  TSA  and  Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA)  announced  a  plan  to 
restore General Aviation flights to Reagan National Airport. We are grateful for the 
strong support for ending the prolonged closure of Reagan National Airport to Gen-
eral Aviation, which has taken a significant economic toll on the region, the Nation 
and certainly the business aviation community. 

More than $177 million already has been lost to the region’s economy as a result 
of the closure of Reagan National Airport to General Aviation, along with hundreds 
of jobs. It’s time to stop those losses and implement reasonable security protections 
while bringing economic activity back to the airport. The TSA’s plan is a significant 
move in the right direction. 

The  plan  to  reopen  Reagan  National  Airport  is  an  acknowledged  first  step  that 
has  taken  over  four  years  to  achieve.  Under  the  plan  developed  by  the  TSA  for  re-
opening  Reagan  National  Airport  to  General  Aviation,  even  tighter  regulations  will 
apply  than  those  required  of  commercial  flights.  That’s  not  our  opinion,  but  the  as-
sessment  of  the  plan  provided  by  former  Assistant  Secretary  of  Homeland  Security 
for  TSA  David  Stone.  When  the  plan  was  announced  last  month,  Admiral  Stone 
noted  that  it  strikes  a  good  balance  between  restoring  access  and  increasing  secu-
rity,  and  he  added:  ‘‘The  plan  exceeds  the  level  of  security  required  for  commercial 
aviation that currently operates in and out of Reagan Airport.’’

TSA has acknowledged the complexity of this plan and that some of the measures 
may be difficult to implement. NBAA looks forward to receiving more detailed infor-
mation about the plan once the Agency releases the Interim Final Rule because we 
have concerns over some of the more onerous aspects of the proposal. TSA has stat-
ed  that  they  will  continue  to  review  the  plan  and  make  adjustments  as  necessary. 
We  are  committed  to  working  with  TSA  as  the  Agency  implements  and  refines  the 
program. 

Both  the  TSA  and  General  Aviation  industry  recognize  that  the  airspace  sur-
rounding the Nation’s Capital is unique and requires special security procedures for 
access.  Because  of  this  uniqueness,  we  believe  that  the  security  procedures  estab-
lished  for  access  at  Reagan  National  Airport,  much  like  the  special  security  proce-
dures followed by the scheduled airlines, should remain at Reagan National Airport. 
These unique security requirements apply only for Reagan National Airport and not 
for  access  into  any  other  airport  in  the  U.S.  Recognition,  we  believe,  that  Reagan 
National Airport is unique but that these unique procedures do not require duplica-
tion elsewhere. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

37

If there is one thing that we hope our testimony will leave you with today is that 
business  aviation  is  committed  to  working  with  the  government  to  implement  rea-
sonable  and  effective  security  programs  because  transportation  and  access  to  air-
ports and airspace is critical to the success of companies and communities that rely 
on  business  aviation.  NBAA  stands  ready  to  assist  officials  at  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security,  TSA  and  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  as  they  review 
security  procedures  and  programs  affecting  the  business  aviation  community.  We 
believe  that  only  through  trust  and  cooperation  with  our  government  partners  will 
we  be  able  to  create  a  reasonable  and  effective  security  environment  for  business 
aviation. 

Once  again,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today  and  we  look 
forward to working with this Committee. I would be happy to answer any questions.

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Coyne. 

STATEMENT OF JAMES K. COYNE, PRESIDENT, NATIONAL AIR 

TRANSPORTATION ASSOCIATION 

Mr.  COYNE.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  other  members  of  the 
panel,  it’s  a  real  pleasure  for  me  to  be  here  for  one  very,  very  im-
portant reason. I would like to thank you, especially Senator Allen 
and to the Members of the Committee and the Administration who 
have  provided  such  leadership,  in  helping  us  reopen  National  Air-
port  to  general  aviation.  There’s  a  very  fundamental  reason  why  I 
believe  that  this  is  important.  And  that  is  that  I  believe  it  is  the 
core purpose of government. And especially this body and Congress 
to  determine  what  the  rules,  what  the  laws  are  that  allow  Amer-
ican  Citizens  to  do  what  they  want  to  do  safely  without  injury  to 
one another. After 9/11 the airlines were very quickly allowed back 
into National Airport. New rules were created for them. I represent 
through  the  National  Air  Transportation  Association  especially 
those  unscheduled  airline  operators  or  aircraft  operators,  charter 
operators,  people  that  we  call  our  on  demand  commercial  aviation 
businesses. 

Senator,  you  are  very  familiar  with  them  up  in  Alaska.  Alaska 
almost  couldn’t  exist  without  these  charter  operators.  These  are 
businesses just like the airlines. And all they wanted from day one 
after 9/11 was for their government to tell them what would be the 
rules  under  which  they  would  be  allowed  to  operate  their  busi-
nesses, just as the airlines were given rules under which to operate 
their  business  in  and  out  of  National  Airport.  And  frankly  I  have 
a  time  line  in  my  public  testimony  here,  which  I  hope  you  will  ac-
cept as part of the record, which shows month by month since vir-
tually a few weeks after 9/11 we maintained constant dialogue with 
FAA,  DOT,  Homeland  Security,  TSA  and  almost  every  month  we 
were told well we’re working on it, we’re working on it. It’s coming 
pretty soon. And had it not been for Senator Allen, your leadership 
Mr. Chairman, we would probably be still waiting. 

But  all  we  were  asking  for  from  our  government  was  for  them 
to give us the rules, to lay down the law by which we were willing 
to  operate.  And  now  thankfully  that  law,  those  rules  are  going  to 
be  coming  forth.  Now  that’s  not  to  say  that  we  are  going  to  like 
every  rule,  that—nobody  in  America  likes  every  rule  or  every  law. 
And  nobody  expects  every  rule  or  every  law  to  be  cast  in  concrete, 
or necessarily be one size fits all. But obviously we view this proc-
ess  as  beginning  today,  or  beginning  on  May  25th  with  a  process 
that will get us back eventually to the ability to serve all the Amer-
icans who want to use National Airport. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

38

What  we  call  in  our  industry  getting  back  to  normal.  Now  when 
I say that I don’t mean it’s ever going to be the same before it was 
9/11.  Clearly  the  world  is  different.  The  rules  should  be  different. 
But  the  ability  to  meet  the  needs  of  the  public,  to  meet  the  needs 
of  people  who  want  to  use  what  as  you  described  earlier  Senator 
Rockefeller  what  amounts  to  the  finest  form  of  transportation  we 
know in America: private personal aviation aircraft. We want to get 
that  back  to  normal  so  all  the  people  who  want  to  use  it,  can  use 
it. 

And the good news is, with new aircraft under development, with 
new economics more and more Americans are being able to use this 
new  high  quality  form  of  air  transportation  than  ever  before,  and 
thankfully so. Because as we have seen in many corners of America 
the quality of airline service has been going down. We want to get 
this  finer  service  available  at  National  for  anyone  who  can  use  it. 
Of  course  that’s  not  to  say  we  don’t  have  some  problems  with  the 
proposed rule. 

It’s  probably  premature  to  complain  about  it  before  it’s  actually 
been  issued.  But  it’s  been  widely  reported  and  I  think  you  all  dis-
cussed  in  your  comments  three  core  issues  that  are  kind  of  prob-
lems.  They  are  going  to  be  needed  to  be  looked  at  as  the  rule  is 
introduced, and operated. And believe me we are going to be there 
watching very closely to see if we can improve this rule. The three 
principal  rules—problems  that  occur  to  us,  are  the  portals,  the 
LEO issue, and the guarding the cockpit door issue. These are core 
tough issues we want to make sure we do right. 

Mr.  Chairman,  you’ve  addressed  that  fact  that  these—that  the 
current  rule  as  it  appears,  is  going  to  be  very  problematic.  And  I 
couldn’t  agree  with  you  more.  Having  12  portals  doesn’t  make 
sense. Senator Allen, you’ve clearly demonstrated in your comment, 
that  you  know,  virtually  a  quarter  of  the  country  is  going  to  turn 
around  to  fly  back  to  Palm  Beach  in  order  to  get  to  Washington 
National. That makes no sense. 

So  clearly  the  concept  of  a  limited  number  of  portals  has  got  to 
be  investigated  further.  In  my  discussions  with  TSA  leadership 
they  tell  me  that  the  reason  they  are  starting  with  12  is  because 
they  want  to  train  TSA  employees  into  doing  this.  They  want  to 
work  out  the  bugs  and  have  if  you  will  beta  sites  to  work  through 
and  figure  out  the  right—but  their  full  intent,  or  logical  intent  at 
least  is,  that  any  airport  where  there  are  TSA  employees,  there 
ought to be able to have a portal they to come in and out. 

Just like any airport that there is a Customs office, general avia-
tion airplanes can fly in there and take advantage of that Customs 
office.  So  that’s  our  hope,  that  over  time  virtually  every  airport 
that  has  TSA  employees,  and  perhaps  many  many  others  where 
they can be brought over in a timely basis will be able to meet this 
need. 

The  second  issue  of  course  is  the  LEO,  and  it  is  apparent  to  us 
that  this  is  something  that  was  insisted  upon  because  there’s  con-
fusion over the security of the cabin, of a general aviation aircraft. 
The  cabin  of  a  general  aviation  airplane  is  not  filled  with  150  or 
200  strangers.  It’s  going  to  be  filled  in  some  cases,  with  just  one 
or two people. I’m probably the only person here in this panel that 
actually  has  an  airplane  that  is  in  charter  use.  My  aircraft  was 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

39

chartered to people like Senator Allen, Jascha Haifitz to Yo-Yo Ma, 
these  people  chartered  my  airplane  by  themselves,  so  that  they 
could  take  their  cello  with  them  or  something,  to  go  give  a  speech 
some place on a short notice. To tell them that they’ve got to have 
a  law  enforcement  officer  in  the  plane  with  them,  strikes  me,  and 
them, and I think most Americans as a rather foolish thing to sug-
gest. But we understand that part of this is because there’s anxiety 
about whether the cockpit door is hardened. As was mentioned ear-
lier  the  cockpit  door  is  a  problem  because  the  design  of  small  gen-
eral  aviation  airplanes  doesn’t  provide  the  structural  support  that 
would  be  necessary  for  a  truly  hardened  cockpit  door.  But  there 
may very well be the ability to put, so for example, Kevlar netting 
between the cabin and the cockpit other forms of temporary equiva-
lencies to allow the same level of confidence. 

And  fundamentally  that’s  what  we’re  trying  to  get  to  from  day 
one. Is to show that we can, our charter industry and the business 
aviation  industry,  can  operate  in  and  out  of  National  Airport  with 
a higher and more secure level of safety and security than the air-
lines are doing. 

We  don’t  want  to  tell  the  airlines  we  don’t  want  to  break  there. 
I  don’t  think  it’s  fair  for  the  government  to  not  provide  rules  for 
us to operate there, and to meet the needs of our customers. Thank 
you very much, Mr. Chairman. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Coyne follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES K. COYNE, PRESIDENT, NATIONAL AIR 

TRANSPORTATION ASSOCIATION 

Chairman Stevens, Co-Chairman Inouye, and Members of the Committee: 
Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  state 
of general aviation security, particularly in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area. 
My name is James K. Coyne and I am president of the National Air Transportation 
Association  (NATA).  I  ask  that  my  full  statement  be  submitted  for  the  record. 
NATA, the voice of aviation business, is the public policy group representing the in-
terests  of  aviation  businesses  before  the  Congress,  Federal  agencies  and  state  gov-
ernments.  NATA’s  over  2,000  member  companies  own,  operate  and  service  aircraft 
and  provide  for  the  needs  of  the  traveling  public  by  offering  services  and  products 
to aircraft operators and others such as fuel sales, aircraft maintenance, parts sales, 
storage,  rental,  airline  servicing,  flight  training,  Part  135  on-demand  air  charter, 
fractional  aircraft  program  management  and  scheduled  commuter  operations  in 
smaller  aircraft.  NATA  members  are  a  vital  link  in  the  aviation  industry  providing 
services to the general public, airlines, general aviation and the military. 

Nearly  4  years  after  the  September  11,  2001,  terrorist  attacks,  the  general  avia-
tion  industry  continues  to  come  under  unprecedented  scrutiny.  Many  in  the  media 
and  government  have  labeled  the  industry  as  unregulated  and  inherently  lacking 
in security. Although nothing can be further from the truth, misleading reports and 
incendiary  statements  have  done  considerable  damage  to  the  industry’s  reputation. 
New  security  regulations  have  resulted  in  unfounded  mandates  that  have  placed  a 
significant financial strain on NATA members. 

Since  September  11,  2001,  NATA  members,  working  with  the  association,  have 
taken  a  proactive  step  to  improve  the  security  of  their  operations  before  being  or-
dered to do so by the government. Following the attacks, NATA formed the Business 
Aviation Security Task Force to develop ‘‘best practice’’ guidelines for fixed-base op-
erators,  air  charter  companies,  aviation  maintenance  providers,  and  flight  training 
schools. The Task Force issued a series of recommendations that NATA encouraged 
aviation businesses, their customers, and tenants to adopt. These recommendations 
included  background  checks  for  all  employees  with  access  to  aircraft;  implementa-
tion of security procedures including designation of a corporate security coordinator; 
posting of emergency numbers and a security mission statement; vehicle verification 
and escort; and identification and escorting of all flight crews and passengers. 

In addition to the Task Force’s recommendations, NATA has released its General 
Aviation  Security  Guide.  This  comprehensive  guide  and  CD–ROM  provide  rec-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

40

ommended security measures to be incorporated by fixed-base operations, line serv-
ice,  aircraft  charter  companies,  maintenance  and  avionics  service  providers,  flight 
schools, cargo handlers and other general aviation service entities operating an air-
port.  NATA  members  welcomed  these  comprehensive  recommendations  and,  to-
gether  with  using  recommendations  later  released  by  the  Transportation  Security 
Administration, have improved general aviation security as demonstrated by the ac-
tions of NATA member Fostaire Helicopters. 

Last year, in the midst of Orange Alerts and regular reports from the Department 
of  Homeland  Security  of  terrorist  activity,  NBC  News  producers  attempted  to  show 
the vulnerability of general aviation by preying on a St. Louis, Missouri-based heli-
copter charter operator and NATA member, Fostaire Helicopters. Sending unidenti-
fied men with cash and a desire to charter a helicopter immediately to Fostaire Hel-
icopters, the news organization thought they had a major story—showing how easily 
terrorists could charter an aircraft. Instead, Fostaire’s owners and employees stalled 
the  suspicious  customers  until  law  enforcement  authorities  arrived.  The  actions  of 
Fostaire’s employees demonstrate both the security of the general aviation industry 
as well as the mindset of thousands of general aviation employees. 
Twelve-Five Standard Security Program 

The  Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  (ATSA)  passed  in  November  2001 
included  a  provision  directing  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  to 
develop  regulations  implementing  security  programs  for  non-scheduled  commercial 
air carriers whose aircraft weigh more than 12,500 pounds. These regulations, popu-
larly  known  as  the  ‘‘Twelve-Five’’  and  the  ‘‘Private  Charter’’  rules,  became  effective 
in 2003, and have established effective security protocols for non-scheduled commer-
cial  air  carriers  to  enhance  what  is  arguably  already  the  most  secure  mode  of  com-
mercial air transportation today. NATA is proud to have played an integral part in 
the  implementation  and  rollout  of  the  Twelve-Five  Standard  Security  Program 
(TFSSP)  and  commends  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  as  well  as  its 
supporters  in  Congress  for  their  efforts  in  making  the  program  an  authentic  avia-
tion security success. 

Enhancements  and  refinements  to  the  programs  continue.  Today,  operators  must 
each  manually  check  passenger  and  employee  names  against  a  special  TSA-issued 
watch list. Operators accept this as a necessary, but cumbersome, security step. But, 
just  last  year,  as  part  of  the  Intelligence  Reform  Act,  Congress  instructed  the  TSA 
to  develop  a  system  whereby  operators  would  submit  names  to  the  agency  and  it 
would  vet  names  against  the  government’s  consolidated  terrorist  watch  list.  NATA 
worked  successfully  with  Members  and  staff  of  this  Committee  to  help  create  this 
solution  that  will  increase  the  effectiveness  of  the  TFSSP  and  ensure  greater  gov-
ernmental control over sensitive personal data while alleviating a significant burden 
on security program participants. 

However, even with the Twelve-Five program’s overall success, operators have yet 
to  realize  any  tangible  benefit  from  their  extensive—and  expensive—compliance  ef-
forts.  Put  simply,  even  though  these  operators  have  put  in  place  a  government-ap-
proved  security  program  equivalent  to,  if  not  more  secure  than,  those  employed  by 
scheduled  commercial  air  carriers,  the  Federal  Government  still  treats  all  non-
scheduled  operators  alike.  This  unjustified  parity  includes  banning  non-scheduled 
commercial  air  carriers  from  certain  airspace  or  grounds  them  altogether  on  the 
slimmest  of  suspicions  that  someone,  somewhere  could  possibly  use  an  aircraft  to 
commit a terrorist act. These Twelve-Five operators have invested thousands of dol-
lars  and  man-hours  to  comply  with  security  mandates  and  yet  are  treated  exactly 
the  same  as  operators  without  security  programs.  This  ‘‘one-size-fits-all’’  treatment 
of  non-scheduled  commercial  air  carriers  as  threats  to  national  security  must  end. 
NATA  believes  that  non-scheduled  carriers  in  compliance  with  a  TSA-approved  se-
curity program should receive similar airspace and access benefits as the scheduled 
carriers. 
Temporary Flight Restrictions 

Such  flight  restrictions  for  ‘‘Twelve-Five’’  operators  lead  me  to  my  next  point  of 
discussion,  the  issuance  of  temporary  flight  restrictions  (TFRs)  and  their  effect  on 
non-scheduled  operations.  So-called  ‘‘VIP  TFRs’’  are  usually  issued  when  either  the 
President or Vice President is traveling, or when a special event such as the Super 
Bowl  warrants  closing  the  airspace  for  security  reasons.  These  VIP  TFRs  and  all 
other TFRs act like a ‘‘bubble,’’ prohibiting non-airline passenger aircraft from flying 
within a specified distance of an area, usually about 10 miles. While this may seem 
like a small geographic area, this restriction usually centers on at least one airport, 
essentially closing that airport for the duration of the TFR. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

41

The difficulties resulting from these closures are that the closures usually are es-
tablished at the direction of the U.S. Secret Service with little or no notice and they 
ground  aircraft  at  an  airport  for  a  long  period  of  time,  wreaking  havoc  on  general 
aviation  businesses.  These  TFRs  were  especially  troublesome  during  last  year’s 
Presidential elections, when candidates from both parties traveled to essentially the 
same  small  number  of  states,  closing  airports  across  those  states  at  an  alarming 
rate. During one TFR last year, a chief executive officer of a major U.S. corporation 
was  told  that  he  and  his  staff  would  be  unable  to  fly  overseas  on  an  aircraft  they 
chartered  at  a  great  cost  because  the  airspace  was  closed  around  the  airport  from 
which they were taking off. Although the aircraft operator was part of the ‘‘Twelve-
Five’’  program  and  certified  by  the  TSA,  that  aircraft  was  grounded  and  that  oper-
ator lost a significant amount of money. 

NATA’s  efforts  to  get  the  Federal  Government  to  recognize  the  enhanced  level  of 
security  provided  by  the  TFSSP  have  paid  off  for  all-cargo  carriers,  however.  The 
approved language that now exists in most TFR descriptions permits all-cargo oper-
ators  complying  with  the  Twelve-Five  Standard  Security  Program  to  conduct  oper-
ations during VIP events that trigger TFRs. NATA and the Transportation Security 
Administration are continuing to work in partnership to advocate for enhanced TFR 
access for passenger flights under the TFSSP, and NATA hopes that similar permits 
for  passenger-carrying  TFSSP  operators  will  be  granted  by  the  TSA  and  the  Secret 
Service. Your support in this endeavor is greatly appreciated. 
Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport 

Like the double standard that exists with last-minute TFRs, the continued closure 
of  Ronald  Reagan  Washington  National  Airport  (DCA)  to  non-scheduled  operations 
remains  a  prime  example  of  the  misconceptions  that  general  aviation  is  less  secure 
than commercial air carriers. Since DCA’s closure in 2001, NATA has placed the re-
opening  of  non-scheduled  commercial  operations  at  DCA  at  the  top  of  the  associa-
tion’s  agenda.  The  proximity  of  DCA  to  downtown  Washington,  D.C.  provides  a 
unique opportunity to travel to and from our Nation’s capital city in a most conven-
ient  manner.  Prior  to  9/11,  this  was  a  time-saving  benefit  that  was  afforded  to  all 
flying  passengers.  Since  9/11  however,  this  convenience  has  been  denied  to  thou-
sands  of  aircraft  due  to  unspecified  security  concerns.  NATA  and  other  organiza-
tions representing the various facets of the general aviation industry have launched 
a vigorous campaign to reopen DCA to non-scheduled operations. The industry took 
its message of reopening DCA to all levels of the local and Federal Government, in-
cluding the Department of Transportation, Department of Homeland Security, Con-
gress, and the White House. 
Timeline 

The following is a timeline of the actions taken by NATA to reopen DCA to char-

ter and general aviation flights: 

September  2001:  NATA  forms  the  Business  Aviation  Security  Task  Force  to  de-
velop ‘‘best practice’’ guidelines for fixed-base operators, air charter companies, avia-
tion  maintenance  providers,  and  flight  training  schools.  The  task  force  issues  a  se-
ries of security recommendations that aviation businesses, their customers, and ten-
ants  were  encouraged  to  support.  Recommendations  include  background  checks  on 
all  employees  with  access  to  aircraft;  implementation  of  security  procedures  includ-
ing  designation  of  a  corporate  security  coordinator;  posting  of  emergency  numbers 
and  a  security  mission  statement;  vehicle  verification  and  escort;  and  identification 
and escorting of all flight crew and passengers. 

Spring  2002:  The  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT)  announces  completion  of 
a program to restore DCA to general aviation. NATA and other industry groups are 
briefed on a six-part plan to reopen the airport to general aviation operations. DOT 
halts this program in June 2002. 

March  2003:  NATA  files  a  petition  for  rulemaking  with  the  Federal  Aviation  Ad-
ministration (FAA). The petition calls on the FAA to initiate rulemaking that would 
establish security procedures necessary to allow general aviation aircraft to operate 
to and from DCA. 

June 2003: The FAA denies NATA’s petition for rulemaking. NATA then submits 
security  protocol  concepts  to  the  TSA  including  specific  proposals  to  permit  access 
to  DCA  for  non-scheduled  operations,  beginning  with  those  operators  with  TSA-
mandated security programs in place. 

Spring/Summer  2003:  NATA  launches  an  aggressive  campaign  on  Capitol  Hill  to 
secure support for reopening DCA. Over 60 U.S. House of Representatives and U.S. 
Senate  Members  send  President  Bush,  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS) 
Secretary Ridge, and others letters in support of reopening DCA to general aviation. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

42

December  2003:  Congress  passes  and  the  President  signs  the  FAA  Reauthoriza-
tion  Act,  Vision  100,  which  includes  language  directing  the  TSA  to  develop  a  plan 
within  30  days  that  would  allow  for  the  resumption  of  general  aviation  operations 
at DCA. 

March  2004:  After  months  of  inaction  by  the  TSA,  NATA  and  other  industry 
groups  testify  at  a  U.S.  House  of  Representatives  Subcommittee  on  Aviation  Hear-
ing held at DCA. 

July  2004:  At  the  request  of  NATA  and  other  general  aviation  groups,  15  Mem-
bers of Congress sign a letter to Secretary Ridge asking that the DHS provide regu-
lations for reopening DCA to general aviation ahead of time to general aviation op-
erators so they can quickly comply with the upcoming procedures. 

February  2005:  Working  closely  with  NATA  in  developing  language,  Sen.  George 
Allen introduces S. 433, which would require the Department of Homeland Security 
to issue regulations permitting the reopening of DCA to general aviation within six 
months.  Shortly  following,  Rep.  Tom  Davis  introduces  similar  legislation  in  the 
House (H.R. 911). 

April 2005: After meeting with NATA and other general aviation representatives, 
the U.S. House of Representatives Committee on Transportation and Infrastructure 
introduces  and  passes  legislation  requiring  DCA  to  open  to  general  aviation  within 
60 days. 

May  2005:  On  consecutive  days,  the  U.S.  House  of  Representatives  passes  two 
bills,  each  containing  provisions  mandating  the  return  of  charter  and  general  avia-
tion to DCA. The Department of Homeland Security Appropriations Act requires the 
DHS  to  reopen  the  airport  within  60  days  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Secu-
rity  Authorization  Act  gives  the  department  90  days.  Both  bills  are  approved  over-
whelmingly. 

After  over  31⁄2 long  years,  industry  efforts  have  begun  to  pay  off.  The  announce-
ment by TSA Administrator David Stone and FAA Administrator Marion Blakey on 
May 25th of the agencies beginning a plan to allow for the resumption of non-sched-
uled  flights  into  DCA  marked  a  milestone  in  our  efforts  to  open  the  last  airport  in 
the  country  closed  to  such  operations.  This  announcement  would  never  have  taken 
place without the help of our friends in the Congress, including many of you on this 
Committee. We sincerely appreciate all of the help you have given to our cause, and 
thank you for continuing to keep the pressure on the Administration to get the ball 
rolling.  I  am  enthusiastically  looking  forward  to  this  Labor  Day,  when  Signature 
Flight  Support  begins  to  welcome  its  first  charter  and  business  aircraft  in  nearly 
four years. 

In our efforts to reopen DCA to charter operations, NATA welcomed virtually any 
security plan that would allow the airport to accept air charter operations. We real-
ized that there were some in the Administration who strongly objected to permitting 
any  general  aviation  aircraft  to  use  DCA.  Thanks  to  the  leadership  of  the  Depart-
ment  of  Homeland  Security,  including  Secretary  Michael  Chertoff  and  Deputy  Sec-
retary  Michael  Jackson,  the  leadership  of  the  DHS  was  able  to  pull  all  of  its  agen-
cies  together  to  derive  a  plan  that  will  once  again  have  non-scheduled  operations 
flying into and out of DCA. Secretaries Chertoff and Jackson should be commended 
for taking leadership in getting this plan approved. 

With  the  Interim  Final  Rule  soon  to  be  released  by  the  department,  NATA  now 
looks  forward  to  working  with  the  DHS  to  discuss  some  of  the  issues  that  remain 
unresolved  on  this  policy.  The  requirement  to  equip  all  DCA  flights  with  an  armed 
Law Enforcement Officer (LEO) raises questions for our operators. We hope that as 
the plan moves forward, the DHS allows more than just Federally trained marshals 
to  serve  as  LEOs  on  these  flights.  Coordinating  effective  use  of  such  a  small  pool 
of approved LEOs will make it more difficult for operators to find armed officers to 
serve on these flights to DCA. A more progressive solution would be to broaden the 
pool  of  qualified  officers  to  include  local  law  enforcement  officials,  including  police 
officers  and  county  sheriffs,  provided  they  meet  certain  specifications.  There  is  no 
reason why local LEOs cannot be counted on to perform the same tasks as Federally 
trained officers on these operations. Armed law enforcement officials are considered 
one of the last lines of defense on these flights, and offering a wider pool from which 
to find qualified officers benefits both the operator as well as the government. 

NATA also has questions concerning who will be responsible for compensating the 
LEOs  aboard  non-scheduled  aircraft  using  DCA.  The  association  feels  that  placing 
the burden for compensating these officials on aviation businesses will undoubtedly 
serve as a deterrent for using the airport. The Federal Government should take re-
sponsibility  for  this  compensation,  as  it  is  an  issue  of  both  local  and  national  secu-
rity.  The  costs  associated  with  paying  for  an  armed  officer  for  what  could  amount 
to  a  significant  period  of  time  will  make  it  quite  difficult  for  many  air  carriers  to 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

43

participate in the program. NATA notes that scheduled airlines are not required to 
pay a specific fee when LEOs serve on their flights. 

While  we  have  concerns  with  some  of  the  provisions,  we  nonetheless  whole-
heartedly  welcome  this  opportunity  to  demonstrate  the  capabilities  and  security  of 
our industry. However, we want to make it clear that the department and Congress 
should  absolutely  make  certain  that  these  requirements  do  not  cause  undue  finan-
cial or logistical burdens that will ultimately leave most operators unable to use the 
airport. Non-scheduled air charter operators are more than willing to make the rea-
sonable  necessary  upgrades  in  security  and  comply  with  any  regulation  put  forth 
by  DHS  that  will  allow  them  to  use  the  airport,  but  the  government  should  take 
the  steps  necessary  to  ensure  that  as  many  qualified  operators  as  possible  are  able 
to take part in this important program. 

Overall,  we  are  delighted  to  see  the  government  moving  forward  with  a  plan  to 
allow  general  aviation  at  Ronald  Reagan  Washington  National  Airport  in  the  com-
ing months. This plan is long overdue; but now that it is here, we can demonstrate 
to the rest of the country and the world the safety and security of the general avia-
tion industry. 
Conclusion 

We  ask  that  as  Congress  continues  to  seek  ways  to  improve  the  overall  security 
of  our  aviation  system,  you  recognize  the  implications  of  security  directives  on  all 
facets  of  the  industry,  including  non-scheduled  operations.  On-demand  air  charter 
and  other  general  aviation  operators  participate  in  a  number  of  Federally  sanc-
tioned security programs yet are still deemed unregulated and unsecured by many. 
Non-scheduled  operators  participating  in  programs  certified  by  the  TSA  should  be 
allowed  the  same  airspace  and  airport  access  as  the  scheduled  airlines  and  should 
be recognized as being just as secure as the airlines. 

As  we  move  forward  in  a  post-September  11  world,  NATA  is  eager  to  work  with 
both  the  Congress  and  the  Administration  in  easing  any  concerns  you  may  have 
about the security of our operations. NATA has worked well with officials on Capitol 
Hill and in the agencies to foster relationships that have proved beneficial for every-
one  involved.  Our  relationship  with  the  TSA  has  never  been  stronger,  and  I  would 
like  to  take  the  opportunity  to  commend  Admiral  Stone  on  the  job  he  did  as  TSA 
Administrator.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  the  new  leadership  of  the  TSA  as 
well  as  others  in  the  government  to  spread  the  message  that  general  aviation  is 
paying close attention to the security of our industry. 

Thank  you  again  for  this  opportunity  to  testify,  and  I  look  forward  to  answering 

any questions you may have.

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Cebula. 

STATEMENT  OF  ANDREW  V.  CEBULA,  SENIOR  VICE
PRESIDENT,  GOVERNMENT  AND  TECHNICAL  AFFAIRS,
AIRCRAFT OWNERS AND PILOTS ASSOCIATION 
Mr.  CEBULA.  Good  afternoon  Senator,  I  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity  to  be  here  I’m  Andy  Cebula  with  the  Aircraft  Owners  and 
Pilots  Association.  I’m  representing  400,000  pilots  and  aircraft 
owners. So when you see me, think of all those people in your home 
states.  More  than  two-thirds  of  all  pilots  in  the  United  States  are 
members  of  AOPA.  I  have  to  tell  you  that  they  take  security  re-
sponsibilities very seriously. 

However,  they  also  tell  us  that  they  are  concerned  about  what 
kind  of  requirements  get  imposed  on  small  aircraft.  They  are  con-
cerned that this may reduce their access to airports and air space. 
One  of  the  most  important  principles  that  we  feel,  is  that  it  has 
to  be  recognized  that  the  threat  posed  by  piston  engine,  general 
aviation  aircraft,  is  minimal.  In  November  of  2004  the  GAO  did  a 
report  on  general  aviation  security  and  said  the  small  size,  lack  of 
fuel capacity, and minimal destructive power of most general avia-
tion  aircraft  make  them  unattractive  to  terrorists  and  thereby  re-
duce the possibility of threat associated with their misuse. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

44

We  read  this  as  saying  it’s  imperative  that  the  government  use 
a  risk-based  approach.  Now  looking  at  the  events  of  May  11th  of 
this year. I have to tell you we find it unacceptable. We ran an ad 
in  the  U.S.  Today,  and  in  Roll  Call,  you  have  a  copy  of  it  there 
with  you.  Because  we  wanted  to  make  this  clear,  the  air  space  is 
charted,  there’s  notices  to  airmen  that  are  in  place.  We  have  free 
flight  planning  software  that  we  make  available  to  all  members 
that depict temporary flight restricted areas. We want you to know 
that  this  incident  is  not  looked  on  highly  by  the  general  aviation 
community and it doesn’t reflect us. 

However it does underscore that reason must be applied as Con-
gress and the agencies address issues of national security. A small 
slow flying aircraft does not propose the major terrorist threat. On 
that day I think the intercept pilots understood and responded ap-
propriately. Since 9/11 there have been significant enhancements to 
general  aviation  security.  Much  of  that  is  due  to  the  work  of  this 
Committee.  Senator  Rockefeller,  you  were  very  instrumental  last 
year for the requirement for the pilots certificate to have the photo-
graph on it. Senator Allen, obviously your work on Washington Na-
tional.  But  since  9/11  there  have  been  new  security  requirements 
that  pilots  are  vetted  and  their  names  are  cross  checked  against 
terrorist watch lists. Flight training candidates are screened, flight 
instructors  receive  security  training.  Pilots  have  to  carry  govern-
ment-issued  picture  IDs.  State  and  local  governments  have  re-
sponded  with  new  security  procedures  and  equipment  at  general 
aviation airports, and the airspace can at anytime and anyplace be 
closed or limited to pilots anywhere in the country. 

The  majority  of  what  our  members  tell  us,  that  security  has 
changed since 9/11 at their airport. We are also as an organization 
committed  to  working  with  the  TSA  and  FAA  on  security  and  also 
with  educating  general  aviation  about  security  requirements.  Last 
year  we  spent  nearly  $5  million,  that’s  $5  million  e-mail  alerts 
about  airspace  restrictions  that  occurred  in  the  local  area  of  pilots 
across  the  country.  AOPA  and  our  safety  foundation  have  devel-
oped  8  specific  training  tools  for  the  ADIZ  and  post  9/11  airspace 
operations.  Including  a  soon  to  be  released  program  on  the  laser 
visual warning system here in the Nation’s Capital. 

And  since  it’s  launch  in  2002  AOPA  has  invested  a  million  dol-
lars  in  association  funds  in  the  Airport  Watch  Program.  That  pro-
gram  is  supported  by  all  segments  of  the  general  aviation  commu-
nity  along  with  local  municipalities,  states,  the  FAA,  TSA  and  a 
list  of  over  550,000  general  aviation  pilots  to  watch  for  and  report 
suspicious activities. 

Pilots  can  report  suspicious  activities  to  the  TSA  using  the  gen-
eral aviation hotline. I would have to say while the community has 
generally  accepted  all  of  these  initiatives,  one  air  space  restriction 
is  particularly  troubling.  And  that  is  the  air  defense  identification 
zone  here  around  the  Nation’s  Capital.  It  adversely  affects  safety. 
It’s  costly  to  operate,  and  it’s  negatively  impacting  aviation  busi-
ness.  From  our  perspective  it  doesn’t  work.  It  was  established  as 
a  temporary  security  measure  in  February  of  2003.  That  was  17 
months  after  9/11  when  the  threat  level  was  raised,  and  it  never 
was removed once the threat level was lowered. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

45

There’s  a  graphic  that  you  have,  but  the  actual  airspace  that  it 
covers  is  huge.  It  includes  19  public  use  airports.  It  captures  10 
thousand  pilots  over  2,100  hundred  aircraft  who  account  for  about 
a  million  operations  per  year.  It  spans  about  90  miles  stretching 
from West Virginia across the Chesapeake Bay to Maryland’s east-
ern shore to just—and south just to Fredericksburg, Virginia. 

It has quadrupled the controller workload and it’s created signifi-
cant safety concerns for pilots in the air that are forced to hold and 
waiting  to  enter  the  ADIZ.  It  distracts  them  from  their  important 
see  and  avoid  responsibilities,  as  they  are  operating  their  aircraft. 
The 15 mile flight restricted zone, this inner core protects the sen-
sitive  areas  of  the  Nation’s—the  National  Capital  Region  in  re-
cently  put  into  place  laser  visual  warning  system  to  alert  pilots 
straying  into  protected  air  space,  and  it’s  enhanced  security  along 
with  ground  based  missile  defenses.  Congress  has  called  on—for 
operational improvements to the ADIZ but as of yet there is no evi-
dence this has been met. Neither has the aviation community been 
invited  to  engage  in  discussions  about  operational  improvements 
with the Federal agencies. 

The  FAA  is  now  moving  to  make  the  ADIZ  permanent  through 
rulemaking. AOPA opposes this and asks this Committee to require 
the  FAA  to  give  pilots  the  opportunity  to  have  a  meaningful  infor-
mation exchange about the best way to provide security in the Na-
tional Capital Region. 

Thank you for the opportunity to be here. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Cebula follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ANDREW V. CEBULA, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, 

GOVERNMENT AND TECHNICAL AFFAIRS, AIRCRAFT OWNERS AND PILOTS ASSOCIATION 
Good  morning,  my  name  is  Andy  Cebula,  Senior  Vice  President  Government  and 
Technical Affairs, of the Aircraft Owners and Pilots Association (AOPA). AOPA rep-
resents over 400,000 pilots and aircraft owners—more than two-thirds of all the pi-
lots in the United States. 
AOPA Members and General Aviation Security 

The individuals that we represent are your constituents and I want to share with 
you their anxiety about Congressional action related to general aviation security. In 
a  recent  survey,  over  90  percent  expressed  their  concern  that  issues  related  to 
homeland  security  threatened  general  aviation  operations  in  the  national  airspace. 
Likewise,  84  percent  expressed  concern  that  security  measures  mandated  by  Con-
gress would adversely affect their ability to fly. My purpose today is to explain what 
has been done to enhance general aviation security since 9/11 and some of the cur-
rent challenges being faced by AOPA members. General aviation is an essential part 
of  the  air  transportation  system,  serving  over  18,000  private  and  public  airports  in 
communities  across  the  country,  carrying  over  166  million  passengers  per  year. 
There are 5,400 public use airports. 

General  aviation  security  is  a  responsibility  taken  seriously  by  AOPA  and  its 
members. Before 9/11, general aviation security focused primarily on preventing air-
craft  theft  and  airspace  regulations  were  typically  safety  related.  However,  in  the 
last three and a half years that has changed dramatically, the general aviation com-
munity and the government have responded with programs to enhance the security 
of pilots, aircraft and airports, and airspace. Security, previously not thought much 
of by the general aviation community, has become a top priority. 

While  the  average  airline  passenger  has  seen  little  change  in  the  basic  security 
process  since  2001,  the  typical  general  aviation  pilot  has  witnessed  tremendous 
changes  with  numerous  new  security  requirements.  Pilots  are  vetted,  their  names 
are  cross  checked  against  terrorist  watch  lists,  new  security  procedures  and  equip-
ment  has  been  implemented  at  general  aviation  airports,  and  the  airspace  can  at 
anytime and anywhere be closed or limited to pilots anywhere in the country. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

46

Given  the  relative  low  speed  and  small  size  of  the  majority  of  general  aviation 
aircraft, AOPA has advocated improving general aviation security, but doing so rec-
ognizing the low threat it posses to the Nation. As we begin to look at the improve-
ments  to  general  aviation  security,  it  is  helpful  to  establish  some  comparative 
benchmarks. 
General Aviation and National Security—Small and Slow 

The typical AOPA member operates an aircraft like a Cessna 172 Skyhawk. There 
are  more  than  25,000  Cessna  172  Skyhawk’s  registered  in  the  United  States,  mak-
ing  it  the  most  popular  general  aviation  airplane.  This  four-seat  airplane  operates 
at  about  twice  the  speed  of  a  car  (120  mph),  has  an  average  maximum  weight  of 
2,300  pounds,  carries  40  gallons  of  fuel  and  has  a  useful  load  (after  full  fuel)  for 
people  and  baggage  of  around  500  pounds.  A  Cessna  172  is  less  in  size  and  weight 
than a typical compact car like the Honda Civic, which weighs around 2,600 pounds. 
The  number  of  general  aviation  aircraft  stolen  is  down  sharply  since  the  general 
aviation community took steps to enhance security since the late 80’s to discourage 
aircraft thefts that were used mostly for drug smuggling. According to the most re-
cent statistics available from the Aviation Crime Prevention Institute, in 2003, there 
were only six aircraft stolen nationwide. 

The  combination  of  these  factors  and  security  enhancements  put  into  place  since 
9/11  limits  the  desirability  of  general  aviation  for  illicit  uses.  Independent  analysis 
by  government  agencies  concurs  with  this  assessment.  A  November  2004  Govern-
ment  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  report  on  General  Aviation  Security,  concurred, 
noting  that  ‘‘the  small  size,  lack  of  fuel  capacity,  and  minimal  destructive  power  of 
most general aviation aircraft make them unattractive to terrorists and, thereby, re-
duce the possibility of threat associated with their misuse.’’ 

The  report  found  that  most  of  the  airports  GAO  visited  had,  on  their  own  initia-
tive,  established  a  number  of  security  enhancements,  using  either  airport  revenue 
or state or Federal grant money to fund some of the enhancements. The report con-
cludes  that  continued  partnerships  between  the  general  aviation  industry  and  the 
government, such as AOPA’s Airport Watch program, are vital to the long-term suc-
cess of efforts to enhance security at the Nation’s general aviation landing facilities. 
With  this  information  as  a  prelude,  let  us  examine  the  improvements  in  general 

aviation security and current challenges. 
AOPA’s  Airport  Watch—Cornerstone  of  General  Aviation  Security  Aware-

ness 

With  over  18,000  public  and  private  general  aviation-landing  facilities,  the  gov-
ernment  cannot,  nor  is  it  necessary  to  regulate  or  directly  oversee  airport  security 
at  these  facilities.  Recognizing  that  general  aviation  airports  are  similar  to  small 
communities,  AOPA  worked  with  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  to  develop 
and  implement  the  Airport  Watch  program.  Much  like  a  neighborhood  watch  pro-
gram, this Airport Watch enlists the support of some 550,000 general aviation pilots 
to  watch  for  and  report  suspicious  activities  that  might  have  security  implications. 
Since  December  2002,  TSA  receives  reports  of  suspicious  activities  through  the 
general  aviation  hotline  866–GA–SECURE  (1–866–427–3287).  The  Airport  Watch 
program  and  the  general  aviation  hotline  are  critical  elements  of  general  aviation 
security. The program serves as a centralized reporting system for general aviation 
pilots,  airport  operators,  and  maintenance  technicians  wishing  to  report  suspicious 
activity at their airfield. 

The  program  materials  are  the  Airport  Watch  brochure  explaining  the  program 
and what to watch for, warning poster, warning decal, warning sign, and an instruc-
tional  video  featuring  the  Secretary  of  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security.  The 
Airport Watch program has been actively supported by the TSA, FAA, Civil Air Pa-
trol,  aviation  businesses  on  airports,  pilot  groups,  manufacturers,  and  state  depart-
ments of transportation. 

In  launching  the  program,  AOPA  distributed  Airport  Watch  materials  to  all 
550,000  general  aviation  pilots  and  5,280  public-use  general  aviation  airports. 
AOPA  continues  to  make  program  materials  available  and  during  the  past  12 
months  AOPA  has  fully  funded  efforts  to  send  additional  Airport  Watch  materials 
to  pilots  and  aviation  officials  in  Iowa,  Massachusetts,  Tennessee,  and  New  Jersey. 
Since the program’s inception, AOPA has spent more than $1 million of Association 
funds  in  developing,  distributing  and  promoting  the  Airport  Watch  program.  An-
other industry-wide mailing is anticipated later this year. 

Congress has shown its support of the Airport Watch program with directive lan-
guage  in  the  Homeland  Security  Appropriations  bill  for  the  past  2  years,  and  the 
House-passed Homeland Security Appropriations bill for FY06, which contains fund-
ing for an additional nationwide educational and promotional effort. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

47

The  Airport  Watch  concepts  have  been  proven  to  work.  Even  though  actionable 
calls  are  rare,  they  have  been  viewed  as  beneficial.  Time  and  again,  the  TSA  has 
praised  the  valuable  information  they  receive  from  pilots  reporting  suspicious  be-
haviors. Below is a small sampling of reports taken through the Airport Watch pro-
gram.

• In Kansas, the Airport Watch concepts caught an accused con man. Airport em-
ployees  became  suspicious  and  contacted  authorities  when  a  man  tried  to  rent 
aircraft at several different FBOs, claiming to be a pilot. At one location, he left 
the space for the pilot certificate number blank. Others who dealt with him said 
that  for  someone  who  supposedly  owned  and  flew  aircraft,  the  suspect  didn’t 
seem to know much about aircraft systems.

• In  St.  Louis,  two  suspicious  individuals  offered  to  pay  cash  for  a  charter  heli-
copter  flight,  they  presented  driver’s  licenses  from  two  different  states  while 
their car was registered in a third state and had backpacks and odd shaped lug-
gage  that  caught  the  attention  of  an  FBO  employee.  While  another  employee 
stalled the suspects, the first employee contacted authorities. Authorities discov-
ered  box  cutters  and  other  potential  weapons  hidden  inside  the  suspect’s  bags. 
It  was  later  determined  the  suspects  were  actually  news  reporters  from  New 
York trying to do a story on how a terrorist could hijack a helicopter.

• In  Ohio,  a  Certified  Flight  Instructor  reported  to  the  general  aviation  security 
hotline a student who during ground school review and instructional flight time 
asked  questions  about  how  background  checks  are  done,  and  how  long  they 
take.  He  also  asked  the  instructor  numerous  questions  about  lowest  levels  to 
fly  to  avoid  radar,  how  to  find  power  plants  if  not  on  sectional  maps,  and  how 
close can they be flown to. Federal officials followed up by conducting a criminal 
and watch list check of the student.

• In Georgia, an aircraft charter company reported a suspicious caller who want-
ed  to  reserve  a  flight  for  11  to  12  passengers  to  fly  to  Washington  Dulles  Air-
port.  The  caller  was  elusive  when  asked  for  his  name,  credit  card,  and  pas-
senger  information.  He  provided  a  company  name  with  a  tax  ID  number  that 
did not match. Federal Authorities were following up.

• In Arkansas, an airport manager reported receiving two phone calls from a sus-
picious  person  with  a  heavy  accent  inquiring  to  store  an  aircraft  and  some 
equipment  inside  a  hangar  for  about  three  weeks.  The  manager  was  concerned 
due to the airports proximity to a nuclear power plant.

• In  Minnesota,  a  flight  instructor  received  a  suspicious  telephone  call  from  an 
unknown  individual  requesting  flight  training  for  a  Korean  citizen.  When  the 
caller was advised a background check was required, he abruptly ended the call. 
The  instructor  was  able  to  obtain  the  telephone  number  from  the  caller  ID. 
Local FBI was notified and is conducting an investigation.

Airspace Restrictions 

Immediately  following  the  tragic  events  of  four  commercial  airliners  being  hi-
jacked  to  be  used  as  weapons  against  the  United  States  on  the  morning  of  Sep-
tember 11, 2001, the FAA issued a Notice to Airman (Notam) grounding all civil air 
traffic. This historic action was unprecedented and underscored the concern security 
policy  makers  had  about  civil  aircraft  being  used  as  weapons.  It  set  the  stage  for 
changes  in  security  policies  for  the  commercial  airline  industry  and  the  general 
aviation community. 

The  report  to  Congress,  ‘‘Improving  General  Aviation  Security’’  issued  in  Decem-
ber  2001,  by  the  newly  formed  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA) 
launched the strategy for addressing security of general aviation. This included air-
space restrictions, scrutiny of pilots and improvement of their credentials, and secu-
rity enhancements for general aviation airports—and the all-important issue of edu-
cating  the  pilot  community.  One  of  the  underlying  principles  is  the  importance  of 
balancing  security  requirements  with  the  threat  that  general  aviation  presents. 
That is one of the reasons the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) has adopted 
risk-based  approaches  to  security—balancing  the  cost  for  security,  the  limitations 
and restrictions, with the security benefits. 

It is absolutely essential, that any security requirements do not eliminate the very 
industry they are designed to protect. If that occurs, the terrorists have won. Many 
pilots are asking this very question about the airspace restrictions in the Baltimore-
Washington,  D.C.  area  (National  Capital  Region).  Just  last  week,  over  5,000  pilots 
visited  our  headquarters  in  Frederick  Maryland  and  the  most  discussed  topic  was 
the flight restrictions around the National Capital Region. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

48

Expanded use of Temporary Flight Restrictions 

To  understand  the  general  aviation  perspective  on  the  National  Capital  Region 
airspace,  it  is  important  to  recognize  that  prior  to  9/11,  Temporary  Flight  Restric-
tions  (TFRs)  were  issued,  but  were  typically  smaller,  shorter  duration,  and  did  not 
come  with  the  severe  penalties  for  violations.  Today,  a  pilot  can  face  FAA  enforce-
ment  action  including  the  loss  of  their  pilot  certificate  and  the  extreme  prospect  of 
loosing their life by being shot down for violating a TFR. As an example of the mag-
nitude  of  airspace  restrictions,  anytime  the  President  travels  a  30-mile  TFR  is  es-
tablished. Last year there were over 200 of these TFRs. 
National Capital Region—Airspace Restrictions 

While  much  of  the  emphasis  on  general  aviation  has  been  access  to  Washington 
Reagan  National  Airport  and  this  Committee  is  to  be  commended  for  its  work  to 
reopen this airport to general aviation the majority of AOPA members are concerned 
about  the  airspace  restrictions  around  the  National  Capital  Region.  As  illustrated 
in  the  chart,  there  are  two  areas  of  airspace  restrictions  on  general  aviation  oper-
ations  created  since  9/11,  the  inner  ring  Flight  Restricted  or  ‘‘No  Fly’’  Zone  (FRZ) 
and the outer Air Defense Identification Zone (ADIZ). 
Air  Defense  Identification  Zone  Surrounding  the  15-Nautical-mile  Radius  Flight

Restriction Zone 

Flight Restricted Zone—sensitive areas of the Nation’s Capital 

In  the  days  following  9/11  the  FAA  implemented  a  total  ban  on  general  aviation 
operations  in  the  15-mile  radius  FRZ,  sometimes  referred  to  as  the  ‘‘No-Fly-Zone’’ 
that extends from ground level to 18,000 feet around Washington, D.C. In February 
of  2002,  the  FAA  partially  lifted  this  ban  by  allowing  limited  operations  at  College 
Park and Potomac Airports, as well as Hyde Field in Maryland. Until then, no gen-
eral aviation aircraft could operate to or from these airports, referred to as the ‘‘DC–
3’’  unless  the  aircraft  was  based  at  the  airport  prior  to  9/11  AND  the  pilot  has  un-
dergone FBI fingerprinting and criminal history record check before being permitted 
to  operate  under  very  strict  flight  rules.  This  meant  that  all  three  general  aviation 
airports were closed to all but 300 based aircraft since 9/11. 

For many AOPA members the DC–3 airports were the aviation access point to the 
Nation’s  Capital,  essentially  the  light  aircraft  operator’s  Washington  Reagan  Na-
tional Airport. That is why we were pleased when the TSA in February of this year 
allowed vetted transient pilots to apply to operate at the DC–3 airports. These pilots 
must  undergo  the  same  rigorous  background  check  as  pilots  based  at  the  airport. 
Pilots  are  required  to  complete  an  FBI  fingerprint  background  check  and  security 
training  prior  to  receiving  a  unique  PIN  code  to  operate  in  the  FRZ.  Underscoring 
the  importance  of  these  airports  to  AOPA  members,  just  this  past  weekend,  over 
180  pilots  took  advantage  of  the  opportunity  to  complete  two  of  the  three  required 
steps by participating in a seminar held during AOPA’s Fly-In. 
Washington,  D.C.—29  months  after  9/11  the  Air  Defense  Identification  Zone

Established 

The  FRZ  was  deemed  to  be  sufficient  for  the  29  months  following  9/11.  This  was 
due  in  part  to  the  large  Washington,  D.C.  Class  B  airspace  area  over  the  capital 
region that requires all aircraft contact air traffic control (ATC) and obtain a clear-
ance  to  enter  the  airspace.  Additionally,  all  aircraft  operating  in  the  Class  B  air-
space must remain under positive ATC contact. 

However, in early February 2003 over a weekend, the general aviation community 
was told by the TSA that a Washington, D.C. ADIZ would be established as a tem-
porary  security  measure  in  response  to  an  increase  to  the  National  Threat  Level 
Alert status and the pending hostilities in Iraq. 

The  Washington,  D.C.  ADIZ  is  huge,  encompassing  19  public-use  airports,  over 
10,000  pilots,  2,147  aircraft,  accounting  for  nearly  one  million  operations  per  year. 
Geographically,  the  ADIZ  spans  a  distance  of  90-miles,  stretching  from  the  tip  of 
West  Virginia,  across  the  Chesapeake  Bay  to  Maryland’s  Eastern  Shore  and  south 
to just outside of Fredericksburg, Virginia. 

To fly in the ADIZ, all general aviation aircraft must comply with operational pro-
cedures  similar  to  those  designed  for  instrument  flying.  Specifically,  all  pilots  must 
file and activate a flight plan with a Flight Service Station (FSS), and obtain a dis-
crete transponder code from Air Traffic Control (ATC) or FSS. Once in the air, pilots 
must  maintain  two-way  radio  communication  with  ATC,  squawk  the  assigned  code 
on  their  transponder,  and  fly  according  to  the  flight  plan  while  following  instruc-
tions from the ATC until they are outside the ADIZ boundary. 

In  the  months  following  the  ADIZ  implementation,  the  Federal  Government  sub-
sequently  decreased  the  National  Threat  Level  Alert  Status  to  Yellow,  and  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

49

President  declared  an  end  to  the  major  fighting  in  Iraq.  The  Federal  Government 
has  taken  steps  to  eliminate  all  the  heightened  security  measures  related  to  the 
Code  Orange,  including  eliminating  an  ADIZ  over  New  York  City,  and  a  TFR  over 
downtown Chicago, IL when the threat level was lowered. 

Despite  the  fact  that  the  threat  level  was  lowered,  more  than  two  years  ago,  the 
ADIZ  remains  in  place.  AOPA  has  also  learned  that  there  is  currently  a  proposed 
rule at the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) to make the ADIZ permanent, 
something that AOPA opposes. 

The ADIZ adversely affects safety, is costly to operate, and is negatively impacting 

pilots and aviation businesses—it doesn’t work. 

Because  it  is  such  an  anomaly,  the  ADIZ  creates  operational  challenges  that  the 
government  has  been  unable  to  remedy.  Even  experienced  pilots  and  aviation  offi-
cials  are  often  confused  in  regard  to  its  requirements  and  procedures.  As  a  result, 
in  addition  to  the  high-profile  violations  that  occasionally  make  the  news,  there 
have  been  numerous  military  and  police  aircraft  that  have  violated  the  ADIZ  air-
space. This underscores the need for change. 

Operationally,  the  ADIZ  has  been  a  disaster  affecting  pilots  and  slowly  smoth-
ering  the  businesses  that  employ  people  in  the  National  Capital  Region.  With  the 
ADIZ in place, the limited resources of the government and congested airspace have 
created  unnecessary  safety  risks  for  both  general  aviation  and  commercial  flights. 
Because  the  ADIZ  requires  that  all  aircraft  be  on  a  flight  plan,  controller  workload 
has  quadrupled.  The  increased  workload  for  controllers  consequently  often  diverts 
controllers from their primary responsibility, traffic separation. 

Significant  safety  concerns  also  arise  for  pilots  in  the  air.  Pilots  and  ATC  report 
that  aircraft  forced  to  circle  outside  the  ADIZ  while  waiting  for  a  discrete  beacon 
code  creates  safety  problems.  There  are  safety  implications  of  forcing  multiple  air-
craft  to  circle  and  loiter  over  common  points  while  they  wait  to  enter  the  ADIZ.  In 
one  instance,  a  pilot  faced  an  unexpected  delay  to  enter  the  ADIZ,  ran  out  of  fuel, 
and made a forced landing. Thankfully no one was seriously injured, but the aircraft 
sustained extensive damage. 

Inside the ADIZ, a visual flight rule (VFR) pilot’s attention is divided between his 
traditional  ‘‘see  and  avoid’’  responsibilities  and  compliance  with  complicated  ADIZ 
requirements.  The  air  traffic  controllers  even  have  a  policy  memo  making  it  clear 
that VFR aircraft flying in ADIZ are not receiving traffic advisories—creating confu-
sion because the pilots expect this when talking to ATC. 

The ADIZ was designed and is currently staffed as a temporary measure. We un-
derstand  that  it  costs  the  FAA  $18  million  per  year  to  operate  the  ADIZ  ($8M  for 
ATC  cost  and  $10M  related  to  enforcement  actions).  The  ADIZ  requirements  have 
overloaded the ATC system and pilots continue to experience extreme difficulties in 
gaining access to the 19-public use airports in the ADIZ. The Air Traffic system was 
not  designed  to  support  the  increased  workload  caused  by  imposing  Instrument 
Flight  Rule  (IFR)  operational  requirements  on  VFR  traffic  and  the  FAA  does  not 
have  the  resources  in  place  to  effectively  manage,  for  extended  periods  of  time,  the 
volume of general aviation traffic requiring access. 

Contacting  ATC  via  landlines  has  led  to  delays  that  ranged  from  10  minutes  to 
over  two  hours  because  of  the  ADIZ.  Likewise,  pilots  attempting  to  obtain  discrete 
codes via clearance delivery on the ground also experienced delays of up to 45 min-
utes while holding at the runway threshold with the engine running. 

The  current  system  does  not  deal  well  with  routine  situations  that  occur  while 
flying. Even a small power surge can reset a transponder, and as we have seen with 
the  recent  violation  by  a  Canadian  pilot,  aircraft  do  occasionally  have  difficulties 
with lightning. The shear size of the ADIZ combined with the fact that a minor me-
chanical  difficulty  can  technically  cause  a  pilot  to  violate  the  airspace,  means  that 
the  probability  of  future  problems  is  high.  Pilots  have  difficulty  meeting  ADIZ  re-
quirements 

There  have  been  a  few  high  profile  ADIZ  violations,  including  the  May  11  viola-
tion by a Cessna 150, and a transponder failure on the plane carrying the Kentucky 
Governor.  From  January  2003  to  July  2004,  the  FAA  has  tracked  2,000  ‘‘tracks  of 
interest’’  ranging  from  cloud  formations  and  flocks  of  birds  to  aircraft  infringing  on 
the Washington airspace. 

For  the  general  aviation  community,  the  May  11  event  was  unacceptable.  Cer-
tainly  the  pilot  knows  that  and  has  apologized.  However,  it  also  underscores  that 
there  must  be  reason  applied  as  Congress  and  agencies  address  issues  of  national 
security.  A  small,  slow  flying  aircraft  does  not  present  a  major  terror  threat.  On 
that day, the intercept pilots understood this and responded appropriately. 

AOPA  has  continually  heard  from  pilots  on  the  difficulties  with  the  ADIZ.  Below 

is a list of a few short examples that help highlight the issue:

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

50

1.  Medical  Airlift  Pilot  Suspended.  The  operator  of  a  medical  helicopter  legally 
departed an airport inside the ADIZ. The helicopter was observed by controllers 
to  be  in  the  vicinity  of  the  airport  transmitting  the  proper  squawk  code.  The 
aircraft  remained  in  constant  communications  with  air  traffic  control;  however, 
during  the  flight  the  transponder  momentarily  reset  causing  it  to  squawk  the 
wrong code for a period of less than two-minutes. When notified, the pilot imme-
diately  corrected  the  code.  Unfortunately,  the  incident  has  resulted  in  the  FAA 
proposing to suspend this medical pilots flight privileges for 30-days.
2.  Transponder  Failure  Near  Home  Airport.  An  aircraft  departing  Leesburg, 
Virginia was notified by ATC that the transponder was not working. The trans-
ponder  was  cycled  several  times.  The  pilot  was  told  to  depart  the  ADIZ,  and 
notified that he would not be allowed back in. The pilot notified departure that 
the aircraft would return to Leesburg, the base airport for the aircraft in order 
to have it fixed (aircraft was less than two miles away from the airport at that 
time).  Upon  landing,  the  pilot  was  notified  that  landing  does  not  constitute  de-
parting the ADIZ and the FAA is pursing an investigation and enforcement ac-
tion against the pilot.
3. Two-Hour Wait For Departure Clearance. On a Saturday afternoon, the pilot 
of  an  aircraft  in  the  Manassas  Virginia  area  reported  trying  at  least  40  times 
with  a  busy  phone  signal  to  get  thru  to  Flight  Service  to  file  an  ADIZ  flight 
plan  to  depart  the  area.  After  calling  Potomac  Approach,  he  finally  got  an  an-
swer. The controller told him to call back in five minutes and relayed they were 
so overloaded they were holding all VFR ADIZ departures for approximately one 
hour. This pilot eventually got thru and received his transponder code to depart. 
The whole process took two hours.

For these reasons and others, AOPA has continually sought changes to the ADIZ 
and  continues  to  believe  that  a  more  reasonable  approach  can  be  taken  for  lighter, 
smaller aircraft. 

Congress has supported attempts to make changes to the ADIZ. Vision 100 (Pub. 
L. 108–176) contained a section requiring a report to Congress on changes in proce-
dures or requirements that could improve the operational efficiency or minimize the 
operational impacts of the ADIZ on pilots and controllers. The law also calls for the 
FAA  to  justify  the  necessity  of  the  ADIZ.  Unfortunately,  Federal  agencies  have  not 
been capable of fulfilling the requirements of the law. 

Looking  at  all  this  from  a  security  perspective—none  of  the  ADIZ  violations  or 
‘‘tracks  of  interest’’  has  been  tied  to  terrorism.  It  raises  the  question,  ‘‘Is  the  ADIZ 
worth the cost?’’ 

Is the ADIZ worth the cost? 
As the GAO pointed out in its analysis of general aviation, to date, there has been 
no systematic or detailed assessment analyzing the security threat posed by general 
aviation  in  the  Washington  area.  Further,  the  government  has  made  no  serious  at-
tempt to analyze whether the ADIZ measurably increases security. Certainly the se-
curity of the President and Congress are paramount, but security measures such as 
the  ADIZ  should  be  imposed  only  after  a  careful  analysis  of  the  threat  and  the  ac-
tual benefits of proposed security measures. Maintaining the ADIZ costs more than 
$18  million  dollars  for  the  FAA  alone  and  the  economic  losses  of  the  general  avia-
tion community are estimated in the millions. 

To  improve  the  data  on  the  economic  impacts,  AOPA  has  contracted  with  a  firm 
to conduct an analysis of the cost of the ADIZ and anticipate that we will have this 
completed  by  the  end  of  the  summer.  The  ADIZ  is  slowly  smothering  an  industry 
that  generates  almost  $123  million  in  economic  activity  for  the  Washington  region 
each  year,  and  which  accounts  for  more  than  60  percent  of  aircraft  operations  in 
the  National  Capital  Region.  The  impact  on  the  local  aviation  economy  has  been 
dramatic.  The  ADIZ  has  caused  reductions  in  the  number  of  aircraft  based  at  air-
ports in the ADIZ, a decrease in flight activity, resulting in a dramatic domino effect 
on  businesses  that  support  aviation.  The  last  time  AOPA  surveyed  the  ADIZ  air-
ports  we  learned  that  there  has  been  a  30  to  50  percent  decrease  in  business  at 
these  airports.  Fuel  sales  have  decreased  as  much  as  45  percent  at  some  airports. 
If  the  ADIZ  is  not  eliminated  or  modified,  it  could  permanently  jeopardize  the  eco-
nomic viability of general aviation operations in the Washington area. 
Government Security Enhancements to the National Capital Region 

Although  rumored  to  be  in  existence  for  some  time,  a  story  in  the  February  27, 
2005  issue  of  the  Washington  Post  validated  that  missile  batteries,  intended  to 
shoot  down  aircraft,  augment  the  National  Capital  Region  airspace  security.  While 
the hope is these would never be necessary, their presence illustrates an additional 
capability available to defend the Region. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

51

Likewise, last month the Department of Defense implemented its Visual Warning 
System (VWS) that enables them to notify pilots that have flown into the protected 
airspace  in  the  National  Capital  Region.  A  series  of  red  and  green  laser  lights  sig-
nals a pilot that they have flown into an area without meeting the security require-
ments  necessary  for  entry.  This  is  another  tool  to  protect  the  seat  of  the  Nation’s 
government and is supported by AOPA. 

From  a  government  and  industry  prospective,  both  public  and  private  resources 
are  limited,  requiring  that  security  measures  as  extreme  as  the  ADIZ  should  not 
be  imposed  without  a  careful  cost-benefit  analysis.  Considering  the  enhancements 
made to security in the area, the experiences since it was implemented and the se-
curity  enhancements  outlined  later  in  this  statement,  AOPA  believes  it  is  time  to 
reexamine  the  ADIZ  to  determine  whether  its  questionable  contribution  to  security 
justifies  the  high  costs  it  has  imposed  on  the  industry.  Unless  such  a  justification 
is  produced,  the  ADIZ  should  be  eliminated  or  modified  to  provide  an  equivalent 
level of security in a less intrusive way. Improving General Aviation Security. 

Significant progress has been made in enhancing the security of general aviation. 
Nearly  60  percent  of  AOPA  members  reported  to  the  Association  earlier  this  year 
that  there  has  been  a  noticeable  increase  in  the  security  at  their  home  airport. 
There  is  also  an  amazing  commitment  by  general  aviation  pilots  to  help  by  serving 
as  the  eyes  and  ears  for  security  at  local  airports  through  AOPA’s  Airport  Watch 
program. Over 80 percent of the members operating at general aviation airports are 
aware of the program. 

Congress, TSA, FAA, and state legislative and executive branches have also acted 
on general aviation security since 9/11. The requirements related to pilots have been 
significantly increased. 

Government  security  requirements  on  pilots  have  increased  dramatically  since  9/

11. 

Shortly after the events of September 11, current and student pilots in the FAA’s 
databases  were  reviewed  for  links  to  known  or  potential  terrorists.  This  has  now 
been enhanced by the TSA and FAA Airman Revocation regulation that enables the 
agencies to prevent an applicant from receiving a pilot certificate, or revoke one al-
ready issued to individuals that are deemed to pose a security threat to the United 
States. Through the Aviation and Transportation Security Act and Vision 100, Con-
gress  specifically  directed  the  TSA  to  establish  procedures  for  notifying  the  FAA  of 
the identity of individuals known to pose a risk to aviation. 

Building  on  a  Congressional  requirement  for  screening  of  individuals  receiving 
flight  training  in  large  aircraft  (12,500  lbs.  and  above),  on  September  21,  2004,  the 
TSA  issued  an  interim  final  rule  requiring  proof  of  citizenship  and  background 
checks  for  all  individuals  receiving  flight  training,  regardless  of  the  size  of  the  air-
craft. U.S. citizens must prove citizenship before receiving flight training and all for-
eign flight students are required to complete a fingerprint background check process 
with  the  TSA.  The  rule  requires  individuals  to  validate  their  status  with  the  TSA 
for  initial  training,  multi-engine  training  or  training  to  receive  an  instrument  rat-
ing. 
The Pilot’s Credential—Improving This Important Piece of Identification 

Responding to the need for improvements in the pilot’s paper certificate that does 
not  contain  a  photograph,  AOPA  took  a  rare  step  in  February  2002,  by  asking  for 
an immediate final rule mandating that pilots carry, and present for inspection, gov-
ernment-issued  photo  identification.  This  was  viewed  as  an  interim  step  to  be  re-
placed  by  an  FAA  issued  pilot  certificate  with  a  photograph.  Later  that  year,  Octo-
ber 2002, the FAA issued the final rule implementing this requirement. 

Work  continues  on  improving  the  security  of  pilot  certificates.  In  July  2003,  the 
FAA  began  to  issue  new  difficult-to-counterfeit  pilot  certificates  to  be  used  in  con-
junction with government issued photo identification. 

In  December  2004,  through  the  leadership  of  Members  of  the  Senate  Aviation 
Subcommittee,  the  National  Intelligence  Reform  Act  (NIRA)  of  2004,  mandated  the 
development of an improved pilot certificate that includes a photograph of the pilot 
and  the  ability  to  record  biometric  information  within  one-year.  While  AOPA  sup-
ported the concept, we were pleased the legislation included provisions to allow the 
use of FAA designees for facilitating the photographic information, rather than man-
date pilots visiting the limited number of FAA facilities. For pilots, this will greatly 
improve  the  accessibility  of  providing  this  information  to  the  FAA  and  eliminates 
opposition  to  the  requirement.  The  FAA  successfully  makes  use  of  designees  in 
many of its requirements the one most obvious to pilots is for medical certification. 
It  is  our  understanding  that  the  FAA  is  developing  a  rule  to  meet  this  require-

ment. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

Airports and Aircraft 

52

The  general  aviation  community  and  TSA  work  together  to  develop  essential  air-

port security guidelines. 

The  TSA  has  also  been  active  in  improving  general  aviation  security.  One  of  the 
major  initiatives  of  the  TSA  was  addressing  security  at  the  18,000+  landing  facili-
ties  across  the  country.  The  vast  difference  in  size  between,  for  example,  a  rural 
Alaska  airport  and  a  busy  general  aviation  facility  near  a  major  metropolitan  area 
necessitates  that  a  one-size-fits-all  policy  will  not  work  and  could  easily  consume 
massive  government  resources  with  little  security  benefit.  TSA  sought  to  address 
this reality by developing a set of guidelines for all airports. 

In May 2004, the TSA published its ‘‘Security Guidelines for General Aviation Air-
ports.’’ These guidelines were developed under the Aviation Security Advisory Com-
mittee  and  provide  a  list  of  recommended  security  best  practices  for  airport  opera-
tors,  sponsors,  and  tenants.  The  Aviation  Security  Advisory  Committee  is  a  broad-
based  group  including  victims  of  terrorist  acts  against  aviation,  law  enforcement 
and  security  experts,  government  agencies,  aviation  consumer  advocates,  airport 
tenants and general aviation, airport operators, airline labor and management, and 
air cargo representatives. 

The  guidelines  also  include  an  assessment  tool  to  discriminate  security  needs  at 
differing  airports.  This  tool,  the  Airport  Characteristics  Measurement  Tool,  helps 
airport  operators  assess  the  local  situation  at  their  airport  and  helps  operators  de-
termine which security enhancements would be most appropriate. 
On the Horizon—Vulnerability Assessments 

In  addition,  as  part  of  Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directive  7  (HSPD–7), 
DHS was required to develop a National Critical Infrastructure Protection Plan and 
Sector Specific Security Plans. Section 4001 of Public law 108–458, the ‘‘Intelligence 
Reform and Terrorism Prevention Act of 2004’’ required DHS to submit the National 
Strategy for Transportation Security, including the modal security plans by April 1, 
2005. 

One  component  of  those  plans 

is  an  assessment  of  vulnerabilities  and 
prioritization  of  transportation  assets.  The  General  Aviation  Vulnerability  Identi-
fication  Self-Assessment  Tool  (VISAT)  is  currently  in  development  and  is  expected 
to be out in late summer/early fall. This tool will:

• Capture  a  snapshot  of  the  general  aviation  airports  baseline  security  system.
• Provide general aviation airport operators with a vulnerability assessment tool.
• Assist the airport in the development of a comprehensive security plan. Assess-
ment tools for other modes of transportation, such as regulated ports, have been 
developed.  When  complete,  the  tools  will  work  together  to  evaluate 
vulnerabilities  across  multiple-transportation  modes  in  order  to  determine  re-
sources  needed  to  protect  critical  infrastructure.  TSA  recently  provided  several 
airport operators the opportunity to demonstrate the tool and to offer feedback.
AOPA  and  Pilots  are  Extremely  Involved  in  State  and  Local  Security

Efforts 

Virtually  all  states  have  taken  action  to  improve  general  aviation  security.  For 
many  of  the  Nation’s  5,400  public-use  airports,  the  local  pilots,  airport  managers, 
law enforcement and first responders are the critical element of general aviation se-
curity. 

These  airports  also  range  from  small  grass  strips  with  just  a  few  based-aircraft, 
to  large  centers  of  general  aviation  activity  with  an  air  traffic  control  tower.  This 
wide range of airport necessitates a broad range of security programs and responses. 
The  Airport  Watch  program  has  been  accepted  and  promoted  by  nearly  every  state 
in  the  country  as  an  efficient  means  to  enhance  security  by  successfully  enlisting 
pilots and other individuals who routinely work or fly at an airport. 

Many  states  and  local  municipalities  have  taken  additional  steps  to  improve  the 

security of their general aviation airports. Below are a few examples:

• The State of Virginia has provided their general aviation airports with security 
audit  checklists  and  manuals  to  help  airports  assess  vulnerabilities  and  tailor 
appropriate security measures to their facilities.
• The State of Tennessee has helped in distributing more than $1 million in Fed-
eral grants to aid general aviation airports statewide for the installation of bet-
ter security lighting, fencing and gates.
• New Jersey requires airports to display emergency contact information, has es-
tablished  a  communications  system  for  all  airport  managers  in  the  state  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

53

has  issued  an  RFP  for  a  closed  circuit  television  surveillance  system  to  be  in-
stalled at many of their public use airports.

• In Massachusetts, the Massachusetts Aeronautics Commission has issued a set 

of security directives for all airports in the commonwealth.

• California passed a state law that allows the Division of Aeronautics to provide 
the  entire  local  match  to  a  general  aviation  airport  receiving  an  AIP  grant  for 
security projects such as fencing, gates, and lighting.

• Florida  passed  state  legislation  that  requires  many  public  use  general  aviation 
airports  to  implement  a  security  plan  consistent  with  guidelines  published  by 
the Florida Airports Council.

• The  State  of  Washington  contracted  with  a  consultant  to  do  a  security  assess-

ment of public use general aviation airports.

These  efforts  are  paying  off  in  visible  ways.  In  a  recent  survey  of  our  members, 
78  percent  of  members  say  their  general  aviation  airport  has  a  fence  while  nearly 
60  percent  have  said  they  have  seen  a  noticeable  increase  in  security  implemented 
at  their  local  airport  since  September  11.  The  majority  of  AOPA  members  reported 
that  they  lock  or  store  their  aircraft  inside  a  locked  hangar.  In  addition,  nearly  all 
AOPA  members  say  they  are  familiar  with  Airport  Watch  and  that  their  local  air-
port  has  posted  signs  requesting  pilots  to  report  all  suspicious  activity  to  1–866–
GA–SECURE. 
AOPA Educational Efforts 

AOPA  is  committed  to  working  with  the  FAA  and  TSA  to  educate  pilots  about 

general aviation security requirements. These efforts include:

• Direct e-mails to AOPA members anytime TFRs are issued. In 2004, there were 
209 TFRs. During this time, AOPA sent 4,772,210 e-mails to members alerting 
them to airspace restrictions and changes

• AOPA  Web  site  is  continuously  updated  with  all  announced  airspace  restric-
tions and has devoted an entire section of the front page to educating members 
on post 9/11 security measures.

• AOPA’s  monthly  magazine,  AOPA  Pilot,  runs  an  airspace  story  in  every  issue. 
This  magazine  reaches  over  400,000  pilots  each  month.  Furthermore,  AOPA 
Pilot runs an expanded feature story on airspace about three times a year.

• Air Safety Foundation training programs—AOPA’s Air Safety Foundation (ASF) 
has committed substantial efforts to educating pilots with much of this work fo-
cusing  on  the  Washington,  D.C.  ADIZ.  The  AOPA  Air  Safety  Foundation  has 
also developed interactive airspace instruction programs and printed advisories 
and education materials distributed through industry, FAA, and TSA.
Highlights of the AOPA and ASF work that focus on the ADIZ include:
• ADIZ Graphical Web Page—The graphical web page lists all FAA Notams, pro-
vides a plane language description and provides a graphical depiction of the air-
space, providing a one-stop-shop for pilots.

• AOPA’s  Real  Time  Flight  Planner—This  interactive  program  allows  pilots  to 
plan  a  flight  from  point  to  point,  while  seeing  the  ADIZ  and  Temporary  Flight 
Restrictions.

• ADIZ  Checklist—Easy  to  understand  handout  that  pilots  can  take  into  aircraft 

to ensure compliance with the ADIZ procedures.

• ADIZ Frequently Asked Questions—ADIZ questions from pilots and detailed an-

swers with research help from the appropriate Federal agency.

• ADIZ  Interactive  Presentation—An  interactive  program  that  specifically  high-

lights ADIZ operations and procedures.

• ASF  ‘‘Know  Before  You  Go’’  Online  Course—A  course  developed  to  educate  pi-

lots on a wide range of security restrictions implemented since 9/11.

• ASF  ‘‘Airspace  For  Everyone’’  Safety  Advisory—A  detailed  handout  that  exam-
ines  the  airspace  structure  and  how  pilots  are  expected  to  operate  with-in  it, 
including an explanation on in-flight intercept procedures.

• Coming  Soon—ASF  ‘‘Visual  Warning  System’’—A  training  program  designed  to 
educate pilots on the new visual warning light system being used to alert pilots 
to incursions in the ADIZ.

Clearly,  AOPA  is  committed  to  doing  all  possible  to  train  and  educate  pilots  on 

security related information. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

Summary 

54

The government and the general aviation community have taken numerous steps 
to  enhance  the  security  since  9/11.  AOPA  is  committed  to  continue  the  Airport 
Watch  program,  pilot  education  and  outreach,  and  work  with  Congress,  TSA,  FAA, 
and state and local government to implement appropriate security measures for gen-
eral aviation. 

However, there are grave concerns that the pilot community has over the continu-
ation  of  the  ADIZ.  In  its  current  form  it  simply  does  not  work,  jeopardizing  safety, 
imposing  significant  cost  on  the  government  and  the  aviation  community  for  ques-
tionable  security  benefit.  With  the  implementation  of  general  aviation  security  en-
hancements,  AOPA  contends  that  it  is  time  to  either  eliminate  or  dramatically 
change the requirements of the Washington, DC ADIZ. 

Again,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  this  morning;  I  would 

be pleased to respond to any questions.

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  That’s  exactly  what  we 
are starting right now. Unfortunately I have to go to another meet-
ing, and I’d ask Senator Allen if he will close this meeting. But we 
do intend to ask that these people come up and tell us how we are 
proceeding  on  some  of  these  rules.  Everyday  there  are  containers 
coming  through  this  city,  that  came  from  anywhere  off  shore  and 
that  haven’t  been  inspected.  There  are  people  coming  in  on  trains 
carrying  bags  and  boxes.  There  are  people  driving  trucks  and  cars 
through this city. And somehow or another we get just spastic over 
the  fact  that  someone  might  fly  an  airplane  in  here  because  of 
what  happened  on  9/11.  And  I  say  that  9/11  people  overreacted  to 
what the Commission did, to the concept of general aviation becom-
ing a weapon of terrorists. Anything could become a weapon of ter-
rorists, but the concept that there’s a threat there in general avia-
tion  field  as  there  is  in  containers,  there  is  in  regulation  of  trucks 
and  so  many  other  things  I  think  is  misplaced.  I  do  believe  this 
Committee  ought  to  know  what  they  are  planning  to  do.  Because 
if they carry out what they got out there right now, it will kill gen-
eral aviation. And that’s no answer. 

And  if  that  happens  I’d  say  Senator  to  you,  I  again  have  to  get 
an  exception  for  Alaska.  You  are  not  regulating  your  buses,  you’re 
not  regulating  your  trucks,  you’re  not  regulating  your  trains,  you 
are not regulating your containers, but when you regulate aviation 
you  regulate  me.  Everything  in  my  state  moves  by  air.  Seventy-
eight  percent  of  inter-city  travel,  inner-city  travel  is  by  air.  And 
north of Fairbanks everything is by air. You can’t get to an Eskimo 
village  except  by  air.  Now,  are  we  going  to  put  locks  on  the 
Cessna’s  doors  in  order  to  take  the  freight  into  an  Eskimo  village. 
There  has  to  be  some  common  sense  in  this,  and  I  hope  to  work 
with you to make sure there is. Will you finish this for me, please? 
Senator  ALLEN [presiding].  Thank  you  to  our  witnesses,  and  I 
will ask some questions and then turn it over to the Ranking Mem-
ber from West Virginia, Senator Rockefeller. Thank you all for your 
testimony. This is a positive step, and while we sometimes focus on 
some  of  the  practicalities,  and  logistics,  we  do  want  to  commend 
TSA  for  finally  belatedly  doing  this,  but  they  have  done  it.  I  am 
glad  they  have  and  we  don’t  have  to  go  through  the  whole  legisla-
tive  process,  which  is  very  long  and  burdensome.  Any  of  you  all 
could testify. 

Can  any  of  you  estimate  how  much  adhering  to  these  new  regu-
lations costs per flight? If any of you all have you done a cost esti-
mate?  I  know  these  are  preliminary  regulations,  but  you  have  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

55

law  enforcement  officers,  obviously  a  cost.  And  I  know  you  have 
views  on  that.  Do  you  all  have  any  estimate  of  what  the  average 
cost per flight would be? 

Mr. COYNE. Well, if I can I think at the low end I mean it’s con-
ceivable  that  somebody,  for  example  we  have  a  charter  operator 
that I was with yesterday who was hiring law enforcement officers 
as  pilots.  So  they  may  provide  charter  service  in  and  out  of  Na-
tional with already vetted law enforcement up front, kind of getting 
rid of two birds with one stone if you will. 

So for that operator the only significant cost depends upon where 
the person is coming from. If the person is departing from a portal 
airport  where  this  pre-screening  is  relatively  easy  and  there’s  no 
additional  cost  for  stopping  en  route  at  another  airport,  you  really 
can  have  relatively  modest  impact.  Now  clearly  the  preliminary 
discussions  with  TSA  suggest  they  are  going  to  be  charging  about 
$150  dollars  both  inbound  and  outbound  for  the  cost  they  are  as-
signing and absorbing, and passing onto the users. This is what we 
hear preliminarily. 

And then in addition there’s the additional cost. Now at the high 
end  you  could  have  somebody  who  is  literally  flying  in  from  Los 
Angeles,  and  has  to  stop  in  Lexington  and  pick  up  a  law  enforce-
ment  officer  there  and  pay  for  his  time  and  trouble  to  come  into 
Washington  and  buy  him  a  plane  ticket  to  get  back  to  Lexington. 
And  so  you  could  very  easily  if  you  add  up  all  those  costs  in  addi-
tion  to  $300  in  TSA  fees  you  could  very  easily  have  a  $2,000  or 
$3,000 added cost. So really it’s over a range. But I think the aver-
age cost to me in my mind, preliminarily, is going to be in the $600 
to $800 per flight additional costs, given the current expectation of 
the cost of law enforcement officers. 

Senator ALLEN. Do the witnesses generally agree with that? 
Mr. BOLEN. I think that’s ballpark. 
Mr. CEBULA. I think that’s the range. 
Senator  ALLEN.  As  this  base  plan  initially  kicks  off,  how  much 
usage  do  you  envision  with  these  requirements?  In  other  words,  I 
know  that  the  general  aviation  community  feels  like  we  have  had 
a  victory.  This  is  a  threshold  breakthrough  victory.  But  as  a  prac-
tical  matter,  do  you  foresee  a  large  number  of  your  members? 
You’re probably the best Mr. Coyne for it, but the point is——

Mr. COYNE. Yes, I don’t want to hog the microphone, I had a very 
good  long  discussion  with  this  issue  with  the  President  of  Signa-
ture  yesterday.  So  I’ll  pass  along  her  estimates,  because  they  are 
the FBO at National Airport as you know. 

Senator ALLEN. And lost many, many jobs when they shut down, 

and millions of dollars every year. 

Mr.  COYNE.  And  millions  of  dollars  absolutely.  And  probably 
won’t make any money at all when this is reimplemented. Because 
they’re frankly expecting an average of somewhere between 15 and 
20  flights  a  day,  if  things  go  reasonably  well.  But  a  wide  variety 
of  that—I  mean  there  will  be  some  days  certainly  where  it’s  a  lot 
less  than  that.  And  obviously  you  know  the  maximum  is  24  in-
bound and 24 outbound with the 48 slots. We would be—you know 
we  view  this  as  a  first  step.  This  is  going  to  be  burdensome  and 
expensive  and  confusing.  A  lot  of  people  are  going  to  be  intimi-
dated. In the practical sense, the real benefit to our customers and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

56

our  marketplace  are  for  those  thousands  of  people  who  used  to 
come into Washington on a turn around. They want to come in and 
meet with a government official. They want to meet with Congress, 
they want to get home in time for dinner with their family. 

And  there  were  thousands  of  people  every  year.  This  was  a  way 
to  come  to  Washington  whether  you  were  coming  from  Farmville, 
or Newport News, or whether you were coming from Texas or Colo-
rado.  You  could  get  to  Washington,  meet  your  Congressman  and 
get home. 

That still is going to be a challenge under these rules because of 
the  need  to  stop  and  land  at  a  portal  inbound.  But—many  people 
may  decide  to  fly  inbound  to  Dulles,  reposition  the  plane  to  Na-
tional  so  they  can  leave  more  quickly.  It  will  be  interesting  to  see 
how they use the preliminary rules. But our hope is, that as many 
as who want to, eventually will be allowed to use it. 

Senator  ALLEN.  That’s  a  creative  thought.  Several  of  those  that 
you talked about have the pilot a law as a law enforcement officer. 
I  suppose  an  owner  of  a  plane  might—could  get  the  training  and 
get certified as a law enforcement officer. 

Mr.  CEBULA.  Senator  Allen  on  that  issue.  It’s  probably  not  as 
publicized,  there  were  three  airports  that  were  also  closed  for  peo-
ple that weren’t based there, to be able to fly into that the TSA es-
tablish  a  program  in  February  to  allow  that  to  happen.  We  call 
them the D.C. Three, College Park Airport is probably the one that 
people are most familiar with. 

Last weekend we had an event at our headquarters in Frederick 
were people could receive the training as part of vetting the process 
that they have to go through. And there were 180 people that were 
there.  And  so  there  was  a  lot  of  enthusiasm  on  behalf  of  the——

Senator ALLEN. To qualify as a law enforcement officer? 
Mr Cebula: No, this was to qualify to be able to fly into the D.C. 
Three. There’s a three-part process, and there were two parts of it. 

Senator ALLEN. What are the D.C. Three, just for the record? 
Mr.  CEBULA.  I’m  sorry  it’s  Hyde  Field,  Potomac  Air  Park,  and 
College Park Airport. They’re all in Maryland. And they’re the ones 
that  are  I  guess,  kind  of  our  access  point  to  the  Nation’s  Capital. 
Our being the smaller aircraft owner and operator. 

I  will  tell  you  that  there  was  discussion  about  what’s  going  to 
happen  with  someone  who  is  in  a  police  station  like  Philadelphia 
where  they  are  at  a  gateway  facility.  Will  they  be  able  to  have  ac-
cess?  I’m  not  sure  that  TSA  at  this  point  has  the  answer  to  that 
question.  I  have  raised  it  to  them  as  recently  as  yesterday  I  think 
that those are issues that they are still working through. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Well,  in  the  event.  I  see  willingness  of  them  to 
work something like that out for practicality. If you had Mr. Coyne 
in the situation—I fly into Dulles, drive in for the association meet-
ing  or  whatever  the  meeting  is  or  whatever  the  event  is,  the  cele-
bration,  whatever  it  maybe.  How  can  you  under  these  regulations 
could  you  reposition  the  plane  to  Reagan  National  from  Dulles 
since  that  is  not  actually  a  gateway  airport?  Would  they  have  to 
fly  to  Dulles  to  Philadelphia,  or  Lexington,  or  something,  and  get 
them to fly back in? 

Mr. COYNE. We’ve had discussions with TSA and it’s been our as-
sumption  that  a  Dulles  aircraft  that  is  already  in  the  ADIZ  zone, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

57

where you have TSA officials at Signature or Hawthorne out there 
in  Dulles,  and  you  would  have  no  passengers  on  the  airplane.  It 
would  be  a  repositioning  we  call  it,  in  aviation  where  the  pilots 
move  the  airplane.  TSA  has  expressed  to  us  that  the  pilots,  since 
there  would  be  no  passengers  on  the  airplane  there  would  be  no 
need  for  a  law  enforcement  officer,  just  as  a  dead  headed  flight 
with  an  airline  coming  in,  doesn’t  have  Marshalls  coming  into  Na-
tional  with  just  pilots.  The  pilots  have  been  screened  and  it’s  our 
expectation  they’d  be  able  to  reposition  that  airplane  without  any 
difficultly. 

Senator ALLEN. Let me ask a final question. Since we’ve brought 
up all the things that we are concerned about as far as practicality 
and  reasonableness  such  as  the  limited  number  of  portal  cities,  in 
here—or  portal  airports,  the  cockpit  doors,  and  how  these  law  en-
forcement  officers  would  qualify  and  so  forth.  Are  there—since  we 
do  care  about  security  and  we  all  agreed  that  whatever  was  done, 
you  could  have  a  special  requirement  or  requirements  for  general 
aviation  to  Reagan  National.  Are  there—and  I’ll  ask  you  all.  You 
all are the experts and represent those who are most familiar with 
the  operations.  Are  there  any  security  precautions  that  are  not  in-
cluded  in  the  Administration’s  plan  that  you  believe  ought  to  be 
made  a  part  of  the  new  security  regulations  for  general  aviation 
flights? 

Mr.  COYNE.  Well  I  personally  believe  that  the  use  of  a  biometric 
registered  traveler  card  that  of  course  has  been  discussed  for  air-
line  use,  and  transportation  worker  use  would  be  very  useful  for 
facilitating  the  identification  of  passengers.  Ed  talked  about  some-
thing  similar  to  this  in  their  TSAAC  program.  If  we  could  develop 
enough  confidence  in  a  core  group  of  trusted  passengers,  then  it 
would  seem  to  me,  just  like  we  trust  people  that  go  through  the 
process  of  getting  into  the  White  House  and  getting—you’re  sub-
mitting your social security number and getting permitted to go in 
and stand next to the President. 

We ought to be able to get the same confidence and giving them 
a biometric identification card that can be swiped at each FBO, and 
you  have  confirmation  that  that’s  the  only  people  who  are  on  the 
airplane. That if Yo-Yo Ma got his trusted traveler card and he was 
the only one on the airplane, then it would be fine for him to char-
ter  a  plane  and  get  in  and  out  of  National  to  perform  at  the  Ken-
nedy  Center,  or  something  like  that.  And  so  we  want  to  make  it 
relatively easy in the long term, for trusted Americans, people who 
are  absolutely  not  security  risks  in  any  way  shape  or  form  to  not 
to be, you know unnecessarily aggravated, and hassled. 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Mr. Bolen? 
Mr. BOLEN. Let me just followup on that. With regard to Reagan 
National Airport, I think a determination has been made that that 
is  a  unique  airport.  And  that  there  are  requirements  that  will  be 
placed  on  Reagan  National  that  you  will  not  see  anywhere  else  in 
the country, and certainly that’s commercial airline experience. We 
think  the  list  of  restrictions  for  getting  into  Reagan  National  for 
general aviation are certainly comprehensive. 

There  are  some  that  we  question  whether  or  not  it  is  the  best 
way  to  do  it,  or  if  it’s  workable.  But  I  don’t  think  there  was  a  lot 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

58

left  out  of  there.  But  I  think  what  Mr.  Coyne  is  talking  about  is 
that there are other restricted air spaces in the country. 

Typically the TFR’s which can go over a city and prevent general 
aviation  operations  for  long  periods  of  time  even  over  night.  There 
ought  to  be  a  way  for  companies  or  individuals  that  routinely  fly 
in and out of airports to make themselves and their operations well 
enough  known  to  our  Nation’s  security  forces  to  be  able  to  operate 
whether or not it’s restricted air space. 

And  I  think  that  the  commercial  airlines  have  established  that, 
the security forces are comfortable with their operations and that’s 
why  they  are  allowed  to  operate  in  restricted  air  space.  What  we 
need, we believe, is to have rules where our community can volun-
tarily  provide  whatever  information,  open  themselves  up,  change 
their operations to make the security groups comfortable. But then 
in  return  for  that  be  able  to  operate.  That’s  the  foundation  of  the 
TSAAC program that’s going on in the New York area. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Mr.  Cebula,  do  you  have  any  added  regulations 

that——

Mr. CEBULA. No, no, I wouldn’t have any added regulations. The 
one comment though I would make is, again for the individual that 
owns an aircraft that wants to have access to National, I think that 
is  an  important  issue  that  really  has  to  be  accommodated  under 
the TSA rule. 

Senator ALLEN. And could you—would you all envision an owner, 
I  know  you  represent  the  pilots  and  some  owners  are  pilots,  some 
owners are not pilots. But if the owner would qualify, if the owner 
took  the  training,  and  I  guess  they  would  have  to  get  firearms 
training  as  well.  If  they  got  the  training,  would  they  meet  the  re-
quirements of these proposed regulations? 

Mr.  CEBULA.  Well,  the  way  that  I,  at  least  I  understand  it  and 
until the rule comes out we won’t know for sure. But the way I am 
understanding  it,  the  pilots  of  a  aircraft  flying  without  passengers 
would  not  have  to  have  a  law  enforcement  officer  onboard.  So  if  a 
pilot  is  in  fact  vetted  and  has  gone  through  the  screening  process, 
what our desire is that they would be able to fly into National, hav-
ing met that. 

Mr. COYNE. But, I do think your point is a very good one because 
we foresee, certainly a return to what we call based aircraft at Na-
tional  airport.  Someone  who  actually  keeps  their  plane  there.  In 
fact,  I  kept  my  airplane  there  for  15  years  when  I  was  a  Member 
of  Congress.  I  kept  my  airplane  at  National  Airport  and  was  able 
to  get  home  for  meetings  with  my  family  and  constituents  every 
evening. We would love to see that for many people who base their 
airplanes.  There  were  literally  hundreds  of  people  who  had  based 
aircraft  at  National  Airport.  For  them  to  have  the  pilot  exemption 
work for them when they fly, that’s fine. 

But they are going to want to take their children with them. You 
decide  to  take  your  son,  or  daughter  with  you  does  that  mean  I’ve 
got to have a law enforcement officer on the airplane? So that’s an 
example  of  the  kind  of  common  sense  rulemaking  discussion  that 
we  hope  we  can  work  with  TSA  as  this  progresses.  But  you  know, 
we’re  just  happy  that  Congress  has  given  us  a  rule,  or  like  any 
other  rule  or  any  other  law—I  mean  one  thing  you  learn  about  pi-
lots, we are an incredibly rule following group of people. And we—

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

59

with  the  exception  of  two  of  the  dumbest  pilots  on  the  planet  last 
month—really believe in following rules, and we want to work with 
you in developing rules that will work for us. 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you sir, Senator Rockefeller? 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Thank  you.  Thank  you,  Senator  Allen.  I 
guess,  I  want  to  go  back  and  make  a  couple  of  points,  to  sort  of 
take it back to the larger picture. As Ed Bolen knows we have been 
working  with  the  Taiwanese  for  12  years  to  develop  7  passenger 
jets  that  will  cross  the  United  States  without  stopping,  and  cross 
the Atlantic without stopping. I think we are about there. 

So  I  understand  very  well  the  role  of  charter,  and  have  to  use 
it in West Virginia sometimes, a number of our cities have airports 
but  don’t  have  airport  service  so  to  speak.  Sometimes,  you  have  to 
use  the  charter.  But  it  is  true  just  to  put  it  back  into  perspective, 
not talking about just Reagan National, and I congratulate you for 
that  Senator  Allen,  the  Senator  from  the  unconstitutional,  you 
would put it, State of West Virginia congratulates you for that. But 
it is true that about three-quarters of all aircraft that take off and 
land  every  day  are  general  aviation.  So  that’s  the  bigger  picture. 
There maybe 25–35 that land per day 24 in, 24 out at Reagan Na-
tional. 

But that’s not the larger picture here. And I’ve been trying to get 
a  hearing  on  this  for—since  before  the  beginning  of  this  session. 
And I haven’t been able to. So that’s why I’m concentrating a little 
bit  more  on  this  area.  There  are  19,000  general  aviation  airports 
on  a  nationwide  basis.  I  think  that  would  come  as  a  surprise  to 
most  people.  So  it’s  a  huge  amount  of  people  and  about  two-thirds 
of  those  are  single  engine.  I  guess  one  of  the  things  I  worry  about 
is  that,  and  I  don’t  worry  about  it  negatively,  I  just  worry  about 
it with real concern. 

If  the  Homeland  Security  folks  have  attached  12  people  to  this, 
and  a  million  and  the  half  dollar  budget.  I  think  their  concentra-
tion is going to be pretty much on the Reagan National experience. 
I  think  it’s  going  to  have  to  be  because  one,  it  will  be  an  intense 
experience  that  involves  a  lot  of  people  from  Congress  and  people 
who  people  listen  to.  So,  I  just  got  to  think  about  all  those  other 
situations out there. I’m sorry I have no choice. 

Mr. Cebula you indicated in your AOPA testimony that, that you 
believe  there’s  a  limited  threat  involved  with  the  small  turbo  prop 
airplane.  Actually  I’m  a  little  unclear  about  that.  Senator  Stevens 
was—it  looks  like  we’re  going  to  have  to  exempt  all  of  Alaska,  to 
satisfy the Chairman. I don’t say that insincerely, if three-quarters 
of traffic within the city, that is truly stunning. We don’t have sub-
ways  in  West  Virginia,  but  we  have  pretty  much  everything  else. 
But that turbo prop aircraft does not provide a threat. Now, in Iraq 
a  threat  is  a  rock,  it’s  an  IED  could  be,  a  threat  is  anything.  But 
above  all,  in  the  minds  of  American  people  and  I  suspect,  and  I 
work  on  this  all  the  time  in  my  Committee  work  that  an  airline, 
that an airplane is still the matter of choice for biological, for chem-
ical, and for worse. 

Mr. CEBULA. Senator, could I make a comment to that. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. When I’m finished. 
Mr. CEBULA. OK. Sure. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

60

Senator ROCKEFELLER. There’s no proof of that. But there’s proof 
so far, because it’s the only experience that we’ve had of a dramatic 
nature  and  there  was  all  the  single  engine  crop  dusting  and  all  of 
that  stuff,  that  went  on,  a  lot  of  it  involved  aviation.  One  can’t  es-
cape  that.  And  you  indicated  that  a  light  plane,  a  small  plane 
would  carry  about  500  pounds  of  material  or  so.  A  limited  amount 
of fuel, ‘‘only’’ 500 pounds or so in material. Just to put that in per-
spective  Mr.  Cebula.  I  wonder  what  your  view  of  500  pounds  of 
plastic  explosives  means.  What’s  your  view  of  500  pounds  of  bio-
logical weapons, which after all you can shut down a coast in a day 
if  you  belt  yourself  with  smallpox.  It  hasn’t  happened,  it  doesn’t 
mean  it  won’t.  You  got  the  biological,  you  got  a  variety  of  other 
things.  And  I  just,  there’s  been  a  tendency  from  the  panel  to  say 
that we’re doing everything we can, but we don’t like the following 
rules. And the rules tend to be most of the rules. 

Now,  I  think  Mr.  Coyne,  you  may  have  a  point  on  LEO.  I  mean 
I  don’t  see—that  doesn’t  strike  me  as  a  huge  thing.  I  want  to  look 
into  that.  But  it  strikes  me  as  a  point  of  reasonable  negotiation. 
But  I  think  having  the  right  kind  of  licenses,  the  biometric  avail-
able  licenses,  the  right  kind  of  checking.  I  go  in  and  out  of  Haw-
thorne,  and  there  has  been  absolutely  nothing  that  has  changed 
there,  including  the  crowding  I  might  say.  There’s  never  crowding 
that I have experienced there. There’s just a desk by the little door 
that  you  walk  out  of.  Which  I  don’t  have  to  sign  into.  Somebody 
signs  into  it  and  someone  is  sitting  at  it,  and  he’s  got  something 
that sort of looks like this. 

I don’t know whether that’s official, whether that isn’t, who signs 
up  for  what,  or  who  does  what.  But  there  has  been  no  change.  I 
would  agree  with  the  Senator  from  Virginia  that  if  you  are  going 
from Dulles to Reagan maybe that’s the special situation. You don’t 
have  passengers  that’s  repositioning,  as  you  put  it.  Maybe  it’s  a 
special  situation,  all  of  it  is  negotiation.  But  what  I  worry  about, 
is  those  200,000  flights.  The  most  of  which  are  general  aviation. 
And  all  of  the  potential  problems  that  can  come  with  somebody 
who’s  not  stable,  somebody  who  does  have  a  different  purpose, 
somebody  who  did  use  a  charter  or  rental  service,  and  somebody 
who  did  so  with  a  purpose.  You  know  flight  schools  didn’t  enter 
into our lexicon incidentally. They did so because there were people 
who  saw  that  as  a  purpose.  Just  saying  that  500  pounds  doesn’t 
really  constitute  a  threat.  I’m  kind  of  interested  in  why  you  think 
that? 

Mr. CEBULA. The general aviation community prior to 9/11 secu-
rity  wasn’t  really  in  our  vocabulary.  The  only  thing  we  did  related 
to security was try to prevent an aircraft from being stolen. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. I’m talking about post 9/11, not prior. 
Mr. CEBULA. Right. So when 9/11 happened the general aviation 
community have gone through what I think is a pretty phenomenal 
change.  So  that  pilots  now,  you  can’t  learn  to  fly  without  at  least 
proving your citizenship. If you are not a U.S. citizen you are going 
to have to go through a background check. There’s an incredible in-
crease  in  awareness,  whether  it’s  by  regulation,  or  whether  it’s  by 
program,  of  the  need  to  be  alert,  vigilant,  and  report  those  activi-
ties. On top of that from an airport side the——

Senator ROCKEFELLER. This is all voluntary, right? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

61

Mr. CEBULA. Not all of those programs, some of them are regula-
tions  and  some  of  them  are  voluntary,  as  the  Airport  Watch  Pro-
gram,  as  I  mentioned.  Just  to  give  you  a  context  on  the  Airport 
Watch Program, 400,000 members, 80 percent of our members have 
a  recognition  and  understand  what  the  program  is.  So  I  mean  it’s 
definitely  gotten  out  there  into  the  community.  One  of  the  things 
we did earlier this year is surveyed our members about some of the 
security  requirements  at  the  airports  and  73  percent  of  them  have 
fences at the airports which I have to say was surprising. 

I  was  surprised  and  pleased  quite  frankly  that  it  was  quite  that 
high. There have been things that have been implemented. And we 
really  came  from  what  I  think  was  probably  just  not  very  strong 
awareness  pre  9/11,  and  an  incredible  awareness  post  9/11.  There 
has been a lot that has been done. It also, in the context of looking 
at all of the potential threats to Homeland Security what we would 
ask as the representative for these pilots across the country, is that 
a  light  aircraft  be  viewed  in  context  with  other  threats.  And  in 
that——

Senator ROCKEFELLER. I don’t understand what that means. 
Mr.  CEBULA.  The  threat  from  whether  it’s  a  Ryder  truck  or 

whether it’s containers arriving from overseas. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. But you see, that way you will never have 
to  worry.  Because  if  you  are  using  context  with  trucks.  Have  you 
seen the movie Dirty War put out by BBC? 

Mr. CEBULA. No. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. You ought to. It’s just a plain white truck 
that closes down, this is a docudrama highly researched, no pretty 
girls,  no  handsome  men,  it’s  a  stunning  thing  to  watch.  It  takes 
about  a  hour  and  the  half.  It  shuts  down  central  London  through 
a  dirty  bomb  for  30  years,  to  allow  it  to  irradiate,  you  know  to 
deradiate.  And  I  just  say,  see  it  in  context.  Everything  is  dan-
gerous. I think planes have generally tended to be viewed by those 
who  would  do  us  ill  as  the  weapon  of  choice.  That  doesn’t  mean 
they will continue to. 

But  that’s  the  way  it’s  been  to  this  point.  I  just  say,  that  put-
ting—when  you  want  to  put  yourself  in  context.  I  think  what  you 
want  to  stay,  is  voluntary  as  possible.  I  think  some  of  your  people 
will  cooperate  and  some  of  them  won’t.  I  don’t  think  it’s  particu-
larly  in  the  national  security  interest,  particularly  when  you  don’t 
have  a  TSA  which  either  has  the  money,  or  the  people  to  do  com-
mercial properly. 

And  in  particularly  with  their  12  and  the  million  and  a  half, 
which they will probably send on Washington to do any of the other 
200,000  airlines.  Why  would  the  American  public,  or  why  would  a 
terrorists  say,  I’m  going  to  pick  the  commercial,  and  I’m  going  to 
ignore  private,  general  aviation.  Why  would  they  do  that  when 
they  know  that  private  doesn’t  have  the  requirements  that  com-
mercial does. I just pose that to you. I think that you want to speak 
Mr.Coyne? 

Mr.  COYNE.  Yes,  I  very  much  wanted  to.  Several  comments  I’d 
like to make. I want to thank you for saying one thing at the begin-
ning  is  that  you  are  worried  about  this.  Believe  me,  the  three  of 
us are as worried about it as you are, and more so. Because frankly 
it is something that virtually we think of almost every day. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

62

Speaking also for the FBOs and you’ve talked about Hawthorne, 
one of our most successful and distinguished member companies. I 
submit  to  you,  that  if  you  tried  to  go  through  that  little  desk  at 
Hawthorne  and  go  to  a  plane  other  than  the  one  that  the  pilots 
were  expecting  you  to  get  on,  you  would  not  be  able  to  get  off  the 
ground  at  all,  even  as  Senator  Rockefeller.  There  are  many  layers 
of  security  especially  in  the  charter  area.  These  are  rules  that  we 
have  to  obey  by  law.  These  are  not  voluntary  rules,  these  are  the 
so  called  Twelve-Five  rules  in  charter.  And  a  charter  pilot  is  not 
allowed  to  depart  with  passengers  other  than  who  he  is  supposed 
to  depart  with.  And  those  passengers  all  have  to  be  pre-screened, 
and then in addition to that, there is the person at the FBO to see 
if there’s anybody that doesn’t look like they might be a passenger. 

But there are several layers of security in the charter world. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I have never been pre-screened. I’ve never 

ever——

Mr. COYNE. No, no. The pilot——
Senator ROCKEFELLER. And they don’t recognize me. 
Mr.  COYNE.  You’ve  never  gotten  on  an  airplane  that  the  pilots 
weren’t expecting you to get on. And they knew who you were and 
they  knew  that  you  were  not  a  threat.  And  you  would  have  not 
been  allowed  to  get  on  a  plane  where  you  were  not  expected  on  a 
airplane. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  On  the  voluntary  basis,  the  pilots,  and  I 
won’t  argue  with  you.  They  are  doing  that  with  a  great  majority 
of the part. 

Mr. COYNE. No, it’s a law requirement basically. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  I  understand  but  they  are  going  to  be  so 

long as the system is voluntary. 
Mr. COYNE. It’s not voluntary. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. No, I’m talking about the general system. 
Mr. COYNE. You’re talking about general aviation pilots? 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Yes. 
Mr.  COYNE.  I  was  talking  about  a  charter  plane.  When  you  go 

through——

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Well I’m talking about——
Mr. COYNE. And I want you to feel comfortable about the charter 
aircraft that are coming into Piedmont that you get on. Nobody else 
will  be  allowed  to  get  on  that  airplane  except  you.  And  you  won’t 
be  allowed  to  get  on  any  other  airplane.  And  if  there’s  someone 
that shows up that’s not supposed to be there, they will be stopped 
at that FBO. But I also wanted to address your point, that you said 
where  terrorist—aviation  aircraft  are  the  weapon  of  choice.  Vir-
tually  every  terrorist  act  involves  transportation.  And  in  fact,  al-
though  aviation  was  involved  in  9/11  tragically  as  we  all  know.  Of 
course not general aviation. Commercial airline aviation. 

But  you  know,  the  terrorists  used  boats  to  blow  up  the  USS 
COLE. They have used trains in Madrid. They have used subways 
in Japan. They have used ambulances in Israel. They have used or-
dinary trucks, all sorts of vehicles, bicycles have been used in Iraq. 
I  mean  the  terrorists  choose  transportation  in  almost  every  case. 
What  they  have  not  chosen  in  the  United  States  at  all,  is  general 
aviation  aircraft.  But  NBC  did.  NBC  decided  to  pretend  to  show 
that it would be easy to go into an aircraft FBO and take a private 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

63

airplane  by  charter  and  use  it.  And  the  operator  of  the  facility  in 
St.  Louis,  where  NBC  tried  to  do  this,  never—the  FBI  was  called 
within  30  minutes  after  they  showed  up.  Raising  all  sorts  of  bells 
and whistles. We have not seen in America, a general aviation air-
craft.  That’s  not  to  say  that  we  are  not  vigilant.  We  are.  The  good 
news is that——

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  What  percentage  of  general  aviation  is 

chartered? 

Mr. COYNE. What percentage of general aviation——
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Special, or chartered. 
Mr.  COYNE.—is  charter?  Well  of  the  smaller  aircraft  a  very  rel-
atively  small  percentage,  except  in  Alaska.  The  turbine  aircraft,  of 
the  larger  turbine  aircraft,  probably  something  approaching  25  to 
30 percent is charter now. But the good news that I want to make 
you—because  I  know  you  are  worried  about  this  I  wanted  to  give 
you  some  good  news.  And  that  is,  that  at  these  thousands  of  air-
ports  across  the  country  there  are  our  employees.  FBO  employees, 
charter  company  employees,  flight  department  employees,  private 
owners  of  aircraft,  who  are  at  that  airport.  And  they  are  far  more 
worried  that  any  law  enforcement  officer  will  ever  be.  Far  more 
worried than any other government official would ever be. It’s their 
livelihood.  And  they  are  constantly  looking  for  something  that 
might be wrong. 

And  if  they  see  it.  The  first  people  to  call  the  FBI  about  the  po-
tential  of  a  terrorists  was  the  flight  school,  2  weeks  before  9/11. 
And it took three phone calls to the FBI as the 9/11 report showed 
before  Moussaoui  was  interrogated  by  the  FBI.  So  our  guys  are 
America’s  eyes  and  ears  at  airports,  and  we  have  done  an  out-
standing job making sure that our airplanes are not misused. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  I  just  want  to—it’s  very  easy  to  make 
that  statement.  We  have  done  an  outstanding  job,  there  have  not 
been anymore——

Mr. COYNE. We’re still worried. I mean we continue to be. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Well I want you to be very worried. 
Mr. COYNE. We are. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Because  generally  speaking,  in  a  broad 
citizenry  if  something  is  voluntary,  and  you  indicated  that  certain 
things  that  aren’t,  but  where  things  are,  most  people  will  comply, 
there  are  however  those  who  will  not.  And  those  who  wish  to  do 
harm, will definitely not. Ed. 

Mr. BOLEN. Senator, I just wanted to take a moment, you talked 
about  the  200,000  airplanes,  600,000  pilots,  19,000  airports,  and 
that  concerns  you.  I  want  to  assure  you  it  concerns  us  a  lot  too. 
And  what  we  did  after  9/11,  is  we  brought  in  the  security  experts 
and  we  said,  we  don’t  know  a  lot  about  security,  can  you  look  at 
our  industry  and  tell  us  what  you  say  we  need  to  do  to  enhance 
it. 

And  what  they  said  to  us  was,  you  know  what,  general  aviation 
has  got  a  lot  of  inherent  strings.  You  need  to  find  ways  to  build 
on  it.  For  example,  every  pilot  in  the  United  States  is  registered 
with  the  Federal  Government.  That’s  a  good  thing.  Make  sure  the 
Federal  Government’s  data  base  of  pilots  is  routinely  matched 
against the Federal Watch Program, the Watch List. They said it’s 
great  that  every  pilot  has  to  carry  around  the  pilot’s  license.  But 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

64

you  need  to  do  more,  you  need  to  improve  those  with  biometrics, 
and we’ve been working with your office to do that. They said these 
airports  are  really  good  because  they’re  sort  of  small  communities, 
with  very  nosey  neighbors.  Everybody  kind  of  watches  everybody 
else, everybody speaks in their own language. 

And so if somebody comes up and doesn’t know what a tail drag-
ger  is.  There’s  a  pretty  good  chance  they  shouldn’t  be  at  the  air-
port.  So  it’s  good  that  you’ve  got  a  community  where  everybody  is 
kind  of  talking  to  each  other,  you’ve  got  our  own  language.  But 
what  do  you  do  if  you  don’t  recognize,  if  you  recognize  suspicious 
behavior, who are you going to call. That’s why we’ve worked to try 
to  setup  the  1–800  number,  where  you  can  call  and  report  sus-
picious behavior. 

So  there’s  been  a  whole  list  of  things  that  we  have  done  to  try 
to build on inherent strengths as we been educated about them and 
to  reduce  our  vulnerabilities.  And  we’re  continuing  to  do  that 
today.  I  think  a  lot  of  it  has  gone  under  the  radar  because  a  lot 
of  it  has  been  tweaking,  and  building  on  things  that  were  already 
out there. Making improvements on them. 

And  I  think  that  it  hasn’t  hit  as  the  massive  regulation.  There 
have  been  some  like  the  12–5  rule,  where  charter  operators  are 
now  subject  to  specific  regulations  they  weren’t  subject  to  before. 
But  a  lot  of  what  we  have  done  is  built  on  inherent  strengths,  as 
we have educated about them from security experts. And we think 
that’s taking us in the right direction and we’d like the opportunity 
to continue that. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  And  Ed  I  understand  that  and  I’ll  con-
clude Mr. Chairman, simply by saying that, one deals in the United 
States  with  folks  that  come  from  a  lot  of  places,  and  we’re  glad 
they’re here. And that generally speaking human nature tries to do 
the right thing. The problem is as in the field of intelligence, if you 
make  one  mistake  that’s  the  one  that  lasts.  If  you  don’t  know  no-
body  notices  it.  Human  nature  is  not  always  good.  There  are  a  lot 
of people here who wish us evil. 

There  are  a  lot  of  people  if  you  were—Mr.  Cebula,  I  really  want 
you  to  go  get  that  movie,  get  it  on  DVD  called  Dirty  War.  It’s  not 
a movie, it’s a docudrama. And it is stunning and chilling, because 
Britain  thinks—it  takes  place  in  London,  and  they  think  they  got 
all the answers because the average Brit is photographed 46 times, 
videoed 46 times a day. 

They’ve been dealing with the IRA for all these years, and think 
they’ve  got  pretty  much  the  answers  and  it  turns  out  they  don’t 
have a single clue. They don’t have a single clue, as to how to take 
the  person  who  comes  from  Pakistan,  the  person  who  comes  from 
Chechnya,  they  each  bring  a  little  bit,  suddenly  some  barrels,  a 
white  truck  appears,  and  central  London  goes  up.  I  have  to  worry 
about that. I am paid to worry about that. So are you. It’s just that 
the TSA has 12 people assigned to this, and a $1,500,000 and that 
doesn’t give me a whole lot of confidence. But I do understand what 
you’re saying. I appreciate your testimony, and the I appreciate the 
Chairman’s patience. 

Mr. CEBULA. Thank you. 
Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you  Senator  Rockefeller.  I  want  to  thank 
all  of  our  witnesses  as  we  conclude.  I  think  all  of  us  do  commend 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

65

the  new  Administration,  the  TSA  making  this  a  positive  step  for-
ward. We are going to work together to make sure it’s practical and 
reasonable. 

Moreover, you all have some good ideas. And I do think the con-
cept  of  this  biometric  identification  card,  not  just  for  general  avia-
tion  pilots,  or  passengers,  is  one  that  ought  to  be  adopted  actually 
in  regular  commercial  aviation  for  trusted  travelers  as  well,  to 
make commercial aviation less of a nightmare, stress, and aggrava-
tion for individuals. I thank you Mr. Bolen, Mr. Coyne, Mr. Cebula, 
for your testimony. I know we will work together with the Adminis-
tration  in  a  positive  way.  This  is  good  news  for  jobs,  and  access  to 
the Nation’s Capital. I thank you all, and thank my colleague from 
West  Virginia  for  his  assistance.  And  I  will  note  what  you  are 
doing  if  you  look  at  the  map,  people  fly  in  from  West  Virginia, 
Ohio,  would  actually  have  to  backtrack  to  get  to  Reagan  National. 
Hearing’s adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 1 p.m., the Committee was adjourned.]

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:52 Apr 25, 2006 Jkt 026701 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\26701.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

